TO VOICER SAMUEL HEMPHILL. I AM SORRY YOU ARE SO HATEFUL. THE LAST I CHECKED THE ISSUES YOU TALKED ABLOT ARE ISOLATED.. THER ARE HATE CRIMES ALL OVER THE WORLD. BUT YOUR WISH FOR AN ASIN NATION TAKING US OVER.. WHEN IS THE LAST TIME ASIANS ACCAPTED AFRICAN AMERICAN INTO THEIR NEIGHBORHOOD???
&gt; Even mentally retarded people are sentient. Most that you're familiar with are, to one degree or another. However, there are some arguably not so. They're still people though, and even though it might be inconvenient, you don't stop caring for them, you don't euthanize them. &gt; it may be pointless discussing a definition of life with a religiobot. A) Atheist. B) It's not the definition of "life", something that biology gets to decide. They're still uncertain if viruses should really count, but on the issue of a 1 celled zygote, they're unanimous. The definition in question is not of "life", but personhood. So, you're so *very* wrong on all of it.
&gt;  i can only repeat that contrary to what you're assuming, you do need explicit permission to alter the author's license offer And I can only repeat that there is not some magical "license offer" document here, and that modifying the file as permitted by one of the licenses does not constitute "re-licensing", does not constitute "removing the license" and does not constitute "changing the license". The license under which you received the software was one of: 1. The BSD license, or  2. The GNU GPL, version 2. No other terms can apply. No other restrictions can apply. The only terms which apply are those of the license you accept. Again: read what I've written about the consequences of this. The barest minimum consequence which can come out of your argument is that, despite the offer of GPL, it's not legal for anyone to distribute the software under GPL; your magical immutable license offer which must be passed on would constitute a restriction not present in the terms of the GPL, and thus any GPL distributor who passes on a requirement to preserve it would breach the GPL in so doing. The further consequence of this would be that it is not possible for _any_ piece of software, originally offered under a choice of BSD or GPL by the author, to be legally distributed under the GPL by any licensee. Are you truly arguing for, and prepared to accept, that consequence? Or are you willing to step back and realize that this contradiction with actual reality -- where it _is_ possible to dual license and distribute under either offered license -- points to a problem in the concept of the magically immutable license offer?
I mentioned cl-who and another alternative (html-template), both by Weitz. I didn't want to actually use them in such a basic example as I was concerned that they'd confuse the issue and I didn't want to depict them as a part of Hunchentoot.
Don't complain. Their gasoline will burn just as sweetly in your car as Saudi Arabia's.
There are actually staple marks on the application but on the side, which may mean it was in a stack with other tests.  Maybe he added the paper clip later?
I think that was nervous laughter. Seriously, seeing that made me very nervous.
If the teacher stapled a condom to the test, they would be a failure.
&gt; pulling a knife will almost certainly get you killed The gent in question's shown otherwise...
I wish I were as confident as you that this will not fly.
I wanted to choose a version, and I was looking at the [Wiki Article about the song](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/All_Along_the_Watchtower).   I think I am scared that there are Pat Boone, Dolly Parton and a Tiny Tim cover versions of the song.  Which of those could be the worst versions of the song.... It seems to be a bit of a toss up.
I'll keep my supersoaker of grape juice handy, just in case they're wrong.
&gt; this society functioned surprisingly well without the state. I don't know about medieval Iceland, but [Somalia's doing OK](http://politics.reddit.com/info/2q4i5/comments). &gt; the guys didn't seem to be altogether that knowledgeable. They're arguing against a boring, beside-the-point caricature of libertarianism, which morever has little (intelligient) connection to even the boring, beside-the-point caricature of Ron Paul (which you can see any time an interviewer pretends that it'd be helpful to elicit a 30s answer to "Please list off the Government programs and organizations you'd like to kill.").  If you'd like a more knowledgeable and interesting take on libertarianism, listen to [this 'book forum' mp3](http://www.catomedia.org/archive-2007/cbfa-03-22-07.mp3) : it has the author of a book particularly on eccentric historical libertarians, a Social Democrat reviewer of the book, and worthwhile Q&amp;A.
McGiver? Is he the dude who gives out McDonalds applications?
And yet no impeachment. How soon we do forgive and forget.
I actually agree to a certain degree.
&gt; Try to have several inches of insulating materials under you. Again, the more insulation you have, the more you'll be insulated from the cold ground. As I found out 2 weeks ago, 3-4 sturdy plastic shopping bags (not the kind you toss out after use but the ones you buy for 2 euros or so, in European (Dutch?) supermarkets) will help a *lot* to stay warm while camping, as insulation from the ground (I spent one night without and one with 'm, big, big difference). Even the floor mat from the trunk of a car should help, if you have nothing else.
Solution is for the overexposed Neocons to disappear completely for a couple generations, so that they can build up secret power anew.
Good for those companies growing enough to have that option.  Good for the CEO's for being smart enough to get such jobs.  Bad for pencil pushers and repetetive motion morons who are stuck in their 9-5.   In other words, ha ha!
My first acid experience was a bad trip. Utterly terrifying.  It also gave me fantastic insights that lead to significant inner growth that helped me gorw up and become an adult. Not disagreeing with you on anything that you are saying.   Just pointing out a paradox in my own experience.
HELLO SAMUAL HEMPHILL.. YOU MUST REALLY NOT LIKE YOUR SELF. IF IT WASNT FOR THIS HORRRIBLE COUNTRY YOU WOULD NOT BE ALLOWED TO HATE...
You don't have to live there.  Of course, the rest of America (and planet) is being poluted quite nicely too.
Jesus christ she doesn't get 2 sentences into the video without pulling a godwin
I'm familiar (on this level; not rocket scientist levels) with nozzles and how they impact performance.  I should have said "reaction mass and velocity", of course, and for rockets where there's a pressure chamber, the geometry helps increase velocity, but it's the total force that matters, and the rockets are not propelled by generating pressure behind the rocket, but by throwing mass as fast as possible. If pressure were more than an implementation detail for certain kinds of rockets, then you would expect that mass drivers and ion engines wouldn't work, or that there was an improvement in efficiency for chemical rockets over things that just throw mass as fast as possible.  This turns out to be the opposite of the case, because the pressure in a chemical rocket is not an indicator of a general rule about rockets, but something specific to that case.
You have just summed up precisely why I don't believe in organized religion. It is used as a means of control and division, the latter being quite apparent throughout your argument.
Now, Putin is gonna hire Deep Blue to defeat Kasparov!
Check out if 'Burn The Fat Feed The Muscle' can help you lose weight fast!  Is It a SCAM?
Just make Blackwater walk the roads in front of Army vehicles.
I know about these things.
Nice. I 'walked away' a long time ago after realizing just what exactly was going on with the control thing, and only keep something of a light eye on it anymore. As such, I don't generally get up to date info from the conventions. If anything 'gets brighter' it's how obvious it is that they don't want people to look anywhere else...
Yeah, I have read it. The way I see it it's more like preventing the federal government fom telling the Alabama judge he cannot have ten commandments at his court.
Where did I say that individuals don't have the right to freedom of religion? I said that states have all the rights bestowed upon them by the 10th amendment, that's it. 
They say "artificial reef."  I think "inexpensive trash removal."
Nope. In Northern Europe, only Hungary and Switzerland have subs.
you link to the video, but don't substantiate your claim.  Where the link to the story about Feist turning down the fast-food cash?
That's actually exactly what I was thinking it was going to be.
Send petition to Singapore government too as its hypocritcal stand should also be condemned. It is providing the life line to the Burmese military leaders and big-time drug lords while hanging the small time drug runners. It has blood on its hands. http://www.theage.com.au/news/world/web-of-cash-power-and-cronies/2007/09/28/1190486569946.html?page=fullpage Web of cash, power and cronies Eric Ellis  September 29, 2007 SINGAPORE isn't just skilled at mandatory executions of drug traffickers, running an excellent airport and selling cameras on Orchard Road. It also does a useful trade keeping Burma's military rulers and their cronies afloat. Much attention is placed on China and its coming hosting of the Olympic Games as a diplomatic pressure point on the rampant Burmese junta. But there is a group of government businessmen-technocrats in Singapore who will also be closely monitoring the brutality in Rangoon. And, were they so inclined, their influence could go a long way to limiting the misery being inflicted on Burma's 54 million people. Collectively known as "Singapore Inc", they gather around the $A150 billion state-owned investment house Temasek Holdings, controlled by a member of the ruling Lee family. With an estimated $A3 billion staked in the country (and a more than $20 billion stake in Australia), Singapore Inc companies have been some of the biggest investors in and supporters of Burma's military junta — this while its Government, on the rare times it is asked, suggests a softly-softly diplomatic approach towards the junta. When it comes to Burma, Singapore pockets the high morals it likes to wave at the West elsewhere. Singapore's one-time head of foreign trade once said as his country was building links with Burma in the mid-1990s: "While the other countries are ignoring it, it's a good time for us to go in … you get better deals, and you're more appreciated … Singapore's position is not to judge them and take a judgemental moral high ground." But by providing Burma's pariah junta with the crucial equipment mostly denied by Western sanctions, Singapore has helped keep the junta and its cronies afloat for 20 years, since the last time the generals killed the citizens they are supposed to protect. Withdraw that financial support and Burma's junta would be substantially weakened, perhaps even fail. But after two decades of profitable business with the trigger-happy generals and their cronies, that's about the last thing Singapore is likely to do. There's too much money to be made. Hotels, airlines, military materiel and training, crowd control equipment and sophisticated telecoms-monitoring devices for its secret police — Singapore is manager and supplier to the junta, and the "cronified" economy it controls. It's impossible to spend any time in Burma and not make the junta richer, thanks to Singapore suppliers' contracts with the tourism industry. Singapore's hospitals also keep Burma's leaders alive — 74-year-old junta leader Than Shwe has been getting his intestinal cancer treated in a Singapore government hospital, protected by Singapore security. Singapore's boutiques keep junta wives and families cloaked in Armani, and its banks help launder their money and that of Burma's crony drug lords. Much of Singapore's activity in Burma has been documented by an analyst working in Prime Minister John Howard's direct chain of command, in the Office of National Assessments. Andrew Selth is recognised as an authority on the Burmese military. Now a research fellow at Queensland's Griffith University, Mr Selth has written extensively on how close Singapore is to the junta. Often writing as "William Ashton" in the authoritative Jane's Intelligence Review, Mr Selth has described in various articles how Singapore has sent the junta guns, rockets, armoured personnel carriers and grenade launchers, some of it trans-shipped from stocks seized by Israel from Palestinians in southern Lebanon. Singaporean companies have provided computers and networking equipment for Burma's defence ministry and army, while upgrading the bunkered junta's ability to network with regional commanders — so crucial as protesting monks take to the streets of 20 Burmese cities, causing major logistical headaches for the Tatmadaw, the Burmese military. "Singapore cares little about human rights, in particular the plight of the ethnic and religious minorities in Burma," Mr Selth writes. "Having developed one of the region's most advanced armed forces and defence industrial support bases, Singapore is in a good position to offer Burma a number of inducements which other ASEAN (Association of South-East Asian Nations) countries would find hard to match." Singapore's Foreign Minister, George Yeo, is the current chairman of ASEAN. Mr Selth says Singapore also provided the equipment for a "cyber war centre" to monitor dissident activity while training Burma's secret police, whose sole job seems to be ensuring pro-democracy groups are crushed. Monitoring dissidents is an area where Singapore has particular expertise. After almost five decades in power, the Lee family-controlled People's Action Party ranks behind only the communists of China, Cuba and North Korea in leadership longevity, skilled in neutralising opposition. "This centre is reported to be closely involved in the monitoring and recording of foreign and domestic telecommunications, including the satellite telephone conversations of Burmese opposition groups," Mr Selth writes. Singapore Government companies, such as leading arms supplier Singapore Technologies, dominate the communications and military sector in Singapore. "It is highly unlikely," Mr Selth writes, "that any of these arms shipments to Burma could have been made without the knowledge and support of the Singapore Government." He notes that Singapore's ambassadors to Burma have included a former senior Singapore armed forces officer, and a past director of Singapore's defence-oriented Joint Intelligence Directorate, people with a military background rather than professional diplomats. He writes that after the 1988 crackdown, when the junta killed 3000 protesters, "the first country to come to the regime's rescue was in fact Singapore". When I interviewed Singapore Technologies chief executive Peter Seah at his office in Singapore, I asked about the scale model of an armoured personnel carrier made by his company on his office table. He said ST sold the vehicles "only to allies". Does that include Burma, I asked, given that Singapore controversially helped sponsor the military regime into ASEAN? Mr Seah was non-specific: "We only sell to allies and we make sure they are responsible." He didn't say how. ST and Temasek don't respond to questions about their activities in Burma. Singapore is so close to Burma that one of its diplomats there wrote a handbook for its business people there. Matthew Sim's Myanmar on my Mind is full of useful tips for Singaporean business people in Burma. "A little money goes a long way in greasing the wheels of productivity," he writes. A chapter headed "Committing Manslaughter when Driving" describes the appropriate action if a Singaporean businessman accidentally kills a Burmese pedestrian. "Firstly, the international businessman could give the family of the deceased some money as compensation and dissuade them from pressing charges. Secondly, he could pay a Myanmar citizen to take the blame by declaring that he was the driver in the fatal accident. An international businessman should not make the mistake of trying to argue his case in a court of law when it comes to a fatal accident, even if he is in the right." Mr Sim says many successful Myanmar businessmen have opened shell companies in Singapore "with little or no staff, used to keep funds overseas". The companies are used to keep business deals outside the control of Burma's central bank, enabling Singaporeans and others to transact with Burma in Singapore. He may be referring to junta cronies such as Tay Za and the drug lord Lo Hsing Han. Lo is an ethnic Chinese, from Burma's traditionally Chinese-populated and opium-rich Kokang region in the country's east, bordering China. He controls a massive heroin empire, and one of Burma's biggest companies, Asia World, which the US Drug Enforcement Agency describes as a front for his drug-trafficking. Asia World controls toll roads, industrial parks and trading companies. Singapore is the Lo family's crucial window to the world, as it controls a number of companies there. His son Steven, who has been denied a visa to the US because of his links to the drug trade, married a Singaporean, Cecilia Ng, and the two reportedly control Singapore-based trading house Kokang Singapore. A former assistant secretary of state for the US Bureau of International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs, Robert Gelbard, has said that half Singapore's investment in Burma has "been tied to the family of narco-trafficker Lo Hsing Han". Eric Ellis is an Australian journalist and correspondent in South-East Asia. ============================================  " ...'The videos and photographs of what is happening on the streets of Yangon and other cities in Myanmar have evoked the revulsion of the people throughout South-east Asia and all over the world,' (Singapore Prime Minister Lee) said, noting that the junta's actions had implications not just for the country, but also Asean and the region."   Singapore daily, Straits Times, 1 Oct 2007 link:   http://www.straitstimes.com/Free/Story/STIStory_162941.html
Oh well.. they should call it government reboot then.
So now you see why you can be a theocrat without being a believer. Excellent. Maybe one day you'll understand why giving the State control of individuals' religious decisions is a bad idea.
What an idiot. The preferred sequence is first *beat*, then *taser*, then kill.
But there is no binder to keep the ingredients from liquifying. They'd need to be in the form of a solid. Molten aluminum wouldn't work. And you'd also need barium and sulphur--and I don't think they were stockpiling large quantitites of that in the WTC.
Yes, maybe someday if I am horribly injured and forced to undergo a lobotomy, then maybe, hopefully, I will come to understand your backwards logic.
It looks like a good idea, but solar cells are already too expensive to be feasible.
Bush dreams of having the approval rating of Ron Paul.
We bought rubber duckies and scared the Russians away from the Black Sea.
Milton Friedman would be proud.
1. The teacher paper-clipped the two together such that the employment application was about an inch higher than the test. This way, the maroon top section would peek out from behind the test. 2. The paper clip indentation can be clearly seen on the left side of the pages, about one staple-length below the staple.   
I hope they hire the GEICO cavemen to pitch it.
And you're willing to have HR 300 pass, forbidding citizens to challenge in federal court state laws prohibiting atheists from holding public office.  That is pretty much the same thing as saying that individuals don't have the right of freedom of religion.  Either people can make their decision without state interference or coercion or they can't.  
Damn that's mean!
Damn that's mean!
You're right - if you look at the facts without bias, the only conclusion to come to is that this administration loves crushing peaceful protests.  Not necessarily because they have to, but because they can, and everytime they do, we get a little closer to a police state. That's not really a conclusion, but let's just say I exercise my second amendment rights legally and as much as reasonably possible.
I know that high resolution overhead imagery of Israel has been purposely removed because it could aid terrorist attacks.  Maybe the rest of the details were also removed for the same reasons. Yeah, if you look closely at the remaining borders you can see that the roads in area was erased, it did exist at once point.
Classic Taake on stage.
Like I said, we're at an impasse. You can't make me value freedom of religion as little as you do, and I can't make you value it as much as I do.   
Yep, and I acknowledge that, check the next sentence: "evidently being some kind of gray-haired blademaster working in tight quarters with the advantage of total surprise is also pretty good" It can work, in specialized circumstances, but why leave yourself at the mercy of luck and good timing?
Actually it's Sammy Jankis.  Do you remember Sammy Jankis?
If the Neocons are right, this should turn them into a powerful nation of scrappy entrepreneurs any day now.
Man cannot live on bread alone.  Pass the jelly.
&gt; Space is big. You just won't believe how vastly, hugely, mind-bogglingly big ...
A typical Zionist in denial.
Send petition to Singapore government too as its hypocritcal stand should also be condemned. It is providing the life line to the Burmese military leaders and big-time drug lords while hanging the small time drug runners. It has blood on its hands.  http://www.theage.com.au/news/world/web-of-cash-power-and-cronies/2007/09/28/1190486569946.html?page=fullpage  Web of cash, power and cronies  Eric Ellis September 29, 2007  SINGAPORE isn't just skilled at mandatory executions of drug traffickers, running an excellent airport and selling cameras on Orchard Road. It also does a useful trade keeping Burma's military rulers and their cronies afloat.  Much attention is placed on China and its coming hosting of the Olympic Games as a diplomatic pressure point on the rampant Burmese junta. But there is a group of government businessmen-technocrats in Singapore who will also be closely monitoring the brutality in Rangoon. And, were they so inclined, their influence could go a long way to limiting the misery being inflicted on Burma's 54 million people.  Collectively known as "Singapore Inc", they gather around the $A150 billion state-owned investment house Temasek Holdings, controlled by a member of the ruling Lee family.  With an estimated $A3 billion staked in the country (and a more than $20 billion stake in Australia), Singapore Inc companies have been some of the biggest investors in and supporters of Burma's military junta — this while its Government, on the rare times it is asked, suggests a softly-softly diplomatic approach towards the junta.  When it comes to Burma, Singapore pockets the high morals it likes to wave at the West elsewhere. Singapore's one-time head of foreign trade once said as his country was building links with Burma in the mid-1990s: "While the other countries are ignoring it, it's a good time for us to go in … you get better deals, and you're more appreciated … Singapore's position is not to judge them and take a judgemental moral high ground."  But by providing Burma's pariah junta with the crucial equipment mostly denied by Western sanctions, Singapore has helped keep the junta and its cronies afloat for 20 years, since the last time the generals killed the citizens they are supposed to protect.  Withdraw that financial support and Burma's junta would be substantially weakened, perhaps even fail. But after two decades of profitable business with the trigger-happy generals and their cronies, that's about the last thing Singapore is likely to do. There's too much money to be made.  Hotels, airlines, military materiel and training, crowd control equipment and sophisticated telecoms-monitoring devices for its secret police — Singapore is manager and supplier to the junta, and the "cronified" economy it controls.  It's impossible to spend any time in Burma and not make the junta richer, thanks to Singapore suppliers' contracts with the tourism industry. Singapore's hospitals also keep Burma's leaders alive — 74-year-old junta leader Than Shwe has been getting his intestinal cancer treated in a Singapore government hospital, protected by Singapore security. Singapore's boutiques keep junta wives and families cloaked in Armani, and its banks help launder their money and that of Burma's crony drug lords.  Much of Singapore's activity in Burma has been documented by an analyst working in Prime Minister John Howard's direct chain of command, in the Office of National Assessments. Andrew Selth is recognised as an authority on the Burmese military. Now a research fellow at Queensland's Griffith University, Mr Selth has written extensively on how close Singapore is to the junta.  Often writing as "William Ashton" in the authoritative Jane's Intelligence Review, Mr Selth has described in various articles how Singapore has sent the junta guns, rockets, armoured personnel carriers and grenade launchers, some of it trans-shipped from stocks seized by Israel from Palestinians in southern Lebanon.  Singaporean companies have provided computers and networking equipment for Burma's defence ministry and army, while upgrading the bunkered junta's ability to network with regional commanders — so crucial as protesting monks take to the streets of 20 Burmese cities, causing major logistical headaches for the Tatmadaw, the Burmese military.  "Singapore cares little about human rights, in particular the plight of the ethnic and religious minorities in Burma," Mr Selth writes.  "Having developed one of the region's most advanced armed forces and defence industrial support bases, Singapore is in a good position to offer Burma a number of inducements which other ASEAN (Association of South-East Asian Nations) countries would find hard to match."  Singapore's Foreign Minister, George Yeo, is the current chairman of ASEAN.  Mr Selth says Singapore also provided the equipment for a "cyber war centre" to monitor dissident activity while training Burma's secret police, whose sole job seems to be ensuring pro-democracy groups are crushed.  Monitoring dissidents is an area where Singapore has particular expertise. After almost five decades in power, the Lee family-controlled People's Action Party ranks behind only the communists of China, Cuba and North Korea in leadership longevity, skilled in neutralising opposition.  "This centre is reported to be closely involved in the monitoring and recording of foreign and domestic telecommunications, including the satellite telephone conversations of Burmese opposition groups," Mr Selth writes.  Singapore Government companies, such as leading arms supplier Singapore Technologies, dominate the communications and military sector in Singapore. "It is highly unlikely," Mr Selth writes, "that any of these arms shipments to Burma could have been made without the knowledge and support of the Singapore Government."  He notes that Singapore's ambassadors to Burma have included a former senior Singapore armed forces officer, and a past director of Singapore's defence-oriented Joint Intelligence Directorate, people with a military background rather than professional diplomats.  He writes that after the 1988 crackdown, when the junta killed 3000 protesters, "the first country to come to the regime's rescue was in fact Singapore".  When I interviewed Singapore Technologies chief executive Peter Seah at his office in Singapore, I asked about the scale model of an armoured personnel carrier made by his company on his office table. He said ST sold the vehicles "only to allies".  Does that include Burma, I asked, given that Singapore controversially helped sponsor the military regime into ASEAN?  Mr Seah was non-specific: "We only sell to allies and we make sure they are responsible." He didn't say how. ST and Temasek don't respond to questions about their activities in Burma.  Singapore is so close to Burma that one of its diplomats there wrote a handbook for its business people there. Matthew Sim's Myanmar on my Mind is full of useful tips for Singaporean business people in Burma. "A little money goes a long way in greasing the wheels of productivity," he writes.  A chapter headed "Committing Manslaughter when Driving" describes the appropriate action if a Singaporean businessman accidentally kills a Burmese pedestrian. "Firstly, the international businessman could give the family of the deceased some money as compensation and dissuade them from pressing charges. Secondly, he could pay a Myanmar citizen to take the blame by declaring that he was the driver in the fatal accident. An international businessman should not make the mistake of trying to argue his case in a court of law when it comes to a fatal accident, even if he is in the right."  Mr Sim says many successful Myanmar businessmen have opened shell companies in Singapore "with little or no staff, used to keep funds overseas". The companies are used to keep business deals outside the control of Burma's central bank, enabling Singaporeans and others to transact with Burma in Singapore.  He may be referring to junta cronies such as Tay Za and the drug lord Lo Hsing Han. Lo is an ethnic Chinese, from Burma's traditionally Chinese-populated and opium-rich Kokang region in the country's east, bordering China. He controls a massive heroin empire, and one of Burma's biggest companies, Asia World, which the US Drug Enforcement Agency describes as a front for his drug-trafficking. Asia World controls toll roads, industrial parks and trading companies. Singapore is the Lo family's crucial window to the world, as it controls a number of companies there. His son Steven, who has been denied a visa to the US because of his links to the drug trade, married a Singaporean, Cecilia Ng, and the two reportedly control Singapore-based trading house Kokang Singapore.  A former assistant secretary of state for the US Bureau of International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs, Robert Gelbard, has said that half Singapore's investment in Burma has "been tied to the family of narco-trafficker Lo Hsing Han".  Eric Ellis is an Australian journalist and correspondent in South-East Asia.  ============================================ " ...'The videos and photographs of what is happening on the streets of Yangon and other cities in Myanmar have evoked the revulsion of the people throughout South-east Asia and all over the world,' (Singapore Prime Minister Lee) said, noting that the junta's actions had implications not just for the country, but also Asean and the region." Singapore daily, Straits Times, 1 Oct 2007  link: http://www.straitstimes.com/Free/Story/STIStory_162941.html 
And if you wish to argue about someone like Cindy Shehaan, I would say that this definition of life is an excellent way to know when there is sentient life left to protect. If you care to provide any other cases for consideration... In context, i asked, when is a "person dead" personhood and life/death are tied together throughout my discussion.  We do not grant special rights to removed human tumors, even though the cells may still be "alive" and "human".  Nor do my toenails posess any special rights after clipping.  However, you are correct to point it out, and it is important that only "Personhood" is the determining factor of protection under the law.   As an aside, we have decided that non-citizens do not count as persons under the law, and can therefore be deprived of due process / liberty in Gitmo.  In 1857, the Supreme Court decided, in the Dred Scot case, that "a man of African descent, whether a slave or not, was not and could not be a citizen of a state of the United States." In other words, black slaves were not "persons" protected by the laws of the United States. The constitution and the law have no basis for (nor should they) protect human life, but only personhood (which in my opinion should be far better defined...)
I have repeatedly said, while I do not agree w/ your interpretation of this legislation, that I do not think it should be passed!
I've heard that sulfur from the wallboard gypsum might work. Barium, no clue.
Hmm. When I took LSD, I discovered that "water is good." Guess that's why I'm not a nobel winning scientist!
He'll see it coming and castle five moves before Putin gets the chance to do anything.
somebody call Ron Paul. 1 state gov shut down, only 49 more to go. 
it depends how you define living standards. Sure maybe you won't have as big of a house or as new of a car but at the same time you are more likely to live longer and you most likely consume many more things then they did, especially in the entertainment sector. The fact that we have the internet in and of itself is a huge quality of life upgrade that our parents in their time couldn't have even dreamed about. We may pay more of the bigger things but we have the smaller things to make up the difference... imo
ugh, that sure is ugly get a proper shell like rc fn sighup {  (hangup), sigint (interrupt), sigalrm (alarm), and sigfpe (floating point trap). By default rc exits on receiving any signal, except when run interactively, in which case interrupts and quits normally cause rc to stop whatever it's doing and start reading a new command. The second form causes rc to handle a signal in the default manner. Rc recognizes an artificial note, sigexit, which occurs when rc is about to finish executing.  name=argument command
Just like his grandfather, who was a big believer in "race hygiene."
&gt; Oh, Lord. You're so BIG. So awfully  huge. We're all really impressed  down here, I can tell you!
Work as hard as your parents did?  You don't deserve anything.  Earn it.
Selecting for low risk definitely seems to be the trend at every level of US society.  Outsourcing is even part of this, but outsourcing goes far beyond just the "high vs. low risk" to a "no risk/no payout" solution.  Essentially optimizing away cost by sending profit and loss to zero. This doesn't mean folks won't seek high risk/payoff technology.  It does mean that the US will: - not control or own the patents  - not create/maintain a technology compounding infrastructure  - not have a sustaining national competitive advantage  - not keep its smartest, most productive citizens, native born or adopted   In short the US will become no more important than Brazil or Canada - not a nothing country but certainly no longer the trend-setting leading of the planet.  Fools laugh at this prediction but the same fools couldn't have imagined the Loony being more valuable than the US Dollar yet it is now and it will likely fall behind far more inferior currencies soon.
Not police proof exactly. 1. The sign at the entrance to the tunnel says no pedestrian traffic.   2. Will the solvent he's using eat through the coating on the metal?  Check that bridge out in a few months when the skull start rusting through!   
_Most will refuse to read any critical political articles..._ Of the fifteen or so friends I would call close, *one* has any clue what's going on. In my case, "most" is accurate. What about yours?
ugh, that sure is ugly get a proper shell like rc http://plan9.bell-labs.com/magic/man2html/1/rc  # #!/bin/rc fn sighup {   echo got sig hup  } fn sigint {   echo got sig int  } fn sigalrm {   echo got sig alrm  } fn sigpfe {  echo got sig fpe  }   fn sigexit {   echo this script is exiting now  } while() {   date &amp;&amp;  sleep 5}
I'm sure there is some relationship between the price of school and # of people graduating.  Throw in # of high-tech jobs being fullfilled by foreign workers and you get the idea.
I have said, quite to the contrary of your claims, that I do value the freedom of religion! Even though I choose not to participate in it, I do strongly believe in our rights to practice it freely. Show me where I have strayed from this point...  Please!
Good Find.!
I didn't offer a normative judgment one way or the other.  But there's no doubt that common standards and licensing facilitate international commerce, and I think that, more than propaganda, is what is driving EU expansion.   Anyhow, can't Vermont do more to oppose US policy by keeping its voting members of Congress than by seceding?  Vermont's Congressional delegation are presently leading the opposition to the Iraq war and the corruption of the executive branch.  There are few things those guys would like better than to get away with forty-nine states.
Just got in from work, in response to: "They didn't steal her idea. They managed to retrieve some X-Ray data that she hadn't been willing to pass on." It’s stated more or less that Wilkins (One of Franklins colleagues) in 1953 on a visit to speak with Watson and Crick, Wilkins showed them Franklin's "Photograph 51" that he had taken from her files without her knowledge or permission. (Source: Renaissance Women in Science - By: Louise Q. Van Der Does) Additionally out of: http://encarta.msn.com/encyclopedia_761564570/Franklin_Rosalind_Elsie.html "Key data about DNA's structure, discovered by Franklin, were given to Watson and Crick without her knowledge. These data, together with their own findings, allowed Watson and Crick to solve the enigma of DNA's structure." The without her knowledge part seems like theft to me (Crick published his "findings" 1 month later), and it would seem they not only backstabbed Franklin, but her colleague Wilkins that gave the data to Crick as well (karma in my opinion). Think about the times, she was competing for government funding, as a woman, with the sexism of the 40's &amp; 50's, OF COURSE she wouldn’t want to share that data with rival scientists that’s just common sense. Edit - As for the first post, it wasnt a government insider, it was one of her own collegues. It should be noted Franklin resented Wilkins because she couldnt get the canidate she wanted (Linus Pauling) to be her assistant; This was due to the US gov. denying him entry on the basis that he was a suspected communist.
&gt; That in times past, and unfortunately in times to come, people will decide that the mentally retarded aren't really people. Yes abortion is indeed used to destroy fetuses likely to have serious mental or physical afflictions. But that's a separate topic and you cannot ban a procedure completely because it is possible to apply to circumstances that are not allowed... you ban it in those circumstances. This said I don't think that's necessarily a bad thing even though it of course raises ethical concerns. But thing to keep in mind is the to fetus is not considered to be human not because it is "retarded", but because it is not yet viable. Therefore it can be argued that the reasons for having an abortion should not be regulated and allow this "artificial selection". I'm not sure how I stand on this... certainly under medical recommendations for serious health concerns it should be acceptable at least. But would doctors have recommended that Steven Hawking be aborted for example? It certainly a very emotional issue and I think one on which we do not have enough information to make good judgements on, at least for now. But banning abortion altogether to avoid the issue strikes me as putting our head in sand as the law will not be respected and it kills or shifts the public debate so people will act without having considered the ethical issues as much. &gt; I don't advocate changing any laws... that's a fool's strategy. That's strange. Laws get changed all the time, the context of this thread is Ron Paul wanting to pass a Law to revoke overrule Roe vs. Wade and prevent the SCOTUS from interpreting the law on this issue which I think is very wrong and unconstitutional. &gt; Leave it the way it is now, focus on the things that matter. Reducing poverty, eliminating rape, making sure everyone has anonymous and free access to contraceptives. Anyone who thinks there is any other way really just wants to punish women who already have it bad. Now you are talking! Could not agree more. Except I would have said eliminating poverty and reducing rape. I think only evolution can eliminate rape over time if it is repressed and makes you less like to be able to reproduce. But that takes ages... and this is one of the reason abortion is important, we can't realistically eliminate rape completely even in the long term. Poverty on the other hand is social and can be eliminated. Doing so would reduce the rate of births of also the rate of infant mortality, child suffering and abuse as well as surpopulation. Ultimately that is why I support abortion: I do not want there to be unwanted children, especially not in Ron Paul's "libertarian" "utopia". No one should be able to force a woman to have a child, the stakes are just too high. We are talking about a potential human life who will be a dependant for at least a decade.
You will do fine in the long run (20-30 years, no?)
it's rock OUT with your cock out. Durr.
Ya, I didn't realize I was plural. (And it's Myanmar until the junta retires) *You ferners are appalling* 
/sigh let the cops supportors start the "he deserved it" mantra... Nobody should be beaten and tased for not following orders unless they understand the orders.  The problem people are not trained or aware of the situation and are in shock at the bark of commands.  We dont smack children for this exact reason, normal people take a few seconds to understand whats going on, this isnt trained soldiers, these are citizens.    
Question: Do submarines fly their flags while underwater? Alternately, do the flags on submarines suddenly 'sproing' up as soon as they surface?  If not, then the story and the picture do not 'jibe'.
Not a real advertisement. You guys need to learn something about psychiatry. And public service advertising. edit: see below - real.  also see below - I'm surprised there's been no protests about this inaccurate, ineffective, and insulting ad.
I am interpreting it the same way Ron Paul is.  Like I say, it's a dealbreaker for me but not you. You're still arguing in favor of Ron Paul, despite HR 300. I cannot support Ron Paul because of HR 300.  There is no circumstance under which I can support a candidate who wants to take away the right of citizens to seek relief in federal court if their state curtails their constitutional rights.   
&gt; it gives you false impression of knowing things Please enjoy [another dubious and disturbing bill from Ron Paul](http://thomas.loc.gov/cgi-bin/bdquery/z?d110:h.r.01094:), which would: &gt; `Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 1253, 1254, and 1257, the Supreme Court shall not  have jurisdiction to review, by appeal, writ of certiorari, or otherwise, any case arising out of  any statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, practice, or any part thereof, or arising out of any  act interpreting, applying, enforcing, or effecting any statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, or  practice, on the grounds that such statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, practice, act, or part  thereof-- &gt; `(1) protects the rights of human persons between conception and birth; or &gt; `(2) prohibits, limits, or regulates-- &gt; `(A) the performance of abortions; or &gt; `(B) the provision of public expense of funds, facilities, personnel, or other assistance  for the performance of abortions.'. IANAL, but I'm an American with some respect for the Supreme Court, and I don't regard these jurisdictional limitations to be at all defensible.  I'd still like to see a real debate on the issue, and I'd like to hear Ron Paul's defense of the attempted practice.
As if a University Job is all that better than working fast food?
Eugenics on the cheap in the era of privatized government.
I'm with you. I would be humiliated if a teacher was this condescending to me, probably report it, and get him disciplined. Teachers should be more socially-conscious than this. Handing out the F is enough, and it's disrespectful to display this awkward attempt at a joke at the failing student's expense.
A big "fuck you" to  these people.
http://www.mathpages.com/rr/s9-06/9-06.htm Physicists have a long history of being complete fuckwits with respect to Bell's inequalities. Furthermore, the fact that Vitalism was the mainstream interpretation of quantum mechanics for most of the 20th century is sufficient to condemn the entire community of physicists as a bunch of mindless retarded fuckwits. And as if that weren't enough, they don't even understand what a physical theory is. Not that I expect you'll take my word over their protestations that they do indeed. Even after pointing out they're retarded fuckwits who believe in Vitalism. O how the gods you worship have feet of clay. Actually feet of mud stinking of manure and urine.
But having your car "plowed into" by a sober guy is ok?
States cannot curtail constitutional guaranteed rights.  This is the fundamental flaw in your argument.
&gt; The constitution and the law have no basis for (nor should they) protect human life, but only personhood (which in my opinion should be far better defined...) Agreed, should be defined better. I hate feeling like I'm one of those PETA loons for suggesting that birth, or even the first trimester are insufficient... though, conception isn't where I put it either, implantation is. Plan B isn't morally wrong. When I say things like this though, people act like I'm suggesting that rats and insects are people too. Worst, if we were to solve the true, underlying problems that cause the whole abortion mess, this would be moot. My definition could be correct or incorrect philosophically, but it'd be of no consequence socially. There is a danger in trying to decide these things based on logic and semantics alone... in depriving someone of their own humanity through definition, we just might lose our own.
Haha, fast food certainly *pays* better!
gorgeous photo but its a entire galaxy rather than a single stellar nursery (such as a nebula..)
North Carolina is one step ahead of them -- they never joined the union.
The photo in the article is from October, 2005.   http://www.huembwas.org/News2/56Emb2005.htm 
I'm sorry, you're right.  The 15 year old girl should be protected from her 17 year old boyfriend.  The two year age difference clearly rules out consent in this case.
My point is that it's not a deal breaker for you like it is for me. Therefore it's of less value to you than it is to me. You may value it some, but not enough to be an over-riding concern the way it is for me.  It doesn't make you a bad person, cantsay. You're allowed to think that Paul's positions on doing away with income tax or being able to smoke grass or ending the war in Iraq are more important than his stance on limiting citizens redress of grievances related to freedom of religion. That's OK. I'm not condemning your position. I just can't in good conscience share it.
True. But I can only link to one..thought video was more important to see. I might find the item and submit that too. Here's a link to the $1,000,000 turndown- http://www.spinner.com/2007/07/15/women-who-rock-right-now-no-9/
And how do you enforce that, if you can't sue them in federal court?
Well, one of the possible effects of climate change would be the Gulf Stream shutting down, which would make Europe a lot colder. Here in Scotland, we're on the same latitude as Labrador, so this kind of stuff could well become useful. In fact, it's been useful within living memory - I have a guide to winter walking in Scotland from 30 years ago, which discusses snow cave building. I don't think I've ever seen enough snow for it to be viable.
thanks for the link.  linking direct to the 25 meg image is a bit silly (no context...)
Proving that it is is just as hard as proving it itself.
Red lether jacket, and white cross, she looks like a transplant Hitler.
The two counter-examples you have used are faulty. Graphics Cards pre-dated integrated graphics in PCs, and their development was largely driven by gaming, not professional graphics work. The present-day uses of CD burners (creating audio discs, backing up data) were envisioned from the beginning, and the reasoning behind the development of consumer burners.
Dude do you even read reddit? A huge proportion of articles are about USA police abuse/police state, the constitution destroying neocon administration, USA's huge, growing, unprecedented prison population, the worthless war on drugs, political scandals, the housing collapse and likely baleout for the banks, US corporatism(heaving lean towards MPAA/RIAA members though), healthcare, the widening gap between rich and poor. Other sources of news are the same. Most "political activists" in this country are talking about  so called "bread and butter" **You** aren't fucking listening.
And your skills are on display how? Where's the documentation?
If you have a bit more time to prepare, here's how the [British Antarctic Survey go camping](http://www.randominformation.co.uk/writings/?m=200604).
THE RADIOACTIVITY PERSISTS FOR OVER 4,500,000,000 YEARS KILLING MILLIONS OF EVERY AGE FOR CENTURIES TO COME .THIS IS A CRIME AGAINST HUMANITY WHICH MAY RANK WITH THE WORST ATROCITIES OF ALL TIME .
Ron Paul does not resonate with most people on the left. He is far more socially conservative than any liberal.  I do like his opinions on personal freedom, but Kucinich has similar opinions AND is liberal. I don't get why he doesn't have the same cult that Ron Paul does.
Okay, so you can vouch for the rumors flying around? Great. Why weren't they charged with mutilation in the court documents?
Switzerland is north Europe?  WTF would the Swiss do with a sub?  Or do you mean Sweden?
Photoshop tutorial on basic use of 'levels' for correcting exposure on your images and also how to use levels for color correction
Okay, horrible things do happen. That's your proof? Thanks, you convinced me.
Yeah, but it's the bluebloods, many who proudly boast of their descendence from the Puritans, who heavily influence the Ivy League universities, control huge tracts of land, industries, media, Wall Street, and advise the presidents and Congress on the "proper" moves to make.
WTF?  He didn't say the guy was *a* failure.  He just said that he'd failed at something, and was looking to blame a teacher for that failure. Besides, perhaps your outlook is a little sunny.  It's also possible that the guy who failed this calculus test isn't actually good at *anything* else. :)
...and giving the nation its greatest television pundit of all time: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bill_O%27Reilly_%28commentator%29
Poor, peaceful and happy.
As a side note to "Life", there are more than 3 dozen definitions of "life".  Some people think that the biological definition of life is the same as the definition of sentient life (or personhood) as in "a living being".  Sentient life is not the same as biological life.  A removed tumor may be human, and alive, but it is not "a living being" deserving of being called a "person" to be protected under the law.
Didn't Mitt Romney say he wanted to double Guantánamo? Hmmmmm, scary...
http://explosm.net/comics/95/
Didn't the secular Tamil Tigers invent suicide bombing?
Ironic seeing the advertisements on the right: "Learn Now Pay Later"  "Check Sent to you in About a Week"  "Make No Payments Until Graduation" They have the same slogans as payday loans..   
it says INSTITUTO at the top
Cool way to save money and get the HDMI quality along with Digital Optical sound.
Ceiling Cat
The article author is somewhat misinformed.  Northern European sculptors of the late medieval and Renaissance periods often painted their limestone, limewood, and other sculptures so that they would look lifelike.  Some of the Southern European Renaissance sculptures were also polychromed. This differs a little from the geometric patterns on some ancient Mediterranean sculptures, though some of those were also painted with life-like clothing.  Otherwise the article is relatively accurate.
I thought the pimple on Rush's ass renders him  exempt from this.
Off Hawaii several years ago, they hit a tour boat full of Japanese students.
"there are more important things we need to fix first, people" Barely. The reason why we are in the mess we are today is because the corrupt judicial branch does not respect the constitution when it is supposed to be checking Bush and his cronies. A lack of respect for the separation of religion and state are a perfect example of this.
especially after a good-natured rubbing
Denmark, Netherlands, Norway, Sweden: all have submarines: http://www.hazegray.org/worldnav/ Hungary and Switzerland do not have subs.....
If this is real, then that teacher is a moron.  The only kid who MIGHT deserve that kind of treatment would be one who left the page blank.  This kid at least TRIED to do it, even if he got it wrong.  I see too many teachers trying  to dole out punishment when they should be helping instead.
Why don't we just pass a single resolution condemning those that attacked Kerry, Cleland, Petraeus, the troops, McCain (in 2000 primary against Bush), etc. and get on with the real issues of impeachable offenses by the White House and the lies that led us into this war AND possibly a new one?
In a competitive labor market, it's hard to justify such a view. Also, business isn't a zero sum game. Take the luxury goods industry as an example. As the general wealth of the country has increased, so has demand for things like large TVs, designer clothing, and fine chocolates. Some of these are barely considered luxury goods anymore because they're so common. As the companies that produce these goods prosper, they expand, hire more workers, and can afford to pay their executives more. Note that nowhere in there did I say "the Board gets together and passes a motion to cut cashier wages and use the proceeds to give Jim the CEO a big raise".   
God made her that way.
As long as people just fail to use ANY apostrophes you can usually just chalk it up to laziness.  It is way more irksome to see them misplaced.
"It's all spooky and you have no hope of understanding" is actually a classical explanation. In fact, everything which is bandied about as a "quantum" concept tends to be a reprise of deprecated classical ideas in the service of rejecting quantum reality. This is especially noticeable in the crowd of "the wavefunction isn't real" fucking lunatics and the Vitalistic motherfuckers who spawned them. The reality of science is that greater than 90% of scientists are mindless plodders incapable of actually understanding their own subject field. What most scientists do isn't science and they are incapable of actually doing science. But it approximates science in some crude sense. So don't fucking talk to me about indulging in faith based activity because you don't fucking know what you're fucking talking about. In fact, YOU are incapable of science since if you were you wouldn't be making up this anti-empirical crap about how scientists don't engage in faith-based reasoning. You're a hypocrite who's neatly disproved himself.
Count your blessings: a friend of mine wasn't so lucky. Her memorial service was on Thursday.
Yes, I do think his pros far outweigh his cons for some of the very reasons you just mentioned. And for the fact that through his adherence to the constitution that bad (unpopular) legislation will not be passed. You're finally getting it!  Congratulations! Funny how you just dismiss the war so quickly...  The current government's undeclared war on an abstract concept (The War on TERROR!) is probably the single greatest issue facing this generation... But hey, blow it off, why the hell not?
that's hot
Because it's a common phishing technique. You encourage people to visit www.wellsfargo.com@www3764283764872649823468346873648736483.badguys.com
Yeah: the problem is that the meds have some pretty nasty side-effects, and persuading patients to keep using them is difficult.
gimme a break!  it's hard to remember EVERYTHING that happened in the past.
Skeery.
&gt; That's strange. Laws get changed all the time, the context of this thread is Ron Paul wanting to pass a Law to revoke overrule Roe vs. Wade and prevent the SCOTUS from interpreting the law on this issue which I think is very wrong and unconstitutional. Well, he's wrong on this issue. But again, as I've said elsewhere... making it a state issue means that outlawing it has to happen in all 15 or 20 nearby states before it becomes unavailable. Whether Ron Paul hasn't thought that part through, or considers it a just solution, I can't be sure, but it hurts less than some would claim. &gt; I think only evolution can eliminate rape over time if it is repressed and makes you less like to be able to reproduce. But that takes ages... and this is one of the reason abortion is important, we can't realistically eliminate rape completely even in the long term. Eliminate was too strong a word. I believe I read the other day that there are 300,000 rapes each year, and that a 12th of them end up pregnant, 25,000 of them. If half undergo abortions, that's 12,000 that could be prevented each year with no controversey whatsoever.  Even if you could only reduce incidence of rape by half, that's still alot. I'm not sure if improvement enforcement after the fact is the best approach, or if some sort of social program to make it easier to report rape, a combination of both, or something else entirely is in order. But it's a solvable problem. &gt; Ultimately that is why I support abortion: I do not want there to be unwanted children I agree with that... but there's got to be a better way than waiting until you're already 3 months into the process. &gt; No one should be able to force a woman to have a child, the stakes are just too high. And yet, considering that one is a direct consequence of something months in the past, we're either talking rape or someone being irresponsible. Again though, it makes no sense to outlaw abortion, to punish that woman and a doctor after the fact. Few are as callous or unemotional as the anecdotes like to claim. But if it's a situation with no good choices, let's do something about it before it gets that far.   
&gt;rockets are not propelled by generating pressure behind the rocket, but by throwing mass as fast as possible. Throwing **fluid** mass through a nozzle = pressure difference. P=F/s=m*a/s  The mass "m" is accelerated through the surface "s". At the narrow point of the nozzle, "s" is small =&gt; the speed is greater =&gt; the pressure is lower than in the back where the surface is larger =&gt; the speed is lower =&gt; the pressure is high. No pressure difference = no rocket engine. I haven't the slightest idea how the other stuff works (ion engine, mass drivers) but that's not a rocket engine if there is no pressure difference. If that's no rocket engine, why do they call "rocket" the whole thing ?
Because rulings violating the constitution cannot be enacted! (They are I-L-L-E-G-A-L)
I've got a degree in Mechanical Engineering and I work for NASA.  I needn't read up on Bernoulli. The plane flies. You've missed the most obvious reason why. You deserve a new screen name. Keep at it, you'll have your eureka! moment eventually.
The reason: Profits as % of GDP are at the highest share since 1960. Wages are at a bottom and keep falling: http://www.nytimes.com/imagepages/2006/08/28/business/28wages_chart.html
"You're finally getting it! Congratulations!" Actually, I've been saying this all along. That you're willing to accept HR 300, to get other things you want. ****** "Funny how you just dismiss the war so quickly... The current government's undeclared war on an abstract concept (The War on TERROR!) is probably the single greatest issue facing this generation... But hey, blow it off, why the hell not?" Because the First Amendment is the one that makes all the others possible. Without the First Amendment, how much chance would there be of serious opposition to the war in Iraq? I want to end not only this wrongly-conceived war AND retain the means to end (or prevent) any future ones that arise. Let the theocrats start chipping away at the First Amendment and you lose that. That's why for me, the Bill of Rights trumps all. Because I care about what happens 100 years down the road, not just today.
Michigan government = M$ Windows?
A good response, obviously the problem of the definition of life and death has been long faced by society, and many mistakes have already been made (like the rope and bell run to the underground casket so if the "dead person" suddenly wakes, they can signal for help).  In ancient times, a dead person was kept for a minimum of 3 days in the home, mostly just in case they should suddenly revive, so obviously it makes some sense to err on the side of caution when dealing with this issue. What is it about implantation that you feel warrants the now embryo to be classified as a person deserving of protection under the law?
In america its better to attack than love.
Maybe I overreacted a little too much to the comment, but I think there is way too big of a focus in today's society on traditional education. Not everyone fits into the cookie-cutter model of reading, writing and arithmetic.  Also, this probably shows I have some unresolved issues stemming from my evil calculus teacher. While he didn't suggest working at Big M's, he did throw chalk at us when we didn't know the answers... :P
Ah. It is what it is. Thank you for digging that up. I hate to see this being used as a defence by some in the religious right as "no, we didn't support him, heck we didn't even vote for the bastard", "look here to this article". The reason why i bring this up is because of what Gore Vidal refers to as American Amnesia, we forget the ills of the GOP time and time again.
No, his original post stated: "And obligatory: Americans are dumbasses. EDIT AFTER INSTANT DOWNVOTE: Americans are FUCKING IGNORANT dumbasses." My response was to his being the ass (and wrong, but mostly just him being an ass).
Don't blame me... I voted for... Devos?
I'll try to explain. You must not follow constitutional issues very well. A state passes a law that's unconstitutional. This happens frequently. Right now there are 6 states with laws that atheists can't hold public office and 1 state with a law that a minister can't serve on a state Constitutional Convention. All these laws are on the books, but the states don't enforce them, because the Supreme Court said the laws are unconstitutional. Take the Supreme Court out of the loop, and the laws are enforceable again. There is nothing to stop a state from enacting and enforcing an unconstitutional law--nothing except the citizens' right to federal court. The right that HR 300 would take away.
It's as illegal as McCarthyism was.
This is grandstanding and nothing more. Columbia's research facilities are too important to the government to abandon (including it's NASA affiliated labs). Not to mention that Columbia, like the rest of the ivies, has an enormous endowment. This bill is going nowhere fast.  If nothing else, New York's representatives will kill it.
Not all Iranian women wear Burqas. People who wear burqas wear burqas.
Get your crappy spam off reddit.
the kid can't derive, plus he's messy. engineering paper.
I'm not trying to be funny, or make light. Imagine it though. You can take meds, have the farts and upset stomach all day every day, a headache every night at bedtime, and itchy skin all time. You can skip the meds, feel great, and live an exciting life (seemingly) where you once again understand all things through a crystal clear lens, and have no trouble keeping one step ahead of the Mossad since your intuition is back. I see what you mean.
McLovin?
New York has many high-ranking congresscritters. This bill doesn't stand a chance. 
Are you sure ? Switzerland has some mountain subs and Hungary has them hidden on lake Balaton.
It is calculus, and if you look carefully there is a 'TA' field on the top right. This is very likely a college level class (freshman integral calculus), and things like this will fly in a private school. And looking more carefully, it is 'Math 1142' Fall 2004, exam 3. Student is James Cooper, TA is J... Lee. UIUC, UMN, and other schools (just from a google search) have such a class.
Well, I prefer the term "sapient" to "sentient", for the purposes of those arguments. I have no doubts that cats are sentient in the strict definition of the word (though not the loose science fiction one), but neither would I grant them legal personhood. *Sapient* captures more of what's important to personhood. Self-awareness, motivated intelligence, and the ability to learn in a free form environment. But does this define personhood? Almost all who are sapient are persons, but some human individuals were born with severe deficiencies. Is it not murder to kill them in cold blood? (Also, there are those who might argue that there are hypothetical examples of sapients who should not have personhood, a self-aware AI for instance.) Also, depending on perspective, I'm considered the same person I was yesterday, that I was 5 years ago. It's a continuous thing. Was the fetus to become me not the same person, and really what switched on to change that? It's not necessary to be sapient the entire stretch, I think, just that you will be at some point in the middle. Considering that, the tumor is safely not a person... at no point before, and at no point in the future, could it become sapient. Feel free to substitute "sentient" anywhere I've used "sapient" if you prefer, I still stand by it all.
Singapore is hypocitical: it goes to bed with one of the biggest drug lords in the world (Burmese drug lord Lo) while openly hangs the small timers (drug runners - eg Aussie Nguyen). What hypocricy!
Im just making a distinction between atmospheric content at sea level, and the upper layer of the atmoshphere, where the UV energy gets reflected back. Obviously the reflective layer is not the issue at sea level. If the layer in contention is in the upper stratosphere, i dont know the name or the conventions to talk about the atmosphere i just know its much much higher than sea level if we are talking about where the reflective layer is happening.
I sincerely hope your spelling of moron as moran was intentional.
There's no basis for that you idiot Repug. Maybe if your glorious president would not have aloud the guy in the country we wouldn't be having this dicussion.
I HAVE REPEATEDLY SAID I SUPPORT THE BILL OF RIGHTS.... I SUPPORT IT AT ALL COSTS! Ron Paul supports the constitution, and therefore the Bill of Rights! All the way from amendment 1 to amendment 10! They are both relevant here! I'm not willing to accept HR300!  I'm willing to accept that it will be DEFEATED!
Hmm. Sports... Didn't even know that existed on Reddit
A Wikipedia article with no source link is not "evidence", and [the supposed announcement](http://www.microsoft.com/presspass/press/2004/Aug04/08-27Target2006PR.mspx) does not say what Wikipedia says it does. And even Wikipedia does not say that it "is really Windows Server 2003 under", it says that development was *based on* Windows Server 2003. If it's a well known fact, you should have no problem finding a credible source. ;)
increasing the caliber lowers the accuracy.
Good, we don't need any stinking Jesus freak fundies corupting the election process anyway.
From Snopes: (This is the version of the crime initially presented in press accounts.  Subsequent reports have contradicted some of the details, chiefly that neither Newsom nor Christian was mutilated as described, that Christian was killed within a day of the kidnapping rather than being held captive for four days, and that cleaning solution was poured into Christian's mouth post-mortem to eliminate DNA evidence rather than as a form of torture.)
I think it goes further than that.  Catholicism, like many other religions, is a follow-the-leader religion.  The massive structure of the Church, reflected in its architectural wonders, art, history, and large and diverse group of followers provide a feeling of security for one's belief. Overall, the Evangelicals are highly individualistic.  They believe that the Bible is God's (only) word, and that God speaks directly to them through the Bible.  If their personal interpretation of the Bible disagrees with whatever religious "leader" is in favor with the political and economic authorites, they feel perfectly free to go off and believe whatever they believe, and choose whatever leader echoes their beliefs.  There is no Vatican or Mecca or other geographic power center to which they look, and there are almost uncountable subgroups of the Protestant/Evangelical Christians. Hence the rise of televangelism, which uses the same marketing techniques to attract followers that your favorite brand of beer, toothpaste, automobile, or whatever product uses to attract you.  The Bible-believers are seduced into believing that what their Bible-thumping leader wants them to think is what they themselves find in the Bible. Of course, the Bible-thumping leaders, like the majority of other religious leaders, seek raw power and they use their army of followers to that end.  But they have to deal with the fact that if their followers find a more seductive, more charismatic leader who markets himself as a better interlocutor of God's biblical messages, they'll switch in a Texan minute.
Only because the US is becoming a parody of itself..
Not very well written.  The author wants to look down on the side-show-freak talk shows, but ends up doing the same thing.  Selling the sex.
And why do you think I started this fucking link if I did not care what happens in the future?! It's the whole point!  Jesus, how obtuse can one person be? Or are you even one person? Seems like you might be a room full of rival campaign interns, taking turns spouting propagandist garbage!
Silly buggers
While he did do someting wrong, he was intoxicated so his judgement was broken.  The officer should have just pushed him into the car instead of making it a big deal.  No tasing or beating need happen.  I wonder what the police report says.  Sad.
Well since you do not understand the language , Then you hvae no right to judge
Section 4 of the bill clearly states that the Supreme Court CANNOT be taken 'out of the loop'! I do not support the bill, just proving your point wrong! You should really just start cutting and pasting your previous responses because they are mind numbingly redundant! 
Kinda thing. I think the side-effects are more psychological and emotional (as in, you don't have any emotions any more, and you can't think properly). I'm no expert, though.
Finally.
Don't tell me you wouldn't waste O'Reilly right now if you were holding the pardon in your hand.
I know you. You're the man who blew us in Greece.
I wondered what that was all about. Thanks!
Can I give you a word of advice? If Ron Paul does become a front-runner, the rights restrictions in the We the People act are going to get a huge amount of attention.  You're going to need better arguments than claiming HR 300 isn't relevent because it won't pass or that Ron Paul is such a wonderful guy, he wouldn't do the things he did. This is the minors, kiddo. If you want to have any hope in the Big Leagues, you really need to sharpen your game.
No, your math teacher doesn't attach McDonald's applications to failed tests. Despite how little he is paid to do what he does, he still likely has every intent to retain his job for another year, and understands that little stunts like this endanger his career. Besides, I never had a high school math teacher who was truly under the delusion that calculus was useful anywhere but a few select fields. Sure, they would preach that in class, but ask them afterwards if they really believed it and none of them did. They did, however, believe that calculus had the uncanny ability of telling you whether you were truly destined for a math-related career. After all, most people thought Calculus sucked (myself included), but the ones who didn't were obviously meant to stay in that type of field. Oh, and what adult actually thinks classroom performance is a perfect indicator of career success in the future? The only ones I can think of are the ones who conceived "No Child Left Behind"...beyond that, though, most adults realize that in society today, an outgoing C-student can be President and the Honor Roll kid with no people skills will spend the rest of his life in his parent's basement. Anyway, most everyone here knew all of this already. We still have to clear the air every time this image comes up on a social news site or as "Fw: fw: fw: re: fw: Omg!!" in our inboxes...because it never goes away.
Best solution to the problem, really.
Because Kucinich doesn't want to abolish the IRS and revoke an unconstitutional income tax.
&gt; Gulf Stream shutting down, which would make Europe a lot colder. [The Gulf Stream probably has only a minor effect on Europe's climate](http://www.americanscientist.org/template/AssetDetail/assetid/51963?fulltext=true&amp;print=yes)
&gt; What is it about implantation that you feel warrants the now embryo to be classified as a person deserving of protection under the law? Well, hypocritical practicality has to be some part of it. It allows for emergency birth control that is in no way emotionally congruent with a surgical abortion. But also, consider that many fertilized eggs ever fail to implant. It's hard to say what the actual percentage is... but undoubtedly some large fraction do. Yet, when women toss their used tampons, they don't start crying that they've just had a miscarriage.  Anyway, without that event, the zygote has no hope of developing into anything. For it to be what others call a "potential person", it either has to do that, or it can't become one. That this event might not take place, naturally and so *uneventfully* seems to make it a good point. Preventing it from implanting also seems like no moral crime. It is a seperate organism, keeping it so seems not wrong. Not the best arguments in the world, but it's all that I have.
&gt;After a few cocktails, that would confuse the heck out of me. Not me. I can't find the elevator after a few cocktails.
For those who don't want to do the dictionary lookup Sentient - having sensation and consciousness  Sapient - having wisdom and sound judgment As to the question "Was the fetus to become me not the same person?" I would respond "Is the corpse that is to become you not the same person?" And what switched to change that? We do not consider the corpse a person under the law either... This is why the present state is of greater concern under the law than the continuum. And perhaps that switch is the same at both ends of the continuum of life. (From here i would say, that obviously we have mis-identified that switch numerous times in the past... breathing was clearly wrong, yet that starts at birth and supposedly stopped at "death") but it is still worth pursuing because understanding when life starts is equally instrumental in understanding when it ends. I believe implantation was previously also used as a definining moment for death, since once you are implanted in the ground, your life was over, and your family said their farewells.  This too was not without it's problems as mentioned above.
Tighten them?
And you should be.  There are other videos of him using this same tactic when asked tough questions about difficult issues.  This is not leadership.  It is a glimpse into the mind of a man who is terrified.
geahhhhh
Oh search me, please...
Nope. Section 4 says that Supreme Court can rule on federal laws and policies. Section 3 says it can't rule on certain state laws and policies and section 7 says all previous rulings on those state issues are invalid. "The Supreme Court of the United States and each Federal court-- (1) shall not adjudicate-- (A) any claim involving the laws, regulations, or policies of any State or unit of local government relating to the free exercise or establishment of religion;" The only way that Section 4 could bring the Supreme Court back in the loop is if all laws are federal laws. Do you really think all laws are federal?
Amazing. Didn't Jurassic Park say the same thing, years ago?
Very funnt. Excellent
I think I learned more in that 5 minutes than all of my high school history combined.
"keep in mind the problem XML was created to solve: not having a standard way to encode tree data structures into a text format so that other programs - written by other people and run on other computer systems - can read them back in again." I don't know if that is actually why it was created but XML was created for something.  The reason why XML "sucks" is because people try to use it for everything.  If we were forced to write throw away shell scripts in Assembler lots of people would be shouting Assember sucks! The thing that really sucks is hype.  Anything that is hyped should be approached with extreme trepidation.  Anything hyped as an "Enterprise Solution" should be fled from as a plague.
Romney - [$44 million](http://www.opensecrets.org/pres08/summary.asp?id=N00000286&amp;cycle=2008) Guiliani - [$35 million](http://www.opensecrets.org/pres08/summary.asp?id=N00009908&amp;cycle=2008) McCain - [$21 million](http://www.opensecrets.org/pres08/summary.asp?id=N00006424&amp;cycle=2008) All three of those candidates are doing better than Paul in the [polls](http://www.pollingreport.com/wh08rep.htm).
wow 15 people think this should be on reddit... I'm amazed.
Tighten what?
still wouldn't work - we have stalls in our bathrooms. na na na na na! :P also, get over yourselves. women are judged every day of their lives by how they look. so what if a few men in the netherlands are too?
i've seen better ones
Yet more proof that being a redneck has nothing to do with an accent or regional geography.
Dear NASA. It's time to quit playing. Could you turn the damn thing towards the Earth and show us some boobs for a change ?
No, I do not. But, I think that all freedoms guaranteed in the constitution are, in fact, FEDERAL LAWS!
&gt; As to the question "Was the fetus to become me not the same person?" I would respond "Is the corpse that is to become you not the same person?" At some point, far in the future, it would become something not me. Decomposed, it's constituent atoms and molecules belonging to a myriad of structures all over the place... But at some point before that happens, but after my undeniable death, I'd be there, a corpse. You can't kill me twice, obviously. But what if you did something to my corpse that would kill me were I still alive? Say, pump a few bullets through my skull. Wouldn't that be some sort of moral crime? Lesser than all but the least of homicides (the sort that we don't punish as murder or even deliberate) to be sure. But most would think it still a crime. Perhaps, a abortion prior to the fetus having a brain is comparably wrong? It feels as if this might be the case.
physics schmisics. Let's rephrase the question thusly: what weighs more, a pound of feathers or a pound of bricks? Exactly, it's a trick question. If the plane is moving forward at 120 mph (or whatever takeoff speed is), then the runway's speed is completely irrelevant. And yes, it's built into the question that the plane can move. don't assume that the net of the plane's interaction with the runway is zero.
Alberto Gonzales' law school classmates roundly denouncing him was one more nail in Gonzo's well-deserved political coffin. Let's hope this has the same effect.
more please!! pleeeeeeeaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaasseeeeeeeeeeeee!!!!
Suppose you want to know how long it will take to double your money at 10% interest. 72 divided by 10 is 7.2. Therefore it will take 7.2 years to double your money if you are earning 10%.
Do YOU understand arabic? The English version of Al Jazeera is not that bad.
the european working class is fighting back against the elite strategy of flooding the labor market with immigrants that also divides the populace politically, thus enabling the rich and powerful to control the govt even more.   
Don't play bungee jumping here and calculate building height by per level height x # levels--can easily overcount! 
Here, in one article, is the reason I no longer live in Chicago--I feared the gangs, I feared the police.  What else can a mild-mannered geek do but move to somewhere sane?
No, let's promote random acts of cleanliness!
Bernoulli's principle is actually not an accurate explanation for lift generated by airfoils - especially not in the way most commonly understood by the public: http://www.grc.nasa.gov/WWW/K-12/airplane/wrong1.html The correct explanation is more complicated, and involves the effect of the airfoil diverting or turning air flow downwards: http://www.grc.nasa.gov/WWW/K-12/airplane/right2.html Here is some more reading on the subject: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lift_%28force%29  http://www.allstar.fiu.edu/AERO/airflylvl3.htm
Has business gone up since the move?
Watson and Crick do exactly what they should do, they acknowledge her in their paper for her assistance: "We have also been stimulated by a knowledge of the general nature of the unpublished experimental results and ideas of Dr. M. H. F. Wilkins, Dr. R. E. Franklin and their co-workers at King's College, London" How on earth is that not being "forthcoming" with the source of the source of the data?  They flat-out say it in their original paper. Why should her name be on the paper?  It wasn't her research.  It was based in part on some of her research, but it was not her conclusion or discovery. You can't just put any name on a paper as an author.  They have to actively assist the published research and agree with the paper's findings.  As far as I know, she was completely unaware of Watson and Crick's findings at the time they published the paper. It would be not just unnecessary, but inappropriate to list her as an author.
I agree with you on almost every point. I just disagree that people are fairly looking at the situations where tasers are used.  Probably in every single case where a taser has been used, I have seen people on reddit talking about how it was not supposed to have occurred, that the people were just innocent victims. Sure, the police are idiots and they need restraint and training to better use tasers, but the cases brought up on reddit have typically required some use of force.  Like the case of the U of Florida student. Even with eyewitness accounts being posted to the contrary, they still cling to the notion that the guy wasn't acting a fool and didn't deserve to get tasered. So I agree with you that everyone should be more cautious withthe weapons they use, whether knife or taser, but people have to understand whats coming to them if they act like fools.
&gt; "They didn't steal her idea. They managed to retrieve some X-Ray data that she hadn't been willing to pass on." "They didn't steal your car. They managed to retrieve some keys that you hadn't been willing to pass on."
So what he's saying is, shut the University down, disenfranchise the students who worked hard to get degrees, paint them with the prejudice brush infront of the whole nation and it's media.  This will increase unemployment, crime, debt and decrease investment and consequently any potential for good to come out of it all. The knock on effects are massive and will effect millions of people over the next 20 years or so. And yet people seem to support his idealogy. Retarded, no?
Why is moriquendo being voted down? Bush lost consciousness choking on a pretzel. Hence, moriquendo is saying he would like to have a pretzel with Bush. Get it now?
Right. But if HR 300 passes, you can't challenge state laws that limit those freedoms in federal court. Remember all those state laws forbidding atheists from holding public office? Supreme Court can't rule on them, only state courts. Seriously, if you don't believe me, email the Paul campaign and ask them.
&gt; I think There's your problem :)
Yes it is.  It was presented to her in October, 2005 according to this:  "On the occasion of the National Day, Ambassador Simonyi presented the Officer's Cross Order of Merit of the Republic of Hungary upon Ms. Eva Pusta and Mike Haltzel, and the Commander's Cross Order of Merit to Debra Cagan."  Source: http://www.huembwas.org/News2/56Emb2005.htm This seems to be the source of the pic used in the Daily Mail article.
&gt; The only Western-style democratic parties that oppose Putin get less than 5% of the vote. And that is still more than "Other Russia" will ever hope to get. It doesn't help that Kasparov is banned from Russian TV. I don't like the concept of "Western-style democracy". It's either a democracy(/republic) or not. No culture, east/west, can own the concept of democracy, it's innately human. Humans like choice and freedom to change the political system based on their liking.
I'm not questioning that definition; it's certainly one I've heard before. But a couple of edge cases arise from it I'm curious about. Does a cult that continues after the leader dies become a religion? Is Scientology a religion now that L. Ron Hubbard is dead? Will Sun Myung Moon's death suddenly legitimise his ministries, tax fraud, anti-semitism,  and silence his critics? How did Christianity transform from a cult of Roman heretics to being a religion? There are a number of early leaders who died. There are a number of ways the early church changed from the modern church. In fact, the papal line of Catholocism traces it's origins back to insist it's leaders are of the lineage of the early leaders, right? It seems that such a claim would undermine rather than legitimize claims of Christianity being a "real" religion. Perhaps it was because the Christian leaders were no longer persecuted? But there are many good ways to lead one's life that aren't persecuted. And if you can simply move far enough away from others, you can find an audience that won't persecute even very atypical beliefs. Just weird edge cases.
&gt; He is far more socially conservative than any liberal. &gt; I do like his opinions on personal freedom, How did you manage to so casually say both of these?  Social Conservatism is antithetical to personal freedom -- *as is Social 'Liberalism'*, even as their intersection of things-forbidden is nearly the empty set.  Reading and watching and listening to interviews, I've noted these areas of Social Conservatism in Ron Paul's views: 1. He's pro-life (a serious policy matter that he's acted on, albeit ineffectually), and 2. He mentioned once in a religious National Review interview that he wasn't comfortable with women in the military -- which admission he couched anyway to suggest that this wasn't a serious issue for him. When he talks to people who are not Iowa Republicans, he avoids abortion, trumpeting individual liberty and a host of other big issues (the number and  depth of which [makes him sound a little panicked and rushed at times](http://reason.com/blog/show/122744.html#796641)) that are really appealing.  And his Google interview contains the shocking revelation that he has priorities and sense enough not to waste his political capital on attacking "[some emphasis I forget] unoffensive" programs like the National Science Foundation. Now 'any liberal' by contrast inspired a Reason liveblogger to say &gt; 10:23: Jesus, they're playing leapfrog to be the loudest one promising a smoking ban. during the Russert debate.  These are more dangerous (because they are *acceptable*, and because all of them together form a paternalistic movement in American public policy) tendencies than any of Ron Paul's.  Finally: economic liberty is also an axis of personal freedom.
My mother is pro-choice.
2008 shaping up to be an interesting election. I hope Ron Paul can continue to gain momentum.
The only thing wrong about this, is it's scary to try to figure out what they might be replaced with.
That's what I always said about Gonzales resigning.
No you are an alarmist.  This is the House of Representatives - half their bills are complete pointless drivel which rarely leave committee.  This is why we have two houses.   
Paris Hilton has a new perfume out called Eau De Wonk. No, it??s called "Can-Can" and it??s inspired by the movie Moulin Rouge
I don't know...versions by Everlast and Lenny Kravitz are probably pretty horrible...
I was thining the same thing. Fortunately, subway cars tend to be a lot more solid than old tires. They've had good success with this in other places.
well, I do occasionally like to "tuck it" and dance around in front of a mirror.  Just, ya know, to see what it'd be like...
so, just what is it that you're trying to say? you and your ivy league friend saw someone who JUST graduated still working at a burger joint (at least that's the way you made it sound). maybe he was working there WHILE he was in college. perhaps he was working there to PAY for his education. perhaps his mommy and daddy didn't pay for EVERYTHING. PERHAPS he was still looking for a career, or he was planning on moving up to corporate. hmmm... interesting.
You keep using that word. I don't think it means what you think it means.
1.  The employment app has not actually been stapled to anything.  There are no holes in it.  Nice try, come again!  ;)
All those who dislike Ron Paul as just another republican, take note: anything with an official republican spin on it **always** fails to mention him. Always. He's not their candidate, as far as they're concerned.
"In order to effect a timely halt to deteriorating conditions, and to ensure the common good, a state of emergency is declared for these territories, by decree of Lord Richard Cheney, duly appointed representative of His Majesty the Decider. By decree, according to martial law, the following statutes are temporarily amended. - Right to assembly: suspended. - Right to habeas corpus: suspended. - Right to legal counsel: suspended. - Right to verdict by a jury of peers: suspended. By decree, all persons convicted of terrorism, or of aiding a person convicted of terrorism, or of associating with a person convicted of terrorism, shall be sentenced to hang by the neck until dead."
Preorder the digital download (it lets you choose how much you want to pay for it) or boxed set [here](http://www.inrainbows.com/Store/index3.html)   
I bet you get annoyed when people confuse fleshing things out vs. flushing things out too.  That one bugs the crap out of me!
Again with the conspiracy theories. It's kind of a letdown when stereotypes come to life like that.
Jibe...hehe...get it...two meanings...hehehe...jibe...nevermind.
An arresting officer doesn't get to reinterpret the law. A prosecutor doesn't get to reinterpret the law. Under special conditions a judge can attempt to reinterpret the law. Consult a lawyer if you need help. Law is absolute until it is reinterpreted. Grab a dictionary if you need help.
Oh god, not that one though. I mean, Ashcroft was awful, don't get me wrong... But when even he's refusing to do Gonzales' bidding from his hospital sick bed, you know that some downright creepy shit is going on. And it was Gonzales doing it. I think Bush could have proposed Satan as his replacement, and it'd still be an improvement.
well, acid already requires such a tiny amount to produce the desired effects, so a "small dose" could very well be enough to make you see pink unicorns
More like wait until you turn around and then spray paint your car and mutilate your dog. But yeah.
... which causes Americans to buy more domestically manufactured products.  Low cost for American products abroad also increases demand for them.  Both effects lead to higher employment and increased economic growth.
I'm not defending Bush (because as president he should at least have some idea what law governs before he does anything) but conflict of laws is fairly complicated stuff. What you got here is a multi-national corporation made up of people probably from many different nations, performing acts sort of under the direction of another nation (the U.S.) and sort of on their own in a nation without a developed legal system and the nation may have been party to treaties or agreements under a different government and under its new government. So:  1) many different governing bodies are involved all asserting different things about who does or doesn't have power.  2) against a background of laws that probably never contemplated such a complicated situation. So tell me, off the top of your head, what law governs in a situation like that?  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Conflict_of_laws
I think the govt is tapping this one.
A wise response... I have some history dealing with Tribal Art. And largely the taboos associated with the body of the deceased are cultural (i.e. the moral qualms that people have vary from civilization to civilization) In the South Pacific for example, the skull of your ancestor might be displayed on a specially carved wooden totem as a way to keep them close to you and your living family. Or it might be over-modeled with clay to bring back your likeness which then watches benevolently over your home from the afterlife. In Maori culture, the heads of the deceased (called mokomokai) are smoked to preserve them and are considered sacred. The word moko refers to the unique and elaborate facial and body tattoos used in Maori culture to denote tribal rank and lineage. Preserving the tattooed head of a deceased loved one was a way of honoring him and keeping his "essence" intact. Many, many other such examples exists in various cultures throughout the world (including the day of the dead where those who are living dig up the remains of their deceased loved ones) Food for thought... Perhaps though in a world where we can clone or re-animate a person from long dead tissue there would be something more to this line of thought...  If i could make a clone of you from a cell from your corpse, would it be a different person? and when would that happen?  what if you were a test tube baby? These are the reasons we tend to latch onto brain activity more than any other distinguishing characteristic.  But perhaps we will be wrong again...
AH, MORE FREE SPEECH NONSENSE FROM THE PSEUDOPOLITICAL ACTIVISTS. Newsflash: this crap aint important to americans. They want to tax the rich to pay for healthcare, stop spending so much on the military, stop the mass immigration that is depressing wages and fracturing the culture; they want mandatory 4 week vacations and 40 hour work week max. But all you internet activists care about is the rich man's "rights." These so called rights were born of what the aristocractic founding fathers wanted 200 years ago. They cared not for the bread and butter economic issues. They cared only for the rights that the wealthy find important.  And now, like some cargo cult version of politics, you internet pseudoPolitical activists carry on the work of the elite, promoting THEIR version of rights. And caring little for the bread and butter economics of what everyday americans want. 
Miss Moneypenny: You know, this kind of behaviour could qualify as sexual harassment. James Bond: And what's the penalty for that? Miss Moneypenny: Some day, you'll have to make good on your innuendos.  **Miss Moneypenny, you were my favorite Bond Girl. RIP**
The O'Neida Society - Sexual freedom producing children producing silverware The Kellogg Ministry - Made corn flakes to promote regularity and stop masturbation. The Boy Scouts - introduces kids to knot-tying and other forms of BDSM The Girl Scouts - teaches girls about the importance of self-reliance and cookies. Alcoholics Anonymous - helping people come back to reality every now &amp; again. Macintosh Owners - The Power to Be Your Best
Don't trust his lies.
&gt;far more intelligently than any prior Microsoft O/S That's not saying much of anything. Nice try though.
She was specifically acknowledged (by name) in Watson and Crick's original paper.  How the hell is that not being "formally linked to the discovery?"  They say: "We have also been stimulated by a knowledge of the general nature of the unpublished experimental results and ideas of Dr. M. H. F. Wilkins, Dr. R. E. Franklin and their co-workers at King's College, London" Keep in mind that the physical shape of the DNA molecule is only part of the discovery, the fact that the pyrimidine bases were on the inside of the helix (and hydrogen bonded in pairs) was even more significant.
The crackdown begins.  Top down management.
and the two guys hanging out of the obviously open hatch sorta give it away as well...
Well "That blog" has been one of the BBCs most reliable sources of news on this topic to date.
That may be, but arguably the song itself is pretty sexist, and the response to the post I linked *definitely* is misogynistic.  And look, it's got 12 upmods, hooray!
&gt; For example, many real-world applications are written in strictly-typed programming languages (e.g., Java, C# and Objective Caml). One strength of the strictly-typed programming languages is that programs written in them never go wrong They can also predict tomorrow's lottery numbers and correctly answer the question "Does this make my butt look fat?"
&gt; they admitted to the school authorities that they'd had sex where are you getting that bit of information from? The linked article doesn't detail how the father found out or are you assuming it from your personal experiences? As opposed to when you were caught off campus having sex, today I don't know of any truant officers roaming outside of schools and it was stated that they had sex off-campus.  As the article states *"The 17-year-old boy from Henniker, who admitted to having sex with his 15-year-old girlfriend, will "absolutely" be charged, police said."*, which means to me that he admitted to the charge when asked and not that they made an announcement prior to being caught. So the fact still remains that we don't know how they were discovered to have had sex. I think we can rule out them walking into the principles office to announce it as you appear to be suggesting. You also appear to be refuting my suggestion that she told her father herself. It would be interesting to see how they found out. &gt; But who's to say that people in their mid-teens aren't just as capable of loving, and committing themselves to a serious relationship If they are in a committed relationship I can understand your analogy, which was the same point I was making as well about taking responsibility. Unfortunately thats not the attitude taken by people commenting here on reddit. Their position is typically based upon the physical appearance and readiness for sex. You can read their comments and see that their message is that once a girl is ready, they're fair game and no mention of a relationship is brought up. A sad truth, but read a bit more  of the comments when these stories come around and you'll see.
9/11 made *Friedman* and his ilk stupid.  A lot of people stayed sane and awake, though.
&gt; Every recession, even the great depression, happened on [the Fed's] watch, what are they good for? How about the 'soft landing' of 1995?  Eleven paragraphs of Greenspan's autobiography, beginning on page 153, describe the Fed's hand in that.
I hope they form their own unelectable party. That would be ideal.
&gt; Simon says, this is a variable Not to defend Perl, but the author doesn't seem to know what $ means in Perl (or @ or %, likely). .. either that, or I don't.
lame...im going to get my phd in Europe
You're completely correct.   Years ago, the department of labor published different calculations of unemployment.  If I remember correctly, they were called UT1 - UT6.  For years, many people have been comparing the reported US unemployment rate to that of Canada.  Canada's has been consistently around 6% while the US rate was around 4%.  However, the reported rate was UT2 (I think).  When you looked at the UT6 rate (which was closer to how Canada computes its unemployment rate) it was hovering between 10-14%.  The UT6 rate dropped down to about 9% during the late Clinton era.  I am no longer able to find that information on the Department of Labor website.  I should have saved all that information when I had it. 
Maybe she should have done her homework.  Think about that.
I'm not sure if Cracked is still publishing a magazine or not (I know they relaunched about a year ago, I have the first issue), but their website is doing a lot to shed the perceptions that many used to have about them being an also-ran to Mad.  I'm all for these sorts of pop-philosophy articles, especially when they're something entertaining to read, not crap like "Buffy the Vampire Slayer &amp; Philosophy" that you see clogging precious space on bookstore shelves. The 'monkeysphere' does a lot to help explain the general apathy and malaise that political activists and their ilk like to get so worked up about.
I thought they had Hindu beliefs?
This is what reddit used to be like before people like you got here. I wish there were some way to send you all back to Digg.
Please.
&gt; With an estimated $A3 billion staked in the country (and a more than $20 billion stake in Australia), Singapore Inc companies have been some of the biggest investors in and supporters of Burma's military junta — It would seem that Australia has a lot of leverage. Would Singapore rather have 3 billion of business in Burma, or 20 billion in Australia?   
This reminds me of this one:  http://reddit.com/goto?id=2v772 It's from 1944, a propaganda video by the feds about how to manage women in the workplace.
Why has no one invoked the First Rule of Fight Club?
I'm tough. After climbing the wall of death I go to my favorite bar and have Jack make me my favorite drink. ... A dirty glass of flaming poisonous darts...
Well, if we fix that monstrous problem, it'll be fine, right? That's what I'm trying for.
Do you think it's in the realm of possibility that the test was stapled together but the application was paper-clipped to it?
Because Kucinich doesn't want to abolish the IRS, FDA, FCC, Department of Education, Medicare, Mexicans, abortion, the separation of church and state, and the income tax. Ron Paul is a modern day Lyndon LaRouche with a cult of personality and everything.  They're just far more visible thanks to the internet.
OK, Now you're not even responding to my arguments, so goodbye.
http://i24.tinypic.com/2h5l7gh.jpg 
Do the stalls have doors?  do they have a front and a back part of the door, or are they one dimensional? When you close a stall door while you're sitting / before you're sitting, what part of the door do you see? &gt;women are judged every day of their lives by how they look. so what if a few men in the netherlands are too? And men wouldn't, without these posters, be judged according to their looks?
It's all true All is fair in love and war whether state condoned or not The game is set in a large sandbox environment, akin to the video game, Mercenaries: Playground of Destruction. The player must either take out the Kingpin of the dominant gang, or take out the bosses that perform specific tasks for the gang under the Kingpin to weaken the gang's production or the forces immediately protecting the Kingpin, thus making it easier to defeat the Kingpin and increasing the odds of successfully assassinating the Kingpin. It is the player's choice to kill the bosses, or skip them entirely to defeat the Kingpin. This said, the gangs cannot be entirely destroyed unless the player tracks down and kills all the Generals and the Kingpin.
This only works if they can have enough internal resources to manufacture the products...  but they don't.  Similarly, while the dollar is weaker, the US still can't compete against the slave labor wages of China.  Ultimately, the buying power of the average american is going to continue to drop.
I take issue with that, he's basically tooting his own horn. It's not implausible that they don't deserve credit, that they weren't the cause of the problems in the first place, or even that it wouldn't have went better without them.
Of course.  Thank you.
Wait until the toe clipping monster of doom comes calling...
&gt;how come that is such a big deal to you people? Because we don't want to live in a theocracy. Freedom *isn't* religious slavery!
Back to Sapient vs. Sentient I will have to sort of agree with you on this one.   Why do we protect human life, but not chimpanzee life? as mentioned above in another post. Largely because we place special emphasis on the human quality of Sapient (i.e. Homo Sapiens).  But we make that determination at the species level, not at the individual level, mostly because if it is exhibited by a species, but is not readily apparent in an individual, there may be great cause for error. A person may not be good at math for example, but they may have wisdom and sound judgement when it comes to other areas of life.  Even a Idiot Savant has a bright spot where wisdom and judgement are better than the average. An interesting digression...
I see the attempt at humor.  It's not less insulting for that.
Do mild-mannered geeks often have run-ins with the police or gangs? This one doesn't.
[That's a safe assumption.](http://z.about.com/d/politicalhumor/1/0/n/U/moran.jpg)
oksyy
I've seen it as the "rule of 70/72" (ie, use whichever is more convinient to do the arithmetic with...) Really though, it should be called the "rule of numbers close to 69" (more specifically, "rule of numbers close to 100%*ln(2)" which is the actuall basis for it...
Please, invisible pink unicorn, let this happen for real. Crappy third parties are exactly where some of the Neocon nutjobs belong.
&gt;I don't know about medieval Iceland, but Somalia's doing OK. LOL!  Why don't you move to Somalia, it's pretty much a libertarian utopia? Watch out for the warlords and the Islamists.
Only problem is that the actual legislators who are refusing to play nice and come to an agreement will still get paid during the shutdown. So, their $100K+ salaries will not be affected while they continue to act like children and a goodly portion of the 50,000 other State employees will be sitting at home with no pay.
Uh.. Columbia churns out a lot of lawyers, doctors, businessmen: aka rich people.  I'm sure some of them have sense and school ties and will help put this to a halt. Even if they don't, someone else mentioned that this is illegal, Columbia will sue and win and that'll be that.  I can't believe we pay these idiots for this.  It has to be the cushiest job in the land.
Don't tase my genitals bro!
So if I read this correctly, supposidly crick told this to somebody else who told this to somebody else who, on later retelling it to crick he said "print it and I'll sue you." Ok.  That's good enough for me to believe it's all true.
Was the nick "I'm an asshole for no reason" taken?  I see no point in discussing this with someone who insults someone who did not do so to them.
You mean the terrorists or the administration?
Of course - this piece from Seymour Hersh today is probably just a coincidence http://www.newyorker.com/reporting/2007/10/08/071008fa_fact_hersh &gt;Now the emphasis is on “surgical” strikes on Revolutionary Guard Corps facilities in Tehran and elsewhere, which, the Administration claims, have been the source of attacks on Americans in Iraq. What had been presented primarily as a counter-proliferation mission has been reconceived as counterterrorism. &gt;The shift in targeting reflects three developments. First, the President and his senior advisers have concluded that their campaign to convince the American public that Iran poses an imminent nuclear threat has failed (unlike a similar campaign before the Iraq war), and that as a result there is not enough popular support for a major bombing campaign. Oh darn - the first excuse didn't fool em, let's try another.
Citing the frequency of articles that assert your position doesn't prove anything. All media is biased, and reddit is no exception.  The OP is being upmodded because he's right. Most Americans are more concerned about being able to feed their families and have a job. There's plenty of bullshit going on on domestic side of things to complain about. I don't fault people for looking out for themselves. The government certainly isn't doing a very good job of it.
"Stop the ACLU"? What kind of antidemocratic rubbish is this?
[manual of love](http://www.theabsolute.net/misogyny/lvmanual.html)
selling ebooks has never had such a noble cause... an $800 coffee machine and a sack of good coffee beans LOL
&gt;But if you read the detailed histories of WWI, they will mention that the ANZACs were considered far more badass than the British soldiers. Simply untrue.  The Germans understood, as have soldiers of all wars, that the troops to be most feared were those with the most experience under fire.  In many cases the ANZACs probably qualified as such, but if so, their reputation was a consequence of their experience in battle, not of the fact that they were ANZACs.
very funny.  reported.
well, I know you're being sarcastic now, because the issue isn't consent due to the age range.  If age range was all that encompassed consent, then you'd just have to get an 18 y/o used car salesman walking the hallways of schools nationwide selling cars. What kid doesn't want a car after all? So if a 15 y/o can't buy a car by themselves, then why should they be deciding alone about having children?
Awesome car -- glad to see Detroit taking some initiative finally...
Law is absolute until it isn't. Got it.
Thank you for your discussion, you brought up some very interesting points, and i certainly have no problem with erring on the side of caution, though i hope that people don't settle permanently on pat answers but keep searching for the exact truth.
How the fuck are they going to prevent crimes? By seducing the criminals?
There blocking reddit. You click on a link and it goes to a blank Firefox gray page.
Because they don't care?
Well, I just assumed that your feathers were ruffled by the fact that, if this was your public restroom, other men could be "judging" your reactions to the picture or what not. I assume most people wouldn't get their panties in a bunch over one of the pictures you described in the privacy of their own homes, or, as it were, their own stall, unless they had some hate for themselves deep down. While men may be judged by their looks, a woman's intrinsic worth is judged by how she looks. Maybe not according to her, but certainly according to mainstream media. So what I'm saying is pictures like those probably wouldn't phase most women.
Show up and lay down to stand up against the treasonous, tyrannical Bush Regime. And to donate a spine to Nancy Pelosi at the same time.
Most people don't realize that this is how the house of representatives works.  It's like the junior leagues for the senate.
You are an anti-semite jew-hating nazi!  Stop denying the holocaust!    This kind of question is irrefutable proof that you hate freedom and side with the bad guys!
"Almost literally"?  That's friggin' sweet.  I will have to try to "almost" incorporate it into my vocabulary.
Downmodding
I wonder if he'll just admit that he's gay and go liberal. (Not bashing liberals, there just tend to be more OPEN homosexuals there. All the republican gays are closeted.)
&gt; the actual legislators who are refusing to play nice and come to an agreement will still get paid during the shutdown. thats a bit astounding if true. I'm offended by even the accusation of that! Do you have anything to back that up?
Yeah right... like ricin... it's only .2 miligrams... not enough to harm anyone permanantly.
my name is Sandra and i'm 14 yers old :D  I live in Icland :D
True :) the design is really sweet 
I hate to break it to you, but the American entry into WW1, enormously helpful as it was, wasn't the be all end all decider of WW1. Ordinarily I wouldn't quibble, who am I to dash someone's romantic nationalism? But lately I've been meeting a lot of people with "Manifest Destiny" syndrome, so I now feel obliged to speak up.  The situation in WW1 was very different to WW2. With the conditions of trench warfare eliminating the possibility of a sudden breakthrough and quick victory, it was just a matter of time before Germany was starved into surrender. WW2, America's entry into the war was very dramatic and of enormous importance. WW1, it's more by way of sealing Germany's fate.
&gt; Even if you want to count a fetus as a human, it's not like you are robbing it of its memories and experiences, So, it's ok to kill the amnesiacs? &gt;or taking away a valued member of someone life Oh, the unwanted are ok to kill. &gt; Most children that are aborted are done so for good reason, such as the mother could not support a child yet, or was the victim of rape. It's unlikely that any significant fraction of the total are the result of rapes. Best guess, less than 1%. &gt; Go to a really bad area of your town, sit outside a public school and just watch the children when they leave. What do you see? You see under-privileged kids whose home lives are in ruin because their parents could not properly raise and provide for them. So, why stop at birth? We could euthanize these poor kids now, all they're going to do is *suffer*. &gt; By not allowing abortions, you are consigning thousands of children to be raised by un-fit parents. If they're unfit, how are they qualified to judge that they themselves are unfit? Wouldn't it be better to let the government judge who is fit and who is not, and selectively abort those fetuses who will have unfit parents? &gt; On the greater scale, it is much more merciful to end the lives of these people before the tragedy can occur. Ah, the doing it for their own good response. Classic.
**Action Pack: Resources** More way to use routes in creative ways.  AKA more ways to slow your Rails App down.   **Action Pack: Record identification** More useless ways to use slow, slow routes.   **Active Record: XML in, JSON out** This is part of Rails 2.0's move in the right direction.  Better OO XML support, along with ActiveResource, means Rails will have a much better footing with legacy systems.  You no longer have to force your schema to be Rails-happy.  You can easily tack Rails on top of a system that already talks in XML, SOAP, or REST.
When is the last time the Constitution has really mattered in the passing of bills? Seriously, unconstitutional bills seem to be quite normal for Congress, with the backlog, SCOTUS could take YEARS to recind an unconstitutional law, and that law may cause irreparable damage.   I've argued here before that should a law be blatantly unconstitutional that the SCOTUS should IMMEDIATELY strike it down, not wait for a challenge.  People have argued that it just isn't the way, and that the SCOTUS is not there to challenge laws, the people are.
Una pregunta del publico: "Como te afecta todo lo que sucede con Britney Spears o Linsay Lohan"?.
It could be worse.  At least you got a marketable skill in return.
&gt; "It's all spooky and you have no hope of understanding" is actually a classical explanation. That's not the explanation I gave.  The "spooky" thing is just well-established shorthand for a certain observable effect.  Yes, it derives from a classical view (Einstein's, in fact), but it's not intended as either explanatory or anti-explanatory when it's used nowadays.  It's just a term, with an established meaning.   The "no hope of understanding" part arises from the fears of people who aren't willing to accept the results of simple experiments.  If you don't like the EPR paradox, what do you say to the dual-slit experiment? &gt; The reality of science is that greater than 90% of scientists are mindless plodders incapable of actually understanding their own subject field. That's the reality of all human endeavours.  It's the people in the top percentiles who typically make the breakthroughs, and it's their results that are chewed over and often misunderstood by the rest.  But somehow, we tend to muddle through and agree on workable theories, theories which match predictions and have some explanatory power.  We make mistakes along the way but as long as we're dealing with theories that are falsifiable (i.e. ignore string theory for now), we tend to catch a lot of those mistakes eventually. Sometimes, science is indeed driven forward by people with an agenda, people who want a particular result; but in the long run, that only works when the agenda matches what's observable.  Agendas have a way of failing in the face of the scientific method, as Einstein discovered when he attempted to disprove spooky action.  So if you're pursuing that sort of agenda, you have to at least recognize that you've decided on an outcome ahead of the evidence, and - if you're a scientist - you're going to want to be careful that this doesn't skew your thinking too badly, and you just won't get anywhere. It's obviously impossible to capture the entirety of the scientific method in a comment on reddit - you can read Kuhn and Feyerabend et al until you're blue in the face and still not have a good handle on it, but you can also step back and look at what actually happens.  Science is a human activity - to say it "approximates science in some crude sense" completely misunderstands what science is.  Science is what it is, it doesn't approximate it.  Perhaps you mean to say something like "science approximates reality, or truth, in some crude sense", if you're a realist, that is. I'm sorry you're so angry about all this, but I can't really help you since you haven't actually described your position.  Addendum: I know what my position is, and I can defend it.  Can you say the same?  If so, you haven't demonstrated it so far.  You imply in the parent comment that you perhaps accept some sort of quantum reality, and you're not impressed by some classical perspectives. But in your first reply to me, you referenced Marmet who was trying support a classical perspective.  Without further explanation, this is somewhat contradictory. You also talk about the "wavefunction isn't real" crowd, but I'm not sure if you're referring to the Copenhagen interpretation, or the work on decoherence - which seems fairly rational - or some more fundamental denial that I might not agree with either.  If you're going to rail against me, the least you could do is describe what you believe. 
Why is good news not more easily found?  I guess it doesn't suit the agenda of those against the war.
"TheFirstPost.co.uk?" Frist psot!
"If this were Nazi Germany in the 1930s..." Pretty big if there! What if I was a tomato larger than the universe? Get a halfway decent narrator and lay off the overblown comparisons.
Mobutu's wealth at his death was evaluated at $4 Billion.
5 comments, I wonder why.  This is the 5th article I've failed to follow.  The govt is downing this reddit.com
People, when we link to Flickr, can we link to the actual photo page? This way we get a title, maybe a description and some geo info. And if there's already a discussion around the photo, we can read that, too. It's easy to get to these full-size versions from the photo page, and it's not like the photo page is covered with ads or something.
As misogynistic as it sounds, I'd say this is one of those stereotypes with a basis in reality. Some attractive girls, most of whom are skinny, realize that people -- not just men -- will treat them better because they're attractive, so they run with it. Most husky girls are not considered to be as attractive, so they aren't given special treatment, so they have to be nicer to people in general. Hell, I'd argue that nerds are generally nicer than alpha males. So I think it has more to do with your position on the social ladder than anything else. 
hahaha - how liberating! and slightly creepy! :P
Because you don't talk about Fight Club...
Something is up behind the scenes when ALL the democrats (except Kucinich) are behind Bush. In the face of: -The Iraq war being an oil grab. -Being hardly able to sustain the Iraq war on the ground. -The world now hating us. -Our indebted economy being about to soon crash. -Leiberman's new job as liason from Israel to the US. -The mainstream news manipulating presidential candidacy. -And the transparent propaganda preparing for war against Iran.    In the face of all this, the democrats support expanding the war. Something is up that we are not being told about. Either intense corruption or secret information. Either way it doesn't look good. 
&gt; LOL! (edit: the parent comment changed this to an onomatopoeia.) Yes, a wholly original body of law with strong provisos for property rights -- strong enough to support significant foreign investment in a country with no functioning government (the usual protector of such rights) is laugh-out-loud funny. &gt; the warlords are a consequence of UN pressure on the nation to form a proper state.  Read the article. If you shallowly enjoyed the notion that *omg a country in Africa* could warrant an article worth reading, you'll never stop laughing over [these essays on anarchy](http://www.cato-unbound.org/archives/august-2007/); the first has this thigh-slapping account: &gt; The institution they devised for this purpose was credit. The key to understanding how credit  solved the problem of force and facilitated peaceful exchange is straightforward: you can't steal  goods that aren't yet produced, but you can trade with them.  &gt; Here's how the credit institution worked: Producers would not produce anything today but would  instead wait for middlemen to arrive in their villages looking for goods to plunder. With nothing  available to steal the middlemen had two options: return to the coast empty-handed after having  made a trip to the interior, or make an agreement with producers to supply the goods they required  on the basis of credit. In light of the costliness of their trip to the interior, middlemen  frequently chose the latter &gt; According to their credit arrangements, middlemen advanced payment to producers and agreed to  return later to collect the goods they were owed. When they returned for this purpose all that was  available for taking was what they were owed, so stealing was not an option. Instead, middlemen  frequently renewed the credit agreement, which initiated a subsequent round of credit-based trade,  and so on.
New building to downtown STL
Your internal functionality shouldn't _need_ testing independent of the interface you intended to expose. If it does, it shouldn't _be_ internal. (Trivial example: if you're testing a component which identifies whether or not a string is a palindrome, and does so by reversing the string and comparing that with the original string, the reverse method shouldn't be a private method in your palindrome checker, it should be a separate component that you can test directly without modifying the palindrome bit.) If you can't separate it for whatever reason, you need to choose between (a) not testing it fully, or (b) making a mess of your interface. And with either of those outcomes, you shouldn't spend the rest of the day trying to convince yourself (and others) that there wasn't a trade-off. 
though clearly fake (what teacher writes "WRONG" on a test?) it's still funny
And I'm one of the people who upmodded it. I thought it was funny and I'm assuming they did too. It was just a play on words, taken from a 1960's song. Even when the song was originally out, people thought it was funny and it wasn't taken seriously. I was never one to take too many things very seriously, but on Friday, my children and I experienced an extremely traumatic event. It only confirmed for me the fact that things like this aren't really that big of a deal. Lighten up a little, because believe me, it can get a whole lot worse than a few joking comments.
Somewhat surprisingly, I find myself supporting Sainsbury's in this. They just have to group Muslims with underage workers, and they're done - so long as someone's going to come over and ring up my booze, I don't care if I have to wait a few seconds more.
I don't know squat about computational complexity compared to the experts.. but I have to make the statement.. Why do I care? I don't understand the immediate consequences of proving this right or wrong. To me it seems more of an academic struggle than anything. Suppose we prove it.. what happens? It seems unlikely that "anything happens" because if it did we might be able to verify or contradict p = np.
Short, and curlys.
And it was a US sub, surfacing to show off for civilian guests on board.
Sematic game huh?  "Based on" is pretty much the same as under-the-covers.  Just like all the previous versions of NT, Vista is a crippled pre-Windows Server 2008. The obscure bugs only in Windows Server 2003, and not in XP, proves this -- why would Microsoft skip 2003 code and go from XP to Vista?  I see this thread is going nowhere.
He doesn't have an answer.  Just like he didn't when 9/11 happened.  He's a sheep for the flock.
This article is different because Hersh is one of the few good guys in the press anymore; his information is solidly-researched and he tells truths the Bush administration would prefer he not. He also tends not to make ridiculous predictions; rather, his articles tend to be of the "This is what the White House is considering" mold. His articles often spark a fair amount of debate in other media outlets, so I would like to think that the publication of this particular piece will help make an Iran strike less likely.
&gt; Cape Cods originally sold for $6,990; damn almost made me wish I was born in that time, went thru the hell of WW2....
If it was Magnum sized, it would at least be funny (if still horribly inappropriate).
I agree. Math is extremely valuable for a very small sliver of occupations. Sure, those occupations can be very rewarding and important (like, say, financial analyst at an investment bank) but they represent a tiny fraction of career choices out there. And I say this as someone who is working toward a math degree. Though that's because my English major will actually leave me working at McDonalds and $80k in debt.
If this takes away even 2% of voters from the Republicans, it'll be awesome.
Radical. Hopefully this scheme works. I might actually buy music for the first time since I was ten years old.
'High' on LSD? You get high off weed, coke, crack, etc... but you 'trip' on acid. It's a totally different genre of psychoactive than those that get you 'high'. $10 says the poster has never seen a tab in his life.
I don't know any college professor who writes a grade without a percentage.
I like the new blue MSMs. Sure they taste the same, but they're blue dammit!
I wouldn't pay ten cents. There will be plenty of places to download it for free probably before its even released.
corporate controlled media the illusion of the so-called "liberal" media is exposed once again
1.15
Most of those goods are built overseas now though. So they don't create jobs here.
Yes... er... no!... wait, what's the patriotic answer again? 
&gt;The govt is downing this reddit.com The govt is *drowning* this reddit.com.  There's only so much outrage you can muster...  I'm moving past outrage overload at this point, just moving into sad resignation.
SO funny ! See the guy breathing !
And once again... let's single out Israel. Surely Israel is not the only country that sells weapons to Burma. But why worry about the French, the Germans, the Russians etc. Let's blame everything on the Jews! And, for the record, Israeli Arabs have the right to vote. Which is more than Arabs in most Arab countries have.
The teacher has a sense of humor!  I hope the student does, too, and realises what an idiot he or she was for not studying.
I love the source.  "WingNutDaily" is my favorite nickname for these guys.
No, you don't have it. OK, now that I realize you're a troll, I'm done. Talk to an adult if you need help understanding the legal system. This is Jurisprudence 101.
Well, that's not theistic.  So fair point for Cynos if that's true. But his claim, his onus.
I responded to your arguments that were made based on something I actually said. I ignored the stuff you made up. If you didn't understand me, I can't help with your reading comprehension. Sorry. 
1) You feel empathy but only in the abstract. If you saw your nephew next to his mother's corpse it'd hit you a lot harder because that's in your "monkeysphere". If your best friend died and left a daughter with no home to turn to, there's a good chance you'd take her and feed her and whatnot. How much do you give to Christian Children's Fund? 2) This is a fairly good point, but again it's abstract. I'm a bleeding lib myself but I wholly recognize that my concern for a cause is intensified by my proximity to it. I donated more to Katrina funds than I did the Asian tsunami.
&gt; feel like you're being fed the truth. I hate that taste in my mouth. After awhile of eating BS, you kinda develop a palate for it. Truth is just a bit of a let down sometimes.
I'm upmoding this just because I'd like more things like that on the frontpage. I mean, it could be a crappy paper, but crappy paper on P/NP vs crappy image vs crappy us politics? Hard to choose :&gt;
It might be better to post a link to the PDF rather than Postscript version of the paper: [http://www.erlang.se/publications/prac_appl_prolog.pdf](http://www.erlang.se/publications/prac_appl_prolog.pdf)
Indeed.  Tis our lack of "groove" what ails us. 
Somehow I think if they did they'd at least be one of the first third parties in a long time to win a few electoral votes...
Correction noted. I must add though, that the Democrats (and other stupid and lazy Americans) *are* giving Bush a free reign. Free for him, although it's costing us dearly.
If I may: I think it's fake. I can tell by the staples and from having seen quite a few fakes in my time.
That's funny, I was on LSD when I discovered I was a Nobel Prize Winner too.
I'm going by your own logic. If one points out a racist article published by an Israeli newspaper, and takes it off without any apology whatsoever - that "exposes a hatred of Jews". Yet you fail to see the racism in a blog which so blatantly anti-Muslim ("As if it’s necessary to fabricate news to do that [make Muslims look bad]"). It takes issues with the fact that people here on Reddit condemn the propaganda-like reporting of The Jerusalem Post, yet has no issues with Palestinians being called savages and barbaric in numerous posts on its website. Besides, you pass off the apology on the blog as an official one. It isn't. If The Jerusalem Post wants to have any credibility on this issue, then it should come out, acknowledge its mistake and apologize for it. Unless it does so like a responsible news channel, I fail to sympathize with their "mistake".
The analogy breaks down because not only of the severity of the risk, but because of the element of consensuality. Someone being assaulted did not consent to being placed at risk for injury, someone having sex did.  If this were not significant, victorious boxers would be arrested after the match.
Amen!
Good, don't vote!
For the same reason I feel safer and better about eating fresh vegetables versus processed food.
"Can you think of a reason why voters were always required to own property?" So the wealthy upper class could monopolize government.   
Both a distraction and a possible retarded extension.
Do we fear this man's words so much that we drop our principals and run at the first sign of his eyes?  This is exactly the kind of grand maul shitheadedness people run with when they are in a full panic.  We have nothing to fear but fear itself - unless you're Duncan Hunter.  The united states of america has turned into a grabastic cluster of girlie chickenshits, so insecure with themselves they pop their cork every time someone says "boo!" You can't defend freedom by choking it off every time someone you don't like comes knocking at your door.  You can't defend freedom by whittling it down every time you are threatened.  You can send an army to conquer the world, but if freedom is smothered at home, then you have failed to defend freedom and you have nothing to shoe for your conquest.    What have the republicans got against freedom?
Well, the results say the baby-boomers enjoyed most of the effects of the postwar boom. No-DUH.
&gt; the reverse method shouldn't be a private method in your palindrome checker, it should be a separate component that you can test directly without modifying the palindrome bit Right, except that then this comes into tension with YAGNI: why am I suddenly in the business of writing a *string* library? I agree fully with you. My bone of contention is that programmatic advice of this type *always* comes into conflict with *some other* piece of programmatic advice. Put it in another way, I find that all these prescriptive "methodologies" are, to some degree, internally inconsistent. And, my feeling is that if you can successfully solve the inconsistencies, you are a good programmer and have probably outgrown the methodology.
I have my copy of Zodiac at my side, but I can't find the exact quote and my Google-fu is weak today. So here's a paraphrase: "I thought they said the generators would form an artificial reef. Become part of the habitat, y'know?" "Of COURSE they become part of the habitat. The habitat is whatever's down there, by definition."
The agenda is for the talks after his. He gave the keynote. It's been kept secret from the public. So much for an open democracy...
My guess: He was on his way to a wedding in which he was a part and capitalized on the crash of the UPS truck to fetch himself a wedding gift.  The only reason he got away with it, I suppose, was that he was involved and it was the UPS driver's fault.  That appliance is probably broken.
Teachers?  Concert musicians?
What next, pork?
That's pretty awesome. I guess they figured that if people were going to get it online anyway, they might as well give them an option to pay for it. Am I right?
That's a false dichotomy. In Philadelphia, we have murals everywhere, and it's beautiful without being vandalism.
&gt;"I was in shock," Schaper said. "This has rocked me to my core." Wtf dude. its 50 cents...
I am going to pay $20 for the album.  For some reason I feel more generous when I am free to do as I wish.  I bet this is going to be a huge hit for them (financially). I will also be the first to purchase tickets for their next tour.  
Great.  Let's go back to the medieval idea of cutting off a pickpocket's hand.  That'll make them think twice about stealing, right?
&gt; Well, he's wrong on this issue. But again, as I've said elsewhere... making it a state issue means that outlawing it has to happen in all 15 or 20 nearby states before it becomes unavailable. Depends how you define unavailable. It becomes unavailable to teenage girls who may not have parental consent and do not have the means to get an out of state abortion. Women with precarious work conditions who may lose their job from missing work, social pressure due to having to explain the out of state trip, etc. Placing geographical restrictions on basic human rights is problematic in many ways... &gt; I believe I read the other day that there are 300,000 rapes each year, and that a 12th of them end up pregnant, 25,000 of them. If half undergo abortions, that's 12,000 that could be prevented each year with no controversey whatsoever. Sure. I find it a bit weird to argue trying to reduce rape occurrences should be motivated by diminishing abortion rates, but I can't argue with your logic. &gt; someone being irresponsible The pill is not 100% effective, condoms can break... it's not always the result of being irresponsible, when it's someone else that's being irresponsible then it's not relevant and when we are talking about the potential mother, her being irresponsible is not a very good reason to force her to have children... &gt; Few are as callous or unemotional as the anecdotes like to claim. Anecdotes? Many people see any "abortion" wrong from conception (plan B is not an abortion...) for religious reasons and with no consideration for human suffering. This is what most of the debate about abortion revolves around in the US and I don't think it can be dismissed as anecdotal...
It depends on who they were and what he said.
And when they start preaching the most explicit theocracy in their campaigns, all the people warning everybody about christian dominionism will be vindicated.
If you can read you can get a better job than mcdonalds.
Well, there's a lot of interesting theory out there, even if I can't get past the introduction and the conclusions. And I'd take a piss-poor paper over a macro'ed picture any time. So, let's post!
She looks great.
I'm Brad, one of the co-founders of Admish. It's a social networking site with a purpose: to demystify college admissions and to provide education professionals with a free tool. I really do believe there's nothing more important than education and with Admish, I think we can help connect people with the same passion. Right now we're in beta (and not fake beta, a genuine beta) and so the site changes every day. We're adding a ton of innovative functionality so please check it out and let us know what you think. Thanks,  Brad
I bet she don't miss her homework again. I'd hate to see what happens on the 2nd offence.
sorry dude...you're a boob.  theis has nothing to do with george w.  i hate the guy, but he ain't part of this.  this has history to it.  if george w. bush even knew what a buddhist was i'd give him some props. i just hope it stops.
Actually, the prosecutor *does* get to reinterpret, in a way.  The prosecutor had a choice to charge him as an adult or not.
another herd with different insane beliefs.
if d-day happened today every single troop would be at the bottom of the ocean did you forget that ww2 was almost 70 years ago?
you are so putting words in my mouth.  I thought my question was clear.  What has Israel done for US?
haha, "Rather" disturbing, cbs, lol...
I disagree with TFA where it states the minimum wait before digging is 3 hours.  I have never found more than 1 hour to be needed.  You can even walk on them (in normal snowboots) after an hour, most of the time.  This is my experience.  Your mileage may vary.  I'm at 52 degrees North. I build a quinzhee every year.  Due to roof ice damming problems, I pull a lot of snow off the roof and have to pile it in one specific area.  Since I'm gonna have a big pile of hand-tossed snow, I dig the section down first, so it's great for quinzhees.  The kids love `em. I haven't slept in one in years, but my experience was that in my 3-season sleeping bag (i.e. not made for winter) during -18^C (0^F) outside, inside the quinzhee it was 0^C (32^F).  I was frickin cold all night and couldn't sleep well, but cold is preferable to death. I believe it would be possible to survive a similar night in the quinzhee without a sleeping bag (maybe just a blanket and enough foliage on the floor), but it would hurt.  (cold hurts) This should not be considered any sort of advice on what **you** should do.  Your experience may be different from mine.  Inform yourself from a reliable source, first, before taking any action which may result in your freezing to death.
I tried paying a negative amount but the field for money wouldn't accept the negative sign. :'(
It wasn't sarcasm. He is an idiot. P.S. If you guys are so hot-to-trot to believe that it was an issue of a misplaced comma, why don't you ask nokili what he meant?  You may not have noticed, but he's been too gutless to actually supply a rebuttal up to this point. 
You may.
&gt;ALL the democrats  Could you clarify what you mean by this?
Unless it's the same guy from the picture.
I can't stand Radiohead's music, but I'm going to drop $15 on this album just to provide incentive for the rest of the industry to adopt this model. Even though I don't like their music itself, it's hard to dispute that taking on a risk like this is a HUGE contribution to music in general.
Horrible headline, claiming Obama just set up Iran when he didn't support its passing.
Tracks: 1) 15 STEP 2) BODYSNATCHERS 3) NUDE 4) WEIRD FISHES/ARPEGGI 5) ALL I NEED 6) FAUST ARP 7) RECKONER 8) HOUSE OF CARDS 9) JIGSAW FALLING INTO PLACE 10) VIDEOTAPE
If there was any justice, Thomas Friedman would be over. How many times do you get to be wrong and still considered an expert?
Not denying that in the slightest, sadly enough I'm still under the impression they could pick up one or two of the really red states.
I really like the Comodo firewall, why to pay when you can get it free!
I've been blown away by the show. The sex scenes are pretty racy, but it's the relationships that are really riveting.  Having been in an imperfect marriage for about 5 years now, I recognize a lot of what is going on between the characters. I would recommend this series to any young people who are thinking of getting married and tell them, "Pay close attention... this is what real marriages are like".   
Upvoted even though I love Radiohead.
Knocked down those trade towers so we could fight a war they wanted us to.
IIRC, another article stated that it installs if *automatic* updated are turned off, but not if the entire update system (including notification) is off.  I'll try to find a source for this.
I think we can 'rescue patrotism for this country' by voting morons like Rep. Duncan Hunter out of office.
Then too, the two largest immigrant groups in US history, at least in terms of proportions, are German-speaking Europeans and the Irish respectively.  Neither of them are especially associated with puritanism.
Judging by the direction in which the papers lay and the angle of the paperclip in relation to them, I believe it's safe to assume you both have far too much time on your hands. :)
basically looks real, girl shoots bear in a tree, then comes down and gets done doggy style , dogs drag the bears body awawy and then enjoys a drink. wtf indeed
Cool!  Put all the religious nutjobs into a party that will never get elected.  Brilliant. 
A pre-adolescence of toy, comic, and card collecting compels me to correct you: it's *taun-taun*. 
&gt;How are fishermen an ethnic group according to the (geneologic) definition? Easy. They share genetic markers. Just like you said. &gt;That you may have actually learned something from this discussion? You told me that there are many types of ethnic groups that are jews. I am simply taking your word for it. By the same token there are many types of ethnic groups that are fishermen.  &gt;I call somebody who hates semites an anti-semite, Anti semite doesn't mean anti semite. It means anti jew. So I think it's only fair that the semites also get their own terminology. I propose that we use anti-broccoli. If you say something bad about semites then you are an anti-broccolite. &gt;Then define it instead of trying to bait me. Try this http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Semite  
&gt;she DOES look Jewish Oh good, another racist asshole. But, I'm not allowed to say it, because there are NO racists. &gt;so what's the big deal in calling her a racist Jew? Since you obviously didn't RTFA, I'll clue you in: Nowhere, in that whole article, does it mention she's Jewish, let alone anybody.   
McFail!
A crop-dusted orchard, and we wonder why it keeps bearing poisoned fruit.
Damnit! did reddit implement the fark language filter???
I'd hope you would. I'm not saying it's objectively bad or anything like that, or that it is wrong for others to like it; I'm just saying as a matter of preference I don't enjoy it. Obviously there are people out there who do, and that's why they've been around so long and they are able to take a risk like this. I'm glad people have some music they like and the band members can make a living doing something (I would guess) they enjoy. But it's not for me.
You gotta be pretty dumb to fail a first year midterm.
Read the first comment on the article.  It's interesting.
THE POWER OF RON COMPELS YOU! Messianic? As in a savior? Well, he pretty much would be one if he were to get into the white house.
This is old news over on Slashdot.  The secret updates are an update for Windows Update (how paradoxical).  However, they did cause glitches in other parts of the OS, so there's still a case for making these updates public. Nothing to see here, move along, stop panicking.
Easy. Fishermen have a shared culture they can subscribe to more then one ethnicity. Therefore fisherman are an ethnic group. 
The "can not" bugged me, too.
Cops should have zero control over that camera. There ought to be four wide-angle cameras in each car in fact, one out of each side to catch a full 360 degrees around the car. Optionally include some software in the car that will fire built-in tasers at the cops balls if misbehavior on their part is detected. (if only..)
Glad to see you're supporting the artists.
libertarians dont believe in state supported marriage at all, whether its homo or hetero libertarians do however believes that state laws are more just than federal laws because they are provided more direct oversight by the people who will be affected by them. they also give citizens the ability to government shop by moving, and therefore avoiding paying taxes to a government they don't agree with. You are in favor of forcing gay marriage on societies who don't want it. But you wouldn't do this to China or Russia or even Africa... you would do it to your fellow Americans however. Why? Any kind of force is unlawful. All laws should be supported by the people. If the people are cunts, let them be cunts in the privacy of their own state. Until then we'll move out of Alabama and stop trading with them, if we don't morally support them. But let them come around to the "correct" decision on their own time. Forcing them doesn't get us anywhere, it just creates more violence and hate in the world.
i &lt;3 radiohead. good idea. I'll buy it.
&gt; Depends how you define unavailable. It becomes unavailable to teenage girls who may not have parental consent and do not have the means to get an out of state abortion. Women with precarious work conditions who may lose their job from missing work, social pressure due to having to explain the out of state trip, etc. Placing geographical restrictions on basic human rights is problematic in many ways... I'll grant that this is far from the ideal. However, a place like Alabama might only have one clinic to begin with, even now the ability to travel restricts access. It would take more than a demonstration that you're trading one restricted availability for another equally restricted availability before you can start sounding off that it's a cheap trick to steal those rights. &gt; Sure. I find it a bit weird to argue trying to reduce rape occurrences should be motivated by diminishing abortion rates, but I can't argue with your logic. Please don't think that this is the only reason why I want this done... it just happens to be the conversationally relevant reason. What you really need to ask yourself, is why the pro-lifers never mention this. Answer: they're not interested in reducing or eliminating abortion, despite the rhetoric. Not sure what that leaves, vengeful punishment of those involved? Dunno. &gt; The pill is not 100% effective, condoms can break... it's not always the result of being irresponsible, when it's someone else that's being irresponsible That's not exactly responsible. I'll grant that it's "less irresponsible". Besides which, we are talking about contraceptives that are 90some% effective. 90% reduction would go a long way towards muting everyone's criticism. &gt; her being irresponsible is not a very good reason to force her to have children... Point taken. That's why my strategy would be to do as much as possible to prevent the unwanted pregnancies in the first place. Trying to make it illegal, or even twiddle with the details of legality is a losing strategy. &gt; Anecdotes? Many people see any "abortion" wrong from conception Yes, you know, hell... I think I even saw one on ER once. Where the evil whore just likes to fuck around, can't be bothered to use birth control, and then tries to force the intern to give her an abortion (or maybe it was the gimp lady doctor, can't remember details). I'd personally be shocked if even 1 out of 1000 abortions have circumstances even approaching that. I doubt that many women at all are anything other than emotionally distraught. &gt; wrong from conception (plan B is not an abortion...) Not me. Implantation is the demarcation point, Plan B is at most morally ambiguous but more likely morally benign. &gt; for religious reasons and with no consideration for human suffering. Atheist here. &gt; This is what most of the debate about abortion revolves Can it even be called debate anymore? It's devolved into a continuous episode of ritualized taunting.
LSD stays in the body for up to 72 hours.  All drug effects are chain reactions, so I think I'm not understanding what you're getting at.  When you're tripping, LSD is in your body; (nearly) all of what you've consumed.
So... what is the preferred term? Frenchie?  "Say it right, Frenchie! It's *chow-dah*!"
Just more crap to keep the ignorant masses (I think that's us because we voted for these people) thinking that Congress really is doing something.  Does anyone actually believe the crap that Limbaugh, O'Reilly, and many, many other republicans dish out?  And, Congresswoman Nancy Pelosi, Senator Harry Reid, and the rest of the democratic party. Decades ago I actually thought we could trust our elected people at least some of the time.  Now, I think we can't trust any of them, any of the time.  Actually, I don't even know why I wrote this because nothing we write, say, or do makes any difference.  They listen to their constituents?  No.  They keep their promises?  No.  They support the constitution and the bill of rights?  Only those parts that they can bend to support their purposes. Guys, and Ladies, Socialism got you worried?  Hell, we are so close to communism it's just on the other side of the window.  Look outside, it's there waiting.  Oh, I almost forgot, you want to impeach the President?  Wake up and look at who the successor(s) will be.  You really want Vice President Cheney, Speaker of the House Pelosi, or President pro tempore of the Senate Robert Byrd, to be President?  Look it up, the rest of the chain of succession isn't any better.  Do I fell better now?  No.
Manying Wonderful Recipes Collections !
Dick Cheney to the conservative uber nazi's ?
[Here](http://distancelearning.ksi.edu/demo/bio378/DNA_files/image009.jpg) is the X-ray photograph of B-DNA from Rosalind Franklin and Maurice Wilkins. You are right in saying that the double helix concept is not Franklin's.  In fact, she wrote this [card](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Image:Rosalindfranklinsjokecard.jpg) rejecting the double helix DNA.
i'm just guessing here, but... is it possible that you were so successful in 1st year calc as a form of revenge against your teacher?  could it be that, in a roundabout way, his meanness aided you in the long run?
Wayne Gretzky.
&gt;Therefore United States and Israel must take appropriate action and bomb Iran. I am sure that's going to happen. Aren't you? Israel will very soon start a war with syria and iran and the US will be right there with them. Israel is dying to wage war with iran and syria. Hell they tried to start one by bombing syria but syria didn't defend themselves or strike back.  I am sure they will bomb syria some more in order to get them to retaliate.   
Bullshit, for a couple of reasons: 1.  Who the fuck is ever going to use calculus unless they're going to spend the rest of their lives doing advanced mathematics?  This kid is probably required to take this ridiculous, unnecessary class, and he's failing probably because he sees no way in which he will ever use what he's learning.  And he's right about that. 2.  Not everyone who fails at advanced math will end up working at McDonald's.  Get off your high horse and get rid of your goddamn elitist attitude.
Maybe they meant to order them [knives](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stiletto) but someone messed up and went with the shoes.
I love how it skips from System 7.5.3 to OS X, ignoring completely version 8 which looked better than 7.
I stand corrected by your greater knowledge.  My nerd sense was tingling slightly over the question of spelling, but I let it go.  Always a mistake.
Pleeeeease do it.  Pleeeeeease.
I'd hit it.....
Makes me think
&gt; he's basically tooting his own horn. IANAE, but he seems to write sincerely and he seems to form  arguments that an economist (likely readers of his book) could seriously evaluate and test -- and I've never seen the point of caring more about the speaker than about the message.
First Trent Reznor tells fans to steal his music and says he'll sell albums for $4 online once his label contract expires, now Radiohead are essentially giving their album away for free. I'm pretty sure we're witnessing the beginning of the end of the music industry- it might be a slow start, but once this movement gains a big of momentum I can't see many artists opting to join with an organization that takes roughly 90% of their profits when they could just cut out the middleman and release things independently online.
Nobody is gonna buy this shit. I hope Kuccinich forces the impeachment vote. Another charge is collusion with right ring terrorist groups like the America Enterprise Institute.
I never said it was a big deal, and I'm sorry for your recent trauma.  There always are worse things going on than some random comment on reddit, but I do like this community and some pigheaded comment about how "you'll never get a decent blowjob out of a skinny girl" is making it less and less a good place to be.  I don't think I have to be lightened up or unaware that there are worse things in order to point out a mindset that's becoming more and more common here.
by the button.
Yeh, it is. For what it was hoped to accomplish... namely, deflecting criticism long enough to sneak around doing whatever in the hell it is that they're up to. They added 1/8th as many troops again. Are we really supposed to believe that the probem was that they miscalculated by 12% ?
Oh, that must be why none of my phone calls to Michigan numbers are getting answered, and why the Michigan State, Detroit Lions and Detroit Tigers games all got canceled. I mean, who can even function when the government is closed?
You were tempted to rephrase the entire comment, but it just didn't seem worth the effort, right?  The presentation is so flawed, the sentiment so superfluous -- why bother? I'm with you, man. 
It's a game I ran into in a bar - you put in a dollar, and get to roll. The pot increases until someone rolls 4 or 5 out of 5. To make it fair, you can't join the pool after the first person has rolled the second time.
This paper makes the following assumptions about the reader:  - Familiar with naive set theory   - Familiar with sentential and predicate logic   - Heard of the Godel encodings used in the Incompleteness Proof In Section 3 I was lost, but this paper is an interesting overview of the progress (or lack of) in the P = NP issue.
It's nice to see this comment in context.  Juan Williams is a great journalist, and extremely credible.  While I don't necessarily see eye to eye with O'Reilly, the over simplification of his remarks, with no back story to support, smelled of a smear attempt.  Kudos, Juan!!
hahahahh... well normally I would back colubia but they kind of came off douches in the whole iranian president visit.
I wonder if the money actually even goes to them.  maybe they're just laundering it to a charity.
I'll reserve judgement then.
is it taking a while for anyone else to receive a confirmation email? [edit: it took about 2 hours, but I did finally get that confirmation, but it didn't have anything more than the number that was displayed on their confirmation page.]
If we prove P != NP, not much happens except some (extreme) satisfaction among mathematicians and people who like to follow them. We're currently basically operating under the assumption that it isn't. If we prove P = NP, with an algorithm to actually produce such results, then we do get a lot of nifty computer algorithms that might actually impact your life. You probably wouldn't notice it _per se_ any more than you say to yourself "Hey, if nobody ever found an efficient approximation to the traveling salesman problem my plane ticket would be $250 more", but it would certainly impact your life as companies large and small learn to take advantage of the resulting new algorithms. (Increasingly, business are algorithms.) It's like asking why you care about research into chemistry, or radioactivity, or advanced mathematics, or efficient graphical rasterization processes, or genetic engineering, or bajillions of other things that you "never use". Yeah, sure, ___you___ never use them. But you use the products created and the wealth generated by people who _do_ all the time.
A Paul-Obama contest would be great.  A Paul-Gravel or Paul-Kucinich contest would be even better.  We'd have an election with principled candidates coming from different perspectives, rather than "machine politics" candidates. Worst-case would be Giuliani-Clinton or Romney-Clinton or Thompson-Clinton. I'd also add that Paul as President would be great simply because he'd provide some balance.  I don't agree with all of his positions but I think he would provide a great counterpoint to Congress.  For everyone that is freaked out by his "extremism" or by any stand he has, consider that the President really only has veto power and a bully pulpit. In a Paul presidency, the nonsense Congress would be enable to enact would be limited to what they could get bipartisan support for a veto-override, with Dr. Paul (President Paul!) playing the devil's advocate on TV.  No more "51% = mandate!" arrogance.  That's the system working; that's a win for everyone.
Thats really funny.  I was kinda thinking the same thing.  It just looks like some tacky Piñata.
I had a teacher like that in junior high school. I was a year ahead in math, so I was taking high school freshman math in the 8th grade. I struggled all year long to hold a C+ average in the class. Things weren't clicking for me. Around March, I got a tutor. She helped me finally understand the material. I worked my ass off, doing both the regular class assignments and hers every week. My grades improved to the B range - not great, but I was getting better. My tutor saw progress, but my teacher's exams just kept derailing me. June came, and the state standardized test (the Regents) had me more nervous than I think I've ever been in my life. A couple days later, my tutor called me with the results. I scored a 98% on the exam. I lost the 2 points on a geometric proof which the grading of was subjective - most other teachers would have given me the 2 points, there really was nothing factually wrong with my answer. This "teacher" instead refused to believe that I had actually gotten a handle on the material and could do well enough to score perfect on the exam, so she found a way to screw me out of 2 points. She singlehandedly managed to ruin almost all desire I had to excel at mathematics in the future. My senior year calc teacher finished the job, but she's another story. They can both burn in hell.
Thats really funny.  I was kinda thinking the same thing.  It just looks like some tacky Piñata.
Wow, best birthday present ever!  Radiohead remains one of the only bands that I consistently buy albums of.
Sorry - but Obama's not making so much money by rejecting the interests of the usual suspects.  He talks a good talk - but it's his actions that speak the truth - and he's just playin the game a little quieter than the rest of them.  By not voting he keeps his record clean - and can still stand in front of crowds and make statements that draw limited press to keep his base happy. He's voted against timetables, he's backed funding, he didn't back up Murtha in 2005.  Since he's been in the Senate he's been protecting his interests - and his interest don't appear to be alligned with those of the majority.
Unethical Horse Seller taken to court and the breed association.  Website tell-all now circulating the internet!  Wooohooooo!   www.BadPasoFinoEthics.com
When did i claim it was stapled to anything?
My marriage is 3 1/2 years old now... its been far from perfect.
I wouldn't know because I suggested nothing of the sort.
Oh come on, you can't expect the legislators to actually work, can you? They *do* work for the government, after all.
There is no reason for you to freeze to death... if you live somewhere with moderate winters where it doesn't snow.
In a canon populated by such monikers as "Count Dooku", logic  and reason would have been no help to you.  Let go, nemo.  Feel the Lucasian grammar all around you. 
&gt; How do you "combat, contain, and roll back" actions that are taking place in Iraq by attacking Iran? By claiming that Iran was supplying support to insurgents.  Then, by attacking Iran you're "combating the insurgency in Iraq". I'm not saying this is the best or most sensible way to read it, just that it's *a* possible way to do it.  And, frankly, these days that's all the current US administration needs.
That is one of several things it would do. It would prevent the federal government from telling a judge he could not announce that Christians (Protestants, actually) get special treatment, it would prevent the feds from stopping the teaching of creationism, it would prevent the feds from stopping school organized prayer, it would prevent the feds from telling the states they could not set up a state religion, etc. 
MacGyver? Or [MacGruber?](http://youtube.com/watch?v=v51soNtkBKI)
&gt;Since the beginning of the Al-Aqsa intifada in late 2000, a total of 142 Palestinian women and 788 Palestinian children have been killed by Israeli forces. Where did you get this number from?  &gt;I would like to take this opportunity to go ahead and re-iterate to you the fact that this is completely irrelevant to this article, and the number of female Palestinian casualties is in no way associated to the validity of the claim that the Jersualem Post knowingly or intentionally led people to believe that the video surfaced from a Gaza honour killing. I disagree. I think it has a lot to do with it. Clearly the state of israel and the popular press in israel has an incentive to dehumanize palestenians so that their slaughter will be more acceptable to the israeli citizens and to the world at large. Stories like this are often used to dehumanize populations. It's a common tactic. &gt;I strongly encourage you to educate yourself on the matter before you start making baseless claims and making up false statistics, I got my numbers from amnesty international. If you have problem with my numbers take it up with them. &gt;your only purpose is to spread anti-Israeli sentiment  Absolutely true. Israel gets too much good press in the US and not enough negative press. They run an apartheid state and should be shamed into ending their vile behavior. They are too strong to defeat militarily so shaming them is a good tactic to try.   &gt;instead of encouraging understanding and promoting a peaceful solution. Peace can only be achieved amongst eaquals. Israel is not interested in peace because they hold all the cards. There will never be peace in the middle east.   
Oberweis, I'm disappointed! How could you not mention sex toys in the headline for this?
That's called ignoring the law, not reinterpreting it. Ignoring the law is where community standards come in, and what makes Redditer responses so laughable.  You guys don't live in that community, and you have yet to see how community standards will be applied because the guy hasn't been convicted before a jury of his peers.
Forget Ron Paul.  I think it's time to register Republican and vote Giuliani '08.
Hahahahaha!  Yes, Somalia is awesome.  Go move there. If you really believe that warlords are a product of the United Nations, why did they exist before 1948?  Edit: I still cant believe that you're touting Somalia as a libertarian success story.
how would we be losing our religious liberty?
He just threw a 15 to 20 lb rock off a cliff? Who the fuck does that?
&gt;how come that is such a big deal to you people? Because I don't want the government to tell me how to think.  &gt;concentrate on more important things like IRS raping you   &gt;every day, and FED printing your money then charging you   &gt;interest on it. &gt;i'm sick and tired of people complaining about these   &gt;irrelevant issues like gay marriage, abortion and religion. Abortion is not irrelevant to women, gay marriage is not irrelevant to gays, neither are irrelevant to people who know and care about women and gays, and religion is quite relevant when the government decides which one I should have.   
Man this almost made me cry.  I was there, but luckily wasn't one of the people pepper sprayed, although a number of my friends were.  My roommate was also shot with a rubber bullet (cant remember if it was the aug 22nd protest or another.. there were a few large ones that summer) I recall seeing the police with video cameras, but this is the first time I've seen footage from them. Luckily, I had my face covered :)
Interesting commentary.  Instead of shutting down out-of-context soundbite games, opponents of the Bush/Fox/network right-wing propaganda machine have merely learned how to play.  This isn't the first of these out-of-context, left-side attacks: I'm reminded of the Nelson-Mandella-is-dead Bush soundbite from a week or so ago.  It would be nice if we could stick to the truth no matter whose ox is being gored.
True.  I remember when they totally busted in on our Magic: The Gathering tournament and tazered us.
The analogy holds. The other person in the consensual encounter does not consent to receiving a sexually transmitted disease. It's a great unknown, far more unknown than, say, the risk of pregnancy.
So subtle that I have no idea what you're talking about.
Mo-HEEE-tos.
..you're right. upmoded.
If mass starvation is your idea of an OK libertarian government I will keep this "communist" one.   
Double cheeseburger? I'd hit it.
Anyone who falls for this pathetic campaign to increase tourism probably can't afford to go. And those that can afford to go, well, unless you're jewish, your odds are pretty slim they'd even fool around with you. Israeli girls are pretty arrogant. But really, who would want to spend their money in one of the largest terrorist state in the world, second to the USA?
That's not so cruel. It would be if it was a Wal-Mart application.
You can literally take the money and run.
&gt;When Gazans dig a tunnel under the border and enter Israel then attack an Israeli base killing and wounding and kidnapping Israelis then the Gazans are invaders. Wrong. Gaza is still under occupation. Israel controls the airspace, seas, and all the checkpoints into and out of gaza and always has. Gaza is a concentration camp. It's israels Auschwitz. &gt;Gaza is not occupied by Israel  The fact that you believe this tells me how much of a zealot you are. Gaza is under full control of the IDF. They can shut off the electricity, water, flow of traffic, or anything else they want. They can at any time roll their tanks in (and they have), they can and have shelled the cities, they can and have launched missiles into it.  
Anyone who thinks Ron Paul will make any difference for our country should remember that the only powers the President has is (1) veto, and (2) as commander-in-chief of the Armed Forces he (or she) act independently in defense of the nation.
Did you know that using keyboard shortcuts can save time and effort compared to only using mouse? If you can use both keyboard shortcuts and mouse, it can really speed up your computing task. All operating systems and a lot of softwares has keyboard shortcuts and hunting down each shortcut keys is tedious. Here is a database of shortcut keys.
In 1983 or 1984 when I was windsurfing in Alicante about 1 mile or so away from me a submarine surfaced. It scared me half to death. I'll never forget how terrified I was for about 3 seconds until I figured out what I was seeing. The Spanish navy should have some sort of signaling device, like sending up some balloons, to alert folks nearby. They appear to have been behaving irresponsibly for many years now.
This. 
I haven't finished this yet, but I'll respond to some of the beginning stuff. Personally, I only really care if we obtain a P = NP algorithm that can be implemented in the real world.  Proving that P=NP under certain axiom sets is not terribly compelling, as I expect it most likely would be traced back to a set of axioms (possibly one) that turns out to be isomorphic to assuming P=NP anyhow. We could always just take P=NP as an axiom directly, and invoke oracles, but that's not an interesting proof :) If we prove that P=NP is completely unknowable under implementable-in-the-real-world axioms, then as far as I personally am concerned, that's a proof that P != NP. Different from some abstract mathematical questions, an actual _algorithm_ is what we are looking for, and proving that we couldn't recognize it even if we had it or some such result is good enough for most of the interesting philosophical and all of the interesting practical considerations. __Edit__: Hey, this is basically the ending of the work, minus some musing and details the author adds. Cool.
That's impressive. Try quoting the rest of the sentence.
If the headline had read, **Obama has a history of not supporting We the People because of X, Y, and Z before**, that'd be an accurate headline based upon your comment. However, your headline is **Obama just set up Iran to be attacked**.   In fact, the article trumpets *neither your headline or your comment's claims*.   &gt;Sorry It's okay. Next time just be more accurate.
I remain disappointed that Rails 2 has not gone in the direction that David Hansson predicted during his keynote at 'Canada on Rails'. For those who weren't there, Rails 2 was going to be faster and smaller than 1.x, with significantly more code moved outside the core. While plenty of code has moved out of the core, the core itself is larger and slower than before. Perhaps after 2.0 there will be time to do some much-needed cleanup.
So....anyone make a taser joke yet?
Maybe I am 'teh suck', but I can't find out what quality the digital download is.  Anyone know?  If it's lossless format, then wow.
The teacher was looking for a better paying job but mistakenly attached his application while he was grading papers.
I wish I could give you more than 1 up vote for for invoking the Holy IPU (praise be unto her horn).
You can literally take the money and run.
Six years ago, I would have agreed that nothing like this could happen.  Now, I'm not so sure.
I would be annoyed that the were there in the first place.   &gt;I assume most people wouldn't get their panties in a bunch over one of the pictures you described in the privacy of their own homes, or, as it were, their own stall, unless they had some hate for themselves deep down. So you assume that an an insult is not an insult unless the person really hates themselves enough to take it as an insult? &gt;While men may be judged by their looks, a woman's intrinsic worth is judged by how she looks.  Oh, please.  Admit that women judge men on their looks.  Save me the "women judge men more fairly" bullshit.
Thank you.  The prologue alone tells me I am going to enjoy this review.
He could have sent a condom to the parents with a "use this in the future" message.
You don't see where it says that Section 4 only applies to federal law? You don't see section 3 and section 7 specifically saying that the Supreme Court has no jurisdiction over cases involving state laws about religion and Supreme Court precedents are invalid. Sigh. Email the Ron Paul campaign. Ask them if state laws about religion can be overturned by the Supreme Court under HR 300. 
Credits  Agency: Ogilvy Brasil - 1250  Name of the Ad: "Hallucination"  Client: Coop. Mútua-Ação Winner of a 'Galo de Ouro'(Gold Rooster) in the category external midia of the '15º Festival Mundial de Publicidade de Gramado' (15th Gramado's World Festival of Advertising) 
I would'nt. He is not threating my life or my family. Why would I? What, because I might not like what he says? He is an American, he has the right to say what he likes. Also if you look at his ratings, alot of people agree with him. You gonna waste them too? BTW still waiting for pics... 
Well played mosox, you got everyone.
I cannot read : (
just be sure to realize the checkout prices is given in pounds. 15 pounds = 30.50 usd :) 
&gt;Number 7, wtf is feminine psychology? You know, women employees' esteem wouldn't be hindered by their appearance if you didn't make that part of their job. You have clearly never met a woman. 
When he (secretly!) promised to reduce what they pay in taxes when elected. Well, wouldn't be all that unusual...
why the fuck was this posted ? lame
Also, while the knowledge *that* P!=NP wouldn't impact our lives all that much, as pretty much everyone assumes it to be true anyway, *how* we prove it might prove to be very practical indeed.  The history of mathematics is full of things that were of no practical value when they were discovered and later were found to be crucial to some other endeavor.
&gt;Easy. They share genetic markers. Just like you said. Hmm.. can you quote me saying that fishermen share genetic markers?  Or that the (geneologic) definition of ethnicity is genetic?  Try to keep your lies straight. &gt;You told me that there are many types of ethnic groups that are jews. I am simply taking your word for it. Sure. &gt;By the same token there are many types of ethnic groups that are fishermen. Sure.  Explain why fishermen form an ethnic group in the (geneologic) definition of ethnicity. &gt;Anti semite doesn't mean anti semite. It means anti jew. Now you have gone off the deep end.  Does anti semite mean anti jew or not?  Try think clearly before you type because this statement is gibberish. &gt;Try this  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Semite Glad you're using wikipedia to define things.  Perhaps now you can look up their definition of [ethnicity](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ethnicity) and read at least the first line.  Jews satisfy this definition.  Fishermen do not.
More like &gt; ... to combat, contain, and roll back the (violent activities and destabilizing influence inside Iraq) As in, "there's violence and a destabilising influence in Iraq.  We are allowed to combat (work against) the violence and influence.  If Iran is causing these problems then attacking the country of Iran would be acting to oppose the violence and destabilising influence. Hence the latitude to combat (work against) the violence and destabilising influence that presently exists in Iraq allows us to, say, attack Iran. &gt; The difference between your interpretation and mine is that if Iran blew something up in another country, yours would allow the U.S. to fight Iran within that other country as well, while my interpretation would require more legislation. If Iran hasn't caused any "violent activities," the U.S. can't fight them. Exactly.  But if, say, "conclusive proof" were found (like the "proof" for WMDs in Iraq) that the Iranians were backing the Iraqi insurgents, then one could battle the insurgency by cutting off their support (and attacking Iran). I'm not saying this (very legalistic) interpretation is likely, sensible or even explicitly intended... but it *is* a valid interpretation and the Bush administration has crawled through smaller loopholes than that already.
people who aren't very bright
Wikipedia clears up all: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Storey#Numbering "American and Canadian buildings typically omit the thirteenth floor in their floor numbering because of common superstition surrounding this number. The floor numbering may either go straight from 12 to 14, or the floor may be given an alternative name such as "Skyline". In some Asian countries, because the number four sounds like "death" in Chinese and related languages, it is sometimes skipped in hospital buildings, and some business buildings follow this convention as well."
Your not happy with the EPA so you title the post Bush's EPA, what a joke.  Why don't we blame him for all our problems.
Ever wonder why none of the sculptures had pupils?
I'm so sick of the ignorance in your country (not really sick of the ignorance itself but sick of the harm it does to others)
I'm hoping you're right! Here in .ie (and I presume elsewhere) there's a schizophrenia support group who jump up and down whenever this kind of things happens, saying "schizophrenia is *not* split personalities! It's not!" No-one ever learns though.
what is this "becoming" thing you speak of?
He used to be anti-Israel (which, IMO, is fair enough) but he seems to have become so anti-Israel that it's sliding into anti-Jewish.  Sad.
The probability of getting at least four of a kind when rolling five fair six-sided dice is 13/648, or about 1 in 50. You can show this by showing that there are (considering the dice to be distinct) 150 ways to roll four of a kind, and 6 ways to roll five of a kind, out of 6^5 = 7776 total possible rolls. (150 + 6) / 7776 = 13/648.
So you're saying you should have to follow a cops orders no matter what, as long as you understand them? Screw that, if a cop orders me to do something illegal or in an unlawful way, there's no way I'm complying.
More like precise acts of cleanliness. :)
I may never understand why some people feel the need to be an absolute tool under the cloak of internet anonymity, especially about the good ideas/works of others.
Displacement ... armament ... none of this tells me how it would do in an engagement with a racing yacht.
Agreed.  It's a bad example of why XML sucks.
I think it weakens the argument to say that the law is executed unequally. Drug war lovers can answer that by promising to find a way to execute the laws more justly. But then he changed his tune and compared the current prohibitions to the failure of Prohibition, that's a good tack to take. But then he contrasted our treatment of alcohol problems with our treatment of drug problems. That's fine as long as you don't assume use of any drug besides alcohol is automatically a problem. I still think he's a bit weak on these points, and needs to make his arguments stronger and more clear. 
sure, here is more http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=l4Nz6h6EwTE
No, but it brings an interesting combination of historical tolerance for fascism and devout religious belief together, doesn't it? ;-)
You have failed to correctly apply the definition.  There is not necessarily a common ancestry to arbitrary fishermen.  There is to the aforementioned ethnic Jews.
Oops, you're right.   Too long without a math class for me.  ;-)
everything, all of the time!
I lived south of Tampa, FL for 15 years. We had several category 1 hurricanes(74 to 95 mph sustained winds) during that time. Kids played in that wind. It is fun struggling to walk against the wind or running with it.  Look [Here](http://hurricanes.noaa.gov/pdf/hurricanebook.pdf) for real information about hurricanes from noaa. Never trust a newscaster standing in the rain trying to make it look more dramatic than it really is.
Interestingly, Israel also maintained strong relations with apartheid South Africa after almost every nation in the world had cut off ties with it.
At last, a way of identifying all the people I would never want to vote for, in one simple step.  This can't happen soon enough.
The problem is that one of the houses of the Legislature is Republican-controlled, and they will not accept any measure that raises taxes even one penny -- the budget must be balanced by slashing services. Note that Engler himself had already decimated social services in Michigan, year after year.  So there ain't much to cut.   But still, the Republicans who control the state Senate would rather destroy what little is left of the infrastructure than roll back any of Engler's tax cuts.   
Reading comprehension 101, with highlighting: &gt;The Supreme Court of the United States and all other Federal courts-- (1) are not prevented from determining the constitutionality of any ***Federal*** statute or administrative rule or procedure in considering any case arising under the Constitution of the United States
My point is Vista's kernel is *massively* different from Windows Server 2003. I mean, fuck, man, the network stack and audio system is *entirely new*, not to mention all the new APIs, stuff like I/O prioritization, etc. "Based on X" is not at all the same as "is X under the covers" (which implies that there is a layer of stuff over an unchanged core, presumably the kernel). I mean, what are you trying to say?
I feel the employers in 1943 were way smarter than today.
1. Obviously the MC application form under the test was placed higher so the title of the application form would be visible under the test.  2. If the clip was placed over the staple, it would prevent the paper from being bent and leaving any mark. P.S. Ahh raldi got it before me. Upvoted. 
The guy who was arrested appears to likely have been driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol. When he got pulled over he started arguing with the police officer. That was a big mistake. The police officer did overreact, but frankly had the man he arrested complied with the police officer's orders it seems very likely the entire problem would have been avoided. Or better yet, had the guy who was arrested chosen not to drink and drive (as it appears likely he did)it also seems very likely the entire problem would have been avoided. Do we really want police officers wasting their time arguing with drunk drivers? Do we really want people driving drunk in the first place?
This is an interesting point. So, are you saying that people who are accused of drunk driving should be handed summary judgments and corporeal punishment by the arresting officer in addition to the penalties applied by a court of law?
&gt;The current generations need to find some sense of responsibility, it seems to have been lost over the past 20 years. The past 20 years have ruined far too many lives because of over-protective parents, laws that unfairly work against those who cannot afford good representation, and misguided government policies (such as abstinence-only sex education) that have led to far more unwanted pregnancies than necessary. Historically, people across the world have had sex or gotten married at a very young age.  The fact that a 15 year old and a 17 year old are having sex is about as natural as you can possibly get.  More than 500 years ago that would have been fine just about anywhere in the world. *We* are living in a morally backwards society that refuses to let "children" grow up.  Adolescents are treated as perpetually stunted children when they are capable of so, so much more.  In my generation (I'm 23 right now), 15 year old "kids" were making websites that made a lot of adults jealous.  But they cannot engage in consensual sexual activities because the laws in this country deem them "incapable" of making such decisions. There are irresponsible adults just as there are irresponsible teenagers.  The girl's father in this case sounded to me like the perpetrator.  Both the boy and the girl sound like victims to me -- victims of stupid laws, victims of this backwards society, and victims of those who would rather back these backwards laws and societal views than care for the *actual* well-being of the next generation.
He said used LSD and it helped him, he didn't say he had _the_ breakthrough _while_ on LSD. However Kary Mullis did. Nonetheless, LSD is a very very dangerous drug, and anyone who uses it is playing with fire. I knew someone who tripped over 100 times. A very brilliant student, at a top 15 University, who committed suicide while on LSD who by all accounts outside of his LSD use, was a happy person. He stabbed himself in the stomach, and a good friend of mine discovered, then his roommate, discovered him barely alive. He did not make it. I pray that in the afterlife he has found some peace and repentence for the mistakes he made. Rest in peace Zach.
These are the same people voting for bush and telling everyone we gotta turn Iran into glass cuz they hate our freedom.
The Parable of the Old Man and the Young by Wilfred Owen. PS: All you have to do is to copy and past one of the lines onto the almighty Google, and Allah.
?
A studly guy with a jock attitude to the mountain, and no care for it's preservation?
Any idea what the file format is for the download? I couldn't find it on the site, and it's gotten so slow I'm unwilling to keep looking :-P
It will be around until 9/11 is thoroughly and properly investigated
Will there be any self-respecting female police  left after this?
Yes. Seven years. More than 40% of my life.
obituaries or it didnt happen.
&gt; Switzerland has some mountain subs *Super*marines?
&gt; "Idiots, and cowards too. But still valued, hardworking, recognized co-workers." For some reason, this is my favorite thing I've read today.
It's ok. Some people can't read.
It's gods all the way down, apparently. To the bottom of the pyramid, at least.  And they feared themselves, and they saw that it was good.
You must have me confused with someone else.  My mom had me when she was 21.  Her dad took care of her until he died of a massive coronary when she was 18.  If I have a daughter, she won't be scared of sex and she won't use it to rebel or use it to manipulate people or try to coerce love out of them or any of the fucked up wrong reasons people have sex.  If she wants to get involved in all the complicated crap that comes with a sexual relationship, she'll know how to go about it and she won't end up pregnant or diseased.  My guess is that she'll stick with sex toys for quite awhile, though.  They're much less trouble.
there is some irony here isn't there
Well well... a hot bitch is bitch, a friendly husky is friendly, a jumbo size bitch? They are just a pile of shit and no one give them a damn, and are thus out of our discussion or our universe.
How?
I wonder how long I can make my Treo 650 last, and not recommit to AT&amp;T...?  hmm...gotta hand it to google for this type of forward thinking, and large checkbook.  This could get VERY interesting....   
Consistently = whenever they're released, I guess.
.. because you think reddit users are too stupid to look 5 text lines up on their screens to read the whole thing themselves? I suspect you're trolling. See ya.
They should all be caned.
I'm glad you can now see why your predictions are ludicrous.  Predictions of this type lead to idiocy.  (Hence BTW, you are an idiot, according to your "reasoning"). &gt;Hell they tried to start one by bombing syria but syria didn't defend themselves or strike back. Oh yeah? Do you mean the bombing [Syria claims did not happen](http://www.ynetnews.com/articles/0,7340,L-3454940,00.html) or was there some other bullshit rolling around between your ears?
Wow, when did this happen? I've been to that building several times.
Is it that artist Bansky again?
I am afraid to see "Complex Haskell Web Programming with HAppS"
Yeah, what's next? "Oh hey, there's a boulder on the edge of this cliff, and a log I can use for a lever. Now I just need a fulcrum..." 
This is *ancient*. 
Here you can see actually building one:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=t1MkjHDs78U&amp;mode=related&amp;search=
so cool
From Greenspan's book: &gt; The tax-cuts issue briefly became a media circus. That week, more than 450 economists, including ten Nobel laureates, published a letter arguing that the tax cuts proposed by Bush would drive up the deficits without much helping the economy; the White House countered with a letter, signed by 250 economists, supporting the plan. I knew many of the names-- the 450 were mainly Keynesians and the 250 were mainly supply-siders. Even so, I resist Creationism-convenient narratives that pretend that experts of a field don't have important areas of consensus -- The Myth of the Rational Voter is all about testing economic consensus against the views of noneconomists. And: [this 3-party forum on US Manufacturing (mp3)](http://www.catomedia.org/archive-2007/cpfa-09-25-07-1.mp3) touches in place on protectionism -- the need for it against foreign VAT, and of penalties to US industry Y when US industry X achieves protectionist measures.
Everyone has a little guy in their head constantly second guessing you and challenging you. I dont know why so many people cant handle that but its not a disease.  An often thing to see is stoners who cant handle it thinking they they are schizophrenics AND RECIEVING MEDS TO LEGITIMIZE IT IN THEIR MINDS. of course they are told to stop smoking weed and what do you know? they are cured!
Wow, impressive none of them hit eachother.
Asshole. Speaking as a Kansas stoner, some of us here are a little more evolved.
That link matched your headline, and makes much more sense.  Thanks!  She obviously is NOT against commercializing her music, but is selective in who she allows to commercialize it.
That's a hell of a problem to fix. You'd basically have to get rid of the infestation of morons that currently runs the place and replace them with a legion of people that are actually competent.
muahahahahaha ::evil grin::
I guess I just take insults more to heart when they're attached to people, especially people I know/ care about. But not everyone is the same, and you're right, an insult is still an insult, no matter how innocuous others may find it. But I think you're missing my point on women's actual value being judged on looks. There are a million and one examples of this but one that comes to mind is the media's coverage of Hillary Clinton: people comment on her clothes/ cleavage/ face/ general attractiveness/ hair cut to lesbian ratio/ etc. This  highly superficial level of analysis would NEVER happen in the case of male politician. And this is what I find offensive and sexist. Having your own idea of what you find attractive in the opposite sex is not sexist. Superficial maybe, but not sexist.
Bush the clown. This jerk thinks he's something and he is ... a hopeless fool plus all the rest ... fascist, warmonger, liar, deserter, fanatic  freak. How nice he represents the USA to the rest of the world. He makes my skin crawl.
&gt;Rodolph, a 23-year-old Iraq war veteran from Casper, won't face criminal charges for the incident.  isn't that the case with a lot of Iraq veterans these days? I wish more of them were   "wracked with guilt and remorse"
These are the same people who think beating their kids is fine.
Unfortunately you're bright enough to regurgitate arguments for treating others like shit but not bright enough to really look at why they are wrong (and why you have missed the point completely with your last comment).
you have exactly described what i am feeling as I am going through my engineering degree, I have hit the wall...
It's sorta like doing it on a bear-skin rug, only the bear is still in the skin here.
Sorry :-(
radiohead recently added their albums for digital sale to amazon, and some other MP3 internet vendors. they did not put them on itunes.  i would guess that the file will be in mp3.
That sounds like An Idea Whose Time Has Come
&gt;Where did you get this number from? Palestinian Center for Human Rights &gt;I disagree. I think it has a lot to do with it. Clearly the state of israel and the popular press in israel has an incentive to dehumanize palestenians so that their slaughter will be more acceptable to the israeli citizens and to the world at large.  &gt;Stories like this are often used to dehumanize populations. It's a common tactic. Baseless statements &gt;I got my numbers from amnesty international. If you have problem with my numbers take it up with them. You got one number from Amnesty.  The rest you made up. &gt;There will never be peace in the middle east. There will be peace, however it will not be thanks to people like you.   [Palestinian Center for Human Rights](http://www.pchrgaza.org/) [Israeli Information Center for Human Rights in the Occupied Territories](http://www.btselem.org/)
Yeah, they should do what Conor Oberst does, and put out 2 shitty releases every year.
But that would ruin the surprise!
Plus have all feeds go onto the net live in realtime for citizen monitoring/entertainment.
RTFA
1.16
oh the horror
The Swiss department of Amnesty International has started a creative ad campaign, by using transparent billboards. References are made to Sudan, Iraq, China, Liberia and other countries.
OK - it's a bad headline - whatever you say.  Your congress just gave Bush everything he needs to attack Iran as part of the War on Terror.  He no longer requires congressional approval.  But your main concern is that I'm offending your pet candidate.  Why don't you tell him to get his ass off the campaign trail (which is the reason he gave for not voting on this MINOR issue), crawl out of the pockets of his corporate doners, and start calling for Pelosi to step down as speaker.  If he does that, I'll be right there with you.
They sure have been haunting me for years.
Share it..
&gt; If we prove P = NP... You probably wouldn't notice it per se any more than you say to yourself "Hey, if nobody ever found an efficient approximation to the traveling salesman problem my plane ticket would be $250 more", but it would certainly impact your life Thank you for a great example - every time someone asks this kind of question ("so what has abstract research field X ever done for me?") it turns out they just don't have any idea how most of the things in their life work. I get asked things like this a lot, so thanks for the great airline ticket example to demonstrate how even "useless" science questions are, actually fundamentally improving all our lives on a daily basis, whether the peanut gallery realises it or not.
I know what he means, but he didn't say what he means.
As someone who loves America the fact that Al-Jazeera is covering this (and not American MSM) is deeply ironic.
Warmongering, race baiting, wedge issues,...lying, cheating, stealing, it's he seems to do-oo-oooh.
 This is terrible. People should be severely punished for this! Missing homework!  In Hindu culture, your parents come first, then your teacher, then the rest of elders. Meaning, the only ones who can override your teachers are your parents, and you have to follow all your teacher's instructions. Its a pretty stupid idea, considering that not all teachers are smart.  In India, I lived there the first 9 years of my life, I was beaten in school with a huge wooden stick in the second grade for missing my homework, but nothing even CLOSE to this!
Surprisingly accurate, even by todays standards!
&gt; They must hurry, however, for wind conditions can cause the channel to freeze again, cutting off the whales' access to air. That really puts my 'problems' into perspective. Just what I needed at this moment.  Thanks.
I feel utterly betrayed.
&gt;Bad deal. India still living in brbaric times unlike us amerikans A majority of Indians can still spell better than you.
That is truly weird. What really happened?
You, sir, have won the "roflcomment of the week" award. It comes with 1 minute of *well-deserved* smugness and 2 minutes of satisfaction. Enjoy.
Tomorrow's headline? Michigan doesn't notice!!!!
It's not a bill of attainder unless its 1) directed at an individual not a class and 2) a punishment.  So a bill that took Nixon's papers wasn't a bill of attainder because the he was a legitimate class of 1 (watergate president?) and they weren't taking the papers to punish.   So they'll say it directed at the class of unpatriotic schools (or something better than that) and that government funding is a privilege not a right, so its not a punishment.  
Strangely, I find myself sympathetic to this case. Limited personhood for certain species does not cause me any problems. Also, does anyone know if this is the same "Pan" that could speak a few words? As memory serves, there was a young chimp from the 70s who could say "cup", "pee", a few others that escape me...
"Meanness" is not a valid teaching/motivational technique. Teachers should not be telling every student in the classroom how every other student performed on an exam. That's bullying. That's meanness for the sake of being mean. Even if every student scored a 90 or higher, *someone* has to get their paper last, and the other students will be assuming the worst about that student's grade. Teachers getting away with shit like that is one of the many things wrong with tenure.
It's a bit more Fark than Reddit. I still think it's funny, and it's an interesting fact. When I was a kid reading about Kasparov's battle with Deep Blue I never imagined that he would someday lead a political party, let alone lead what seems to be the main opposition against someone like Putin.
When its your turn to try to make money from your own hard work (whatever that may be - research, code, books, ideas, or most likely, burgers) I hope people pay you cents on the dollar for what you deserve too. The universe is a circle, and karma is a bitch. Remember the shit you do, because that shit always comes back to you.
and I said she "looked Jewish".  If I saw a picture of Michael Jordan in an article, but nowhere in the article did it say he was black, am I not allowed to say that he's a black man?  The Jewish faith is comprised of a group of people with a common ancestry, so Jews as a whole do indeed have certain features that aren't too difficult to pick out.  So far you seem to be the only asshole on this thread that appears racist.
Fight Club? There's... no such thing. What... are you talking about? Don't be crazy. therulesidiot
Should be no surprise the majority on here are siding with the boy. Since most on this site are roughly the same age and just a socially underdeveloped as the boy in the story.
&gt; mass starvation[,] in the post-Green-Revolution era, does not occur except through extraordinarily bad politics. &gt; I will keep this "communist" one. So long as you don't live in Zimbabwe, dear. &gt; your idea of an OK libertarian government What I've actually said is what I've actually meant.  What I haven't said at all, I'm not inclined to defend.  I lean on markdown quotes so that people can [see what I respond to](http://politics.reddit.com/info/2v3u4/comments/c2v6sa).
From the Wikipedia article:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/In_Rainbows "On its initial release, the album will be made available exclusively as a digital download from inrainbows.com, with a special "disc box" available by mail containing two CDs and recordings on LP vinyl. While the disc box is priced at ₤40 and includes the digital download, the price when purchasing just the download by itself is set by the buyer (plus a transaction fee of 45 pence). On purchase, the buyer is prompted to type the desired price, with the text "It's up to you" as an explanation.[14]"   
Bitchin, on my birthday....
eheheh. nice one :)
Glad to see you acknowledge that Israelis want to get out of the aforementioned occupied territories (since I can only assume your silence is that of acquiescence).  You're welcome for the links. &gt;Wrong. Gaza is still under occupation. Israel controls the airspace, seas, and all the checkpoints into and out of gaza and always has. Gaza is a concentration camp. It's israels Auschwitz. Wrong.  Gaza is not still under occupation.  Israel does not even control their border with Gaza, as is evidenced by the fact that Gazans persistently attack Israel from across the border.  The border with Egypt has no control over it.  Hamas was easily able to get enough guns into the country to topple the Fatah government.  If Gaza was under full control of the IDF then there would be no Hamas. &gt;The fact that you believe this tells me how much of a zealot you are. Hey, just taking a page from the malcontent paradigm of thought!  I am especially amused to see that you can't even tell when your moronic statements are being mocked.  Your superficial understanding is evidence of your zealotry.
1. *My* congress? You must be assuming that I'm an American and somehow have the power to elect all 435 members of Congress.   2. *My* pet candidate? You must not have read any of my posts before if you think I would prefer Obama to either Kucinich or Paul.   3. *Why don't you..*  Why don't you acknowledge that I and tens of thousands of people like me who made phone calls days ago while the amendment was debated are the reason the most vicious parts were eviscerated? 4. *start calling for Pelosi to step down as speaker.*  We'd have to have a fine and mighty reason for Mr. Obama to do so since he is in the Senate and she is in the House.  What do you propose?
Different war, and only one sub section of the ANZACs, but c.f. the [maori battalion](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/M%C4%81ori_Battalion#Deployment) &gt;Such was the respect for the Maori Battalion that they were frequently used as a spearhead unit. General Bernard Freyberg, the General Officer Commanding of the 2nd NZEF, commented "No infantry had a more distinguished record, or saw more fighting, or, alas, had such heavy casualties, as the Maori Battalion."
Hey. It doesnt harm anyone and doesnt anger the natives...
Man, that was some ugly Python, looked almost like Perl.
You're witnessing the beginning of the beginning of the music industry.  What is dying is the outdated and unnecessary distribution industry.
Subgraph isomorphism may help to find new drugs since it is used for chemicals if an P time algorithm is found for it.
Substitute Mohammed for Jesus (works even better).
I've thought about that a lot, actually, and I don't think he had anything to do with my success in those University-level classes, or anywhere else for that matter. I was nervous as all hell when I walked into that 1st year lecture hall, but I found the stuff a snap once I wasn't being bullied.  If I had troubles, I'd just sit down with the book and patiently puzzle it out.  No biggie:  It was just another challenge. Contrast that in High School, where I would face certain humiliation if I didn't manage a decent grade on a test.  Far from concentrating on the problems, I'd spend the test worrying about the shame when, yet again, I'd receive my Calc. grade dead last. The only lesson that asshole taught me was that some people in petty positions of power will abuse their station.  Fortunately, their pathetic crap (and, essentially, their entire lives) will amount to little more than a former student's casual story over drinks. Not the legacy a teacher should aspire to.
Radiohead are lovable nerds... I have a feeling its going to be a good quality file.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thousand_Islands http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Boldt_Castle A good handful of those pics are in the US as well as Canada, but you're right about them being on the St. Lawrence. It's a wonderful area to visit during the summer.  The weather and water are gorgeous from May-October, but it can be brutal during the winter. /1st comment evar.
Mugabe should be tried for crimes against humanity.
uh...oh yeah...this was one of my favorite albums back in my time, but I forgot to bring it with me.  I'm itching to hear it again, so I want to make sure that I get it as soon as possible. /...whew...almost blew my cover
finally, someone who understands how punishment works
In fact, why have a U.S. at all? Let each state be its own sovereign government. If they want to be defended, they can hire someone to do that. Why should we have a bill of rights at all or a federal government to tell the states what to do? 
EDIT: I can tell by the *pixels*.  ... Die, meme, die!!!
Ok, here I am. http://goatse.cz/
You're definitely right. Click: [Aphex Twin: Richard D. James Album](http://images.google.com/images?q=richard+james+album)
True. I have a high tolerance (ding!) and my roommate hits it once and passes out. I don't think a "dose" is the same for everybody. That would suck if you were allotted a single pill that does nothing.
Maybe would be nice but some states depend on federal funds too much it would be too hard for some states.
Painful irony, ah yes, would that be where I can implicate Jewish hatred of Muslims as a contributing factor in the murder of over a million Semites in Iraq and be called an anti-Semite for my troubles?
I believe it is not, since the surname "Pan" was added recently.   Unless maybe the article you read about the 1970s chimp was written recently, as well.
&gt;"We find that Somalia's living standards have improved generally … not just in absolute terms, but also relative to other African countries since the collapse of the Somali central government." You guys might actually want to read the linked article before spewing your knee-jerk bullshit
Give the Palestinians the right to vote in the lands taken from them in 1947-8. I think that's a VERY good idea. Does anybody have a rational objection to this?   
The Concept of "Face" in Chinese Culture For those of you not versed in Chinese culture, you should know about the Chinese concept of "face". Face as a concept is easy to understand because it is very similar to the notion of "reputation". Interestingly, face is actually a "bankable" notion in Chinese culture.
So how do I find the "actual" page starting with *http://farm1.static.flickr.com/153/376387290_7396c48b3b_o.jpg* ? I actually found this photo browsing some collection of photos blog site and spent about 10-15 minutes with google trying to find the source.  What I posted was as close as I could get. 
go ahead and have sex with an underage girl. thatll show 'em. way to stand up to authority, i suspect it will get you to jail
They look like ants. And, hmm. thats weird. At 0:30, a LOT more planes show up!
Not by necessity: only because unprincipled, paid-for politicians stall. It's the nature of bureaucracy. Trade benefits both parties, so unilateral trade liberalization is a benefit. "Fair trade" is a bogeyman invented by protectionists. Show me a button that will immediately end tariffs, subsidies, and other trade barriers, and I'll press it.
TFA does not explain how it is she strangled herself.
Given a 3SAT problem, P would solve it through brute force. NP would solve it as if it has some clues and give the answer faster. It seems that NP has that extra clue (or knowledge) P is lack of. Quantum system does have some properties of NP in a sense that it claims to have the answer already. But to make it spit out observable answer, one would complicate the quantum system to work as hard as P. If a clever mathematician discovers some hidden clues in 3SAT problem so that my laptop can solve it in exponentially smarter way than usual brute force way, that can be something notable.
Please stop using Jesus as an excuse for war.
5 tablespoons of thoughts, 3 fresh and ripe opinions, with a pinch of salt. Serve chilled.
Here is good information on how to pick yourself up and get moving towards becoming wealthy..
I'm glad to see them doing this.  I really wish they had some preview streams available though.  I mean, I'd pay $50 easily for another "Pablo Honey".  I wouldn't want to pay $10 for another "Amnesiac" though.  Is this album more experimental?  That's not really my speed.  Experimental films are great but for some reason I can't interest myself in experimental music.
Yeah, that's true.
See: 4chan
Summary: As the former First Lady of both Arkansas and the the nation, and as a senator (a distiction shared by many candidates) Hillary is no stranger to the spotlight of the political arena. Her experience has given her an interesting mix of very liberal and somewhat conservative stances across the board. With very progressive/liberal policy statements on health care and women’s rights, and education she certainly tows much of the party line. However, Hillary seems in some ways more conservative than her party mates in areas like national security and an older brand of foreign policy. All-in-all Hillary Clinton promotes sustainability in many very strong ways, but only in her campaign proposals solidify in very specific ways.
&gt; Edit: I still [can't] believe that you're touting Somalia as a libertarian success story. If you can't believe something, why choose anyway to believe it?  I certainly haven't given you any reason to believe this.
That'll just keep those "really red" states from having any influence in future elections.  Let them have their party... please?
&gt;OK you're right, it's the sand niggers persecuting the poor, innocent, fair-dealing Israel lobby. Hmm... If I'm not mistaken, this was your little gem, correct?  Now, just like you insinuated, I'm no genius. But your pathetic attempt at sarcasm was noted.  Then you provide a link to wikipedia's entry on Godwin's Law, for no reason whatsoever except to demonstrate that a teenager like yourself knows that it exists.    Stupidity is unoriginal.
Sounds like you'd rather take it from someone rather than earn it yourself. A very typical liberal with a mentality of entitlement.
&gt; There desperately needs to be some kind of penalty for legislators who knowingly pass unconstitutional laws. You mean like getting voted out of office?
I have that sewing machine, its much bigger than that. Well, unless the guy is a giant.
Hmmm... Did a poorly trained and unsupervised guard improperly apply a chokehold?  I wonder where the video surveillance footage regarding this has disappeared to?   
I have that sewing machine, its much bigger than that. Well, unless the guy is a giant.
Hmmm... Did a poorly trained and unsupervised guard improperly apply a chokehold?  I wonder where the video surveillance footage regarding this has disappeared to?   
What you call a convenient psychological line sounds suspiciously like a rationalization. Isn't the question of viability, *i.e.*, when residence inside Mommy is more convenience than necessity, more important than position?
What is wrong with you people?  Have you never thrown a rock? I'm a climber and I don't think this guy is guilty of anything worse that mild carelessness.  That throw was a one in a gazillion.   (Probably.  The article says the victim was on a new route, so I'm assuming the thrower had no idea that people might be there.)
Columbia will sue, it will be appealed, they will appeal, etc, etc until it gets to the Supreme Court.  Then, the Supreme Court might not even hear it.  They meet for only a short time and can only hear a tiny fraction of the cases they need to rule on.  There are hundreds of guys whose occupation is to create laws.  We have 9 people whose job it is to get rid of the bad ones.  Run that system without a reboot for 200 years and the end result should be pretty damned predictable.
Samurai Jack rules! Who doesnt agree?
I'd imagine so, but I would like to know exactly what I'm going to be buying before I decide much I'd like to pay for it :)  Lossless is worth a lot more for me so I can transcode it for various purposes.
That is funny.
I used to ... when I was 10.
Really good article on first birthday party ideas.
&gt; Nokili, you have no honor or shame. Instead of downmodding me, refute me. Refute what?  And dude, you're at -39 as I write this, I'm going to guess you're getting downmodded because of something you said. I wonder what that could be?
Nah, this was years ago. Was raised as a human as a baby, walked bipedally somewhat, some speech. Some claimed it was evidence of him being a "missing link", but the consensus was, I believe, that he was just the chimp equivalent of a genius. Hell, thinking about it, I could even be wrong on the name.
So tell me, what are these traits? As you seem to be the resident expert on the physical features of homonoids, I would love it if you could explain your scientifically rigorous approach on what a Jewish female looks like. That way, we can have it as a reference, so that whenever we see a female of similar attributes, we'll know right away if they're a Hebe or not.  So please, enlighten me.
Haven't logged in and voted up any articles on reddit in a long time, but felt obligated to do so in this case as Juan Wiliams is pure class all around, and the progression of how this story made it around the internet and on to CNN is a perfect example of how important issues or events or get compressed into clips/blips/blurbs/soundbytes to such an extent they become meaningless or downright misleading...
Surely they'll abandon their ignorant ways after seeing that.
I'm willing to give him six more months to get it right.
*It's in the frakking ship!*
archived('c2v815')
Bullshit. There are plenty of teachers who suck donkey balls and couldn't teach their way out of a wet paper bag.
What a surprise. You chime in after the battle is over and the carcasses are rotting in the field. Just another sneak thief looting the corpses. 
Well, I can tell you, endometriosis and polycystic ovaries can make them pretty crazy. My mother had crazy mood swings.   
Depends on what you consider necessary. I don't think it's right to just get up one day and say, "And the subsidies end... NOW." I'd say at least a five year commitment to current subsidies, and then five more years of gradual elimination.  But I could see why you wouldn't accept this, because you're right, in five years politicians would go, "Just five more years of subsidies, then we'll lower them, we *promise*!" In the ideal world, free-trade agreements would have the end in sight and could only be amended to expedite the process.
The _We The People Act_ says that federal courts can overturn *state* laws if they conflict with the First Amendment. Section 4 says that they can still overturn *federal* laws. That means that the act does prevent the federal courts from making the states adhere to the Constitution for those issues.    
Online Trading resources to help you develop effective trading strategies
So tell me, what did you mean by your original comment? Now that you're here, I'm dying to know.
There is Policeman Inside all our Heads He Must Be Destroyed
&gt; Suppose we prove it.. what happens? It seems unlikely that "anything happens" because if it did we might be able to verify or contradict p = np. The flaw in that argument is that you're assuming that designing an experiment that would ensure that the right "anything" happened is easy to do. Proving that P=NP is, in principle, really easy -- just demonstrate an algorithm that can solve SAT in polynomial time.  The question is, if you can't do it, is it because it's fundamentally impossible (P!=NP) or because you just weren't smart enough?
Spoiler alert, *please*!
this is completely awesome. I love this teacher.
How many pounds is $15 USD... like 1, maybe 2?
He's an untreated alcoholic... you couldn't have a beer with him because he doesn't drink.
A huge portion of our so-called "taxes" goes to pay interest to bankers on money loaned to our state, local, and federal governments. Who gave these bankers the "right" to issue our fucking money then charge us "interest" on it?
I had this English teacher in ... I think it was 6th or 7th grade. She used to caution us against using adjectives like "always, worst, best, greatest and never." You get the idea. Absolutes. This is not the worst news cell companies could ever have. This is only a *potential* new competitor; not even an actual competitor. When I hear, "the worst news ever" I think something like, "cell phones give you genital herpes."
http://www.ilovejackdaniels.com/cheat-sheets/regular-expressions-cheat-sheet/ Insert mandatory xkcd reference here.
Fair enough, but what would be a good price?  I didn't listen to any of the songs, to Radiohead in fact, for years;  I think should expect some downtempo popish stuff but I have in fact no Idea what's their style.  I find the idea interesting and worth encouraging.  So, how much?
asshole.
Am I the only one who finds it funny how many non-American English speakers will be talking in meters in one moment, then the next they'll be telling you how many inches of room you need. If you're going to use metric, use it exclusively (at least they use it, though)! English-speaking countries are so odd.
sorry, i only use this name. if you want to pretend there's one person with lots of accounts downvoting you, go ahead.
haha. pablo honey
Hello?! Ron Paul!!
&gt;because Belgium doesn't exist. Have some decency. We don't approve of using such harsh language on reddit.
It's really not fair to compare the Clintons or even Daddy Bush to the younger Bush.  Even daddy wasn't this batshit and definitely not Bill. This feels like a Republican talking-point now-a-days.  Take part in its repetition at your won risk.
&gt;Hmm.. can you quote me saying that fishermen share genetic markers?  No, I claim that fishermen share genetic markers. My claim comes from the fact that all humans share genetic markers. &gt;Or that the (geneologic) definition of ethnicity is genetic?  Huh? That's not true for all jews so why should it be true for all fishermen? &gt;Explain why fishermen form an ethnic group in the (geneologic) definition of ethnicity. They are an ethnic group by virtue of their culture just like jews. Not all jews share carry the same genetic traits, you said so yourself. &gt;Does anti semite mean anti jew or not? I don't think so but you do. That's how this conversation started. &gt;Jews satisfy this definition. Fishermen do not. Sure they do. All it takes is "recognition by others as a distinct group,"  It's the only part of the definition that applies to jews as well since they don't all have the same genology, language etc. Oh according to that definition muslims and christians are also an ethnic group because they share religion. Like I said, everybody is an ethnic group.     
What's with all the support for the IPU?  Everyone knows she's a hypocrite who's going to cut funding for the World Wildlife Fund.  Cthulhu/FSM have my vote.
Yes! Please do this! Get all the loons in one place so most Americans can see you for what you are!  
Of the 9 UN Human Rights Council condemnations, all 9 have been against Israel and only Israel. Say what you will about criticizing Israeli policy, but for the world governing body to ONLY condemn Israel and ignore Tibet, Cuba, Burma, North Korea, and oh yeah, SUDAN (to name a few) is pretty ridiculous.   
&gt;There is to the aforementioned ethnic Jews. Not all jews. Just the Ashkenazim.  You yourself said they have a different ancestry then european or african jews. 
No shit ... seriously ... do people really need to be spoonfed everything. You would think this is common knowledge by now. the US is top arms seller to the WHOLE WORLD. 
again, I'm *not* using numerous names. What you're seeing here is this concept called "multiple people that think you suck."
Which model will America finally choose?
but don't you get it, ron paul is talking about individual liberty all your arguments are irrelevant if you are free to do whatever you want. he talks about individual freedoms, and you're worried about freedom for gays to get married if gays have individual freedom they could do whatever they want. stop freaking out about irrelevant things.
Try programming reddit. There's still lots of cruft, but less cruft than the front page.
Pitchfork will have a field day.
fuck you radiohead, for ripping off other people's ideas of how to sell music. you suck and i hope you all die horribly.
yeah radiohead really needs the dough
He did, if you know the domain. "Going wrong" has a very specific meaning in this context (lack of progress in the evaluation due to what we call a type error). The slogan was introduced 20-30 years ago, so I'd say the authors can safely use it without explanatory footnotes.
yeah, being british, pompous and playing shitty music is really hard work. fuck major label rich assholes.
Why is a Brazilian ad in English?
I think you're confused, you aren't paying them to not release the album. And surely no one that listened to Pablo Honey would encourage a re-creation. Upmodded though because musical tastes are wholly subjective. I couldn't give 2 shits what some Rolling Stone reviewer thinks of an album.
This is so spiteful, I cant actually believe that this is happening in this country.
HAMA SUSHI OWNER IS ALSO DYING OF AIDS,THAT JAPANESE BASTARD!
So your an anal non-American who apparently is, or wishes they were an editor, but as you apparently are a big fan of politics as usual - you may even be a politician.  Obama has a mouth, I wouldn't care if he uses it to name Pelosi or Reid first - I just wish he would use it.  I'm not talking about politics as usual. At least we can agree on Kucinich - but also Ron Paul?  The spectrum of your political opinion appears to be a little wide.
He is a Nazi puppy killer too.  Each time someone questions Israel, a puppy or kitten dies.
&gt;Oh yeah? Do you mean the bombing Syria claims did not happen or was there some other bullshit rolling around between your ears? The general consensus is that israel did indeed bomb syria and even had ground troops to capture suspected nuclear material.  That's according to the BBC.  In any case israel violated their airspace which is an act of war. They are clearly trying to goad syria into a war with them. 
What?  His internal temp is colder than the ambient temp? Don't think so. Use white next time.
Detroit is a perfect example of the long, slow death when trade barriers will be lifted Real Soon Now. Don't forget: trade barriers are harmful to consumers. Yes, of course people line up at the public teat, but they have no rightful claim to this special privilege.
What the hell is [this](http://www.freep.com/apps/pbcs.dll/article?AID=/20070930/COL32/709300546/1070/OPINION02) They title the article "No Chance to Win", they include the quote:  &gt;Ron Paul admits he doesn't know where his campaign for president is going. &gt;Not the White House, that's for sure, but Paul has been surprised by the size of the crowds he's drawing and the money he's raising, so he figures to stick with it a while longer, including through the Jan. 15 Michigan primary. Is that not one of the most biased articles?  The whole article is about how he as a bunch of supporters and how he's made a metric asston of money in such a short amount of time, and yet the author is acting like he STILL has no chance of winning.
hey why don't you give money to people that have already been doing this for a year or more, and who actually need money....  choose from thousands on myspace or go to www.quoteunquotecords.com
Personally, I believe that shutting down the government under *any* circumstances by an elected official of *any* political party is 100% perfectly asinine, completely irresponsible, passive-aggressive bullshit.  Someone needs to stand up and say this is America, we don't do shit like this.  If the people of Michigan have any sense, they should get his ass out of office pronto.
Thats EXACTLY what I thought.
Finally, a precedent for us Pastafarians not to be forced to sell the sacred al dente flesh of our Deity! I hear that Jewish clerks will now refuse to sell meat and dairy on the same belt, and Baptists will be allowed to call over someone else to handle the Drake's Devil Dogs.
Wait a second... Hungary and Switzerland are landlocked... Wtf?
&gt; Given a 3SAT problem, P would solve it through brute force. NP would solve it... This is nonsensical.  P and NP aren't algorithms -- they are sets of problems.  The correct terminology would be to say that "3SAT is in NP."
*Why Would Government Warmongering Continue in the Face of Massive Popular Opposition?* Because they are the decider?   
LOL.  Upmodded for trolling
Please stop using Jesus for reddit karma. The only ones mentioning Jesus in here are the enraged atheists.
I wish they had preview streams too. And why'd you call up Pablo Honey? It's a great album, "You"'s one of my favorite Radiohead tracks, but The Bends, OK Computer, and Kid A blow it out of the water.
but you're already a slave to the FED break that chain first, become truly free and you'll realize that individual freedom is much more important than making sure that there is a law that says gays can get married if gays are individually free, they can do whatever they want  if women are individually free they can do whatever they want there is no need for a law, and if there is a law, its on a state level, which means that you can move to the state which fits your needs best.
Look all I'm saying is that your belief system preaches (to its children) hate through an unfortunate story of victimhood unlike many other belief systems that preach (to children) hate through some other means.  It is important to look out for oneself but there are self-imposed limits to this in the modern world; as a matter of academic fact, Israel is morally in the wrong and is making the Palestinians and many other Arabs suffer greatly. It would be a huge improvement to the world if those who are taught that hate at a young age think through it critically and morally and try to overcome it rather than increasing it.  This is what has been happening since WWII and it has helped the world immensely.
God Bless Rudy, let's Pray he gets the nod from the nutsos in the GOP.  Divide and conquer.
Crick was of average intelligence. Watson was brilliant. They were both lucky and thieves all at once. These guys were no Einsteins.
Home furnishings for the trailer trash set.
they'd have to pay me about 100 dollars to listen to their garbage anymore.
and preferably have acid.
It's a good album. You, Anyone Can Play Guitar, Stop Whispering, Creep, and the others. Just listen to some of their old live sets from this time... full of energy.
you got your priorities wrong, the reason why we are in the mess we are in today, is because in 1913 a group of bankers enslaved all of us. lets kill the fed, and then everything else will follow what is the point of separation of church and state if you are a slave to a central bank?
They may be major label, and they may be rich, but they are also some of the greatest artists alive today. That, in my opinion, makes them worthy of both.
not trolling, stating facts. other people have already been doing this, who actually care about music, actually need the donations, and actually don't have lazy eyes.
Let them know about it - this kind of ad will never help anyone.
Perhaps you are confusing "consistently" and "constantly"?
&gt;I don't know about medieval Iceland, but [Somalia's doing OK.](http://politics.reddit.com/info/2q4i5/comments) You link to mises.org, a libertarian site.  The article talks about how Somalia, a failed state, is really a libertarian state.  You state that "Somalia's doing okay". Hahahahaha.  I just can't believe it.  It's too surreal.
i see no value in anything radiohead has ever done. their music is washed up garbage. YMMV but calling them some of the greatest living artists only makes me wish they were some of the greatest dead artists.
No, he's not.  The band is allowing him to pay exactly what he wants.  And if that is zero, then that's OK.  Some people feel they should pay, others don't.  The band will let each person decide what to do.  This is a new world we're in.
it's sound some interesting!
It's been fifty years. If there was going to be peace it would have happened by now.
&gt; the US is top arms seller to the WHOLE WORLD. What's the deal with the AK-47, then?  Is our M-16 not competitive enough?
Amnesiac is not experimental music.. It was some enjoyable rock/electronicish music, but that's what it was. If you want a preview, listen to some music from their last tour.
If you want to see what happens when the feds have just about all the power they desire, look at Washington DC.
&gt;Glad to see you acknowledge that Israelis want to get out of the aforementioned occupied territories (since I can only assume your silence is that of acquiescence). You're welcome for the links. I didn't think it was worth mentioning. If israel wanted to get out they would have. Nobody would stop them. Who is preventing israel from leaving the occupied territories?  &gt;Israel does not even control their border with Gaza, They control the airspace, the waters and the checkpoints going into and out of gaza. The fact that they are unable to stop a few crude missiles does not prove otherwise. 
RAZR2,Feeling Good
How many songs have you listened to besides Creep? It's a real question.  I'm curious.
I believe in this specific case: music industry = RIAA
Did I say I hated anybody in this whole thread? Why are you trying to put words in my mouth? Why are you going off on this completely irrelevant tangent? Are you really a teenager? If so, that explains a lot.  &gt;as a matter of academic fact, Israel is morally in the wrong and is making the Palestinians and many other Arabs suffer greatly. So you're religious, eh?
Very Good AD!
Check out some of the bootlegs from their tour last summer.  The new stuff is pretty awesome, and not at all in the vein of Amnesiac/Kid A (which I liked).
I was referring to your barely coherent rambling. Of course you know that. Have a nice day!
and that's why the existence of lists like this isn't all that bad...
Agreed. To call this "taking a risk" is a bit of a stretch, considering Radiohead's (considerable) wealth and (even greater) power.   
Thank you.
i've listened to 3 albums in their entirety, by myself giving them a fair chance. i actually bought one of those at a used record store (i sold it back). their shit sucks. i require music to be fast and the lyrics to be meaningful and comprehendible, their music is not fast and their lyrics may be meaningful (so i'm told) but i haven't understand more than ten words they've ever sung (if you call that singing, i call it droning but whatever).
I dunno.  Why are you asking *me*?
Yes, it sounds trite, elementary, overly obvious - and yet, we’re encountering this almost every day: People who inquire about our SEO services who don’t seem to have an inkling of what online business is all about in the first place. This is the age of the clueless webmaster and the inexperienced Web entrepreneur. So what to do about it? More often than not, what you may need isn’t SEO at all - what you need is a business plan 
Hard work is relative. You're a pompous hater yourself, and that's not hard work either. In any case, don't download it if you don't like it. Don't listen to music for all the world cares. Nothing wrong with that. But if you do download it because you enjoy the music but you refuse to pay for it then you are a cheap hypocrite. If you don't see it that way, gimme some of your work for free. It's prolly shitty too, anyway.
dang, I wish they did this in college. 
&gt;So *your'e* an anal non-American who apparently is, or wishes they were an editor &gt;Obama has a mouth, I wouldn't care if he uses it to name Pelosi or Reid first  Have you already compelled your congresspeople to do so?  What exactly do you want them condemned for? &gt;The spectrum of your political opinion appears to be a little wide. Absolutism only heads in one direction. I like what works and both of those guys professs ideas that would be notably different from the current quagmire.
What the hell?
Staaaaaates riiiiiiights!  Lincoln was a tyrant!
40 miles? Li ION? 6 hours to charge? Still sucks, still won't sell, except to enviro yuppies. Wake me when we have a car that can go 400 miles between 'charges' ( or at least charges faster ), and costs around $11k, the same as my current compact.
and i can guarantee the music sounds exactly the same as their old shit, at least to me, because it all sounds like slow idiotic dribble.   but hey, clearly they paid off the right people, this story is everywhere and everyone is reporting facts wrong, but facts don't matter. just radiohead making money.
hey - i'm not being flip.  i mean, seriously - it seems unlikely that P = NP is logically independent.  if true, it's very weird.
I'll think about that for about a minute before I hose those down off my house.
I agree with your sentiment, but it's possible that kansas_stoner is indeed a douchbag for reasons unrelated to his taste in music or the amount of personal income he is willing to part with for the new Radiohead.  Or maybe he's a great guy.
In Italy, your groin will never be out of reach of the long heel of the law. 
As a native Chinese transplanted to the west, how then can I explain my undue fascination with death and existentialism? Hmm, that reminds me.  I work on the 14th floor of my office building.
like most of the early reddit adopters, i do open source development. you've probably already used my code, or you like windows, either way, you're a sucker.
Correct. I was trying to start an argument, though. ;)
Live gigs and word of mouth are still strong advertising tools. Online music communities now make word of mouth especially powerful. That's how I found out about all the music I listen to. What do the "marketing machines" do that is much better? (honest question, I don't know what they do.) A TV ad wont convince me to buy an album.
oh hosanna, it's the Saviour of the music scene!
lol   and i suck at life thx for the correction
&gt;No, I claim that fishermen share genetic markers. Good, so you acknowledge that you mistyped when you wrote "Easy. They share genetic markers. Just like you said." &gt;They are an ethnic group by virtue of their culture just like jews. Why would some group sharing *culture* satisfy the (*geneologic*) definition of ethnicity? Just more obtuseness from you. &gt;Not all jews share carry the same genetic traits, you said so yourself. Yet I never claimed that (geneologic) ethnicity is defined by genetics, but rather by geneology. &gt;I don't think so but you do. That's how this conversation started. I never commented as to my opinion of whether or not anti semite means anti jew or not.  I am not sure why you want to erroneously ascribe this opinion to me.  Go back to arguing with your straw-men &gt;Sure they do. All it takes is "recognition by others as a distinct group," Though this is one definition of ethnicity, it is not the geneologic definition.  The geneologic defintion has a precise meaning which Jews satisfy and fishermen do not.  Specifically that ethnicity is inherited from parents.  Thus the children of Jews are Jews.  The children of fishermen need not fish. &gt;everybody is an ethnic group. Yes.  Every person on the planet belongs to at least one ethnic group.
Evidence that the anti-freedom neo-cons are starting to panic.
Well, it's not biased because it's an opinion piece. So that's the first thing. Second, remember, any press is good press. The more they write about him, the more people will find out about him, etc. The less they write about him, the harder it is for people to find about him. At least for the time being.
As long as I'm not a member of Falun Gong or the opposition party, these places not might be so bad.   *Edit: See also, Buddhists wanting to reincarnate*
Have you never pissed on someone else's sacred cow anonymously on the internets?  If not, you should.  It's fun. 
Yep, there are sub ethnicities of Jews.  You are correct about that.
Apparently "missing the point" is contagious.
student's
At least in the U.S. their actions would be governed by U.S. law, over there its like the fucking wild west.
&gt;Have you already compelled your congresspeople to do so? What exactly do you want them condemned for? Who said I was an American? (; For failing to accomplish what the people elected them to do. &gt;Absolutism only heads in one direction. I like what works and both of those guys professs ideas that would be notably different from the current quagmire. True. And fair enough. 
Who cares about needs? What about *deserves*? Strictly speaking, nobody needs anything other than a few thousand calories a day and shelter. How about I take away all of your income that's in excess of that value?
They are, and they created a subservient agent to provide for common defense. That's pretty basic history. Consider the [Kentucky Resolution](http://www.yale.edu/lawweb/avalon/kenres.htm), drafted by Thomas Jefferson. When people talk about the Jeffersonian sense of states rights, they mean [interposition](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Interposition) and [nullification](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nullification).  The problem started when the beast got too big and turned on its masters.
Nobody worry, they have a conservative Wyoming gazillionaire on hand to replace Giuliani . . . Jesus Christ!
You are right, of course. But bash is good enough.
wtf?, I see Angry Americans all day long. They are Angry because the guy in front of them is only going the speed limit and they are late for work/home/soccer/football/baseball/drinking/molesting the neighbor kid. They are Angry because their favorite TV show has been preempted by another speech from that retarded chimp in washington. They are Angry because it costs them 75 bucks to fill the tank on their SUV. They are Angry becuase the teacher gave their kid a bad grade. They are Angry because they can't get everything exactly the way they want it, and they don't give a shit about what happens to some village somewhere in the rest of the world. Individually.. some Americans are the most caring and generous people you will ever meet. On the other hand these same people when facing a stranger wouldn't care if they lived or died, much less a foreigner.  As a group, Americans are selfish, greedy, obnoxious and incredibly intolerant.
I agree that one of the ways to limit or reduce the problem is for individuals to control their own viewing habits, but how do you limit or reduce exposure if you are addicted already.  Professional therapuetic help is required.  One of the target markets the Porn industry targets is our youth.  Most kids have seen one or two pornography sites by the time they are 12.  This can have a dramatic effect on kids and can lead to acting out what they see.  Often kids this age are not mature enough to understand boundaries  of age and intimacy and may end up sexually abusing someone they know and not even realize the harm they are causing, because the harm has been inflicted on their own previously innocent minds.  Pornography is not a something to be taken lightly.  Make sure you have filters on your home PC, and don't let your kids surf the internet in the privacy of their rooms.  Keep the PC in a public space and protect access and login options, so a filter is always protecting you from most sites.  Periodically check history files and cache to see what sites are view, also check searches, as they can reveal what sites your family members are browsing.
attempted to complete the transaction,  could not.  5 times.  slowly. oh well. I offered a decent price too.
Little known fact: Einstein derived the "West Coast Offense" from Maxwell's Equations in a 1931 *Annal. der Physik* article.
Don't feed the troll.  You know what they say about opinions and assholes, right?
&gt; The article talks about how Somalia [...] is really a libertarian state. Not only doesn't it do this (it focuses on Xeer, which is after all the point), it doesn't even say 'libertarian'.  It doesn't even say that Somalia *is a state*, as the title's "without the State" should suggest. Try this logic: &gt; &gt; this society functioned surprisingly well without the state. &gt; I don't know about medieval Iceland, but [Somalia's doing OK](http://politics.reddit.com/info/2q4i5/comments). Cataclysm remarked that Iceland in this era "funtioned surprisingly well without the state"; I, having read about how Somalia is today functioning surprisingly well without the state, made a remark to this effect. I'm guessing that your failure is a common one -- some kind of basic fallacy of human shortcut thinking, that also allows people to say that "Americans think X." while annoying other people who've dehomogenized 'Americans' and therefore know that "No, Californians think X; Texans for instance think Y."
Saying good music must be "fast" is like saying a good painting has to be "colorful." Now, if you prefer fast music, that's your opinion. But I for one am thankful that good art isn't defined by such narrow constraints.
maybe it will, lets hope so.
No. I think he means that he consistently purchases each new release, which is perfectly legitimate.
I don't know why you're being downmodded, you're just being honest. And honestly, I'm exactly opposite.  _Amnesiac_ is easily one of my all-time favorite albums of any band in any genre whereas _Pablo Honey_ is humdrum to me.
No kidding.  Two of the hardest working, most impressively self-made individuals I know had to work fast food jobs in early adulthood (one as late as the beginning of her MSc) specifically because the only thing their parents and upbringing ever gave them were plenty of reasons to be cynical about humankind.  I didn't, because my parents were rich.  Lucky me.  In both their cases, brilliant, motivated, hard-working people who were born into situations that left them with just slightly fewer adantages than the homeless guy on the corner.  I didn't have to work at Subway to survive while watching the student debts pile up, because my first jobs came through family connections.  Terrific.  But two of the best people I know had to, because their families were liabilities rather than assets from start to finish.  More credit to them.  I wish they didn't have to, as do they, and I don't buy the romance of what would, in the US, possibly be figured as the American dream.  A shitty upbringing isn't a gift.  But their fast food work was, at any rate, a bigger mark of determination and drive than anything I can immediately point to in those years on my behalf.
lowest level ever?  really?  maybe they mean lowest level since record keeping began.  i imagine there have been points in earth's history when there has been no arctic ice at all.
Yeah, it appears to have taken a life of its own! Although this cartoon is a bit dated: Rummy's still in the mix.
But then we'll end with Hillary Clinton as president.  Better stick to plan A, i.e. register Republican and vote for Ron Paul.
&gt;They are clearly trying to goad syria into a war with them. General consensus, eh?  And the purported victim of the bombing claims it did not even happen?  Haha, I cannot believe somebody with such a shallow understanding as you would even comment.
About 7.50. or 14.32 Canadian.
The reckoning can only be delayed, not obviated.
I'm not sure what you are referring to, but the AK-74 *reduced* the caliber.
That's a great idea, but I think a great deal of time could be saved by not even running a conservative candidate.
Nice to see ugly Republican homophobia rear its ugly head again.
True, and they'd be more than happy to have our taxes pay for the surgery and medical bills. Sick animal bastards.
It would be nice if Columbia and the other Ivies made careful note of who votes for this bill, and then declined admission to their offspring for seven generations. Or maybe just putting their kids into the general admissions pool would be enough.   
Best line: &gt;The relationship with Christ is all important and the wonderful thing about Christ is He does not care about AS or any other disorder. *Jesus doesn't give a crap about autism!*
Lamest photoshop.
1.17
Aw man, why ruin a really good (and by good I mean awful) pun with a "lol" at the end?
&gt;I didn't think it was worth mentioning. If israel wanted to get out they would have. Nobody would stop them. Yep, despite the actual *evidence* to the contrary.  Ignore the facts and keep blaming Israel!  That's your neighborhood bigot.. I mean malcontent for you!
Sucker? Only if I've paid for it. Never paid a cent for software. Not even when bundled with hardware. Like I said, I only pay for stuff I enjoy. If you do code, thanks for your charity, it was shitty anyway.
If I recall correctly, you can soon remeove Denmark from that list - and those we have no are rented from Sweden.
Mounting student debt is going to be one of our biggest problems in the coming years.  College tuition seems to be in the same kind of bubble situation as the housing market.  Starting salaries are not increasing fast enough to make paying the ever increasing amount worth while.  Forget people who are dumb enough to go to out of state school without a scholarship. If you ask me the vast majority of colleges are overpriced just like the vast majority of houses are.
Where does it say “pay what you want”?
I usually praise Xenu, but this seemed like an IPU moment. Xenu's mostly about destruction, ruination, and poor career moves.
Tubgirl is rather pretty, actually.
I'm glad that Friedman is starting to get his head on straight. He's not giving the Iraq War infinite chances and he's making the push for progress finally. Took him way too damn long.
Holy crap, she travelled 10 years back in time?
That reporter's voice sounds really familiar.  Is there any verification that this is Al Jazeera?  I swear that sounds like a guy from the BBC, but I can't think of his name.
Why are people downvoting this comment?
Pay a dollar, to sorta cover their costs. Buy it again later for more if you find you like it and listen to it a lot.
Nah.. mutatron's reply was funny.
Only 40 minutes left to contribute during the 3rd quarter.  I'll match any first timers up to some reasonable middle-class limit... http://www.ronpaul2008.com/
&gt;Denial of reason in itself i find distasteful, the belief in impossibilities. Even if Christianity had remained in it's original form, i would still find it repulsive. It seems you're contending that the people following the 'historical' Jesus around believed in impossibilities. However, review of the scenario presents us with 2 hypotheses. A) The first Christians witnessed a guy perform deeds they couldn't explain {miracles} and neither can you. B) The first Christians followed a guy whom they didn't witness performing miracles. If A, and Jesus had hover-feet, then we may need to rethink precisely what humans are capable of. If B, and he didn't perform miracles, then the people who followed him around did so without having witnessed or believed in any impossibilities. Hence, your claim that even the first Christians denied reason doesn't seem to make sense.
I want to cry about all the people who discussed this video, giving paris hilton any credit. Boo :(
Hey, they're just paying the bills.  Hey every once in a while I like a little bit of Yellow Tail wine, or tuna, or ...  oh nevermind.
ever try it?
&gt; but they are also some of the greatest artists alive today. [citation needed]
Wow. Just when I though it couldn't get more retarded. Is that young girl holding a sign saying "Free Ride" ??
I think you seriously underestimate the shear sheepishness of the average American.  People will buy almost anything if you feed it to them with a nice shiny package.
People like you and kansas_stoner is why "Pay What You Want" system fails.
Not exactly swift justice, being up to two years after the unconstitutional law is passed (assuming the voters haven't forgotten by then). It also doesn't come with an explicit reason attached for the punishment; there is no formal statement of “You have been voted out of office because you voted for ______”.
Downvoted just because it's common?  You've made the point that the media is a gigantic propaganda machine... and yet you don't want more exposure of that fact? Until everyone knows it, why wouldn't you upvote all of these stories so that you weren't in the minority of folks who gets it?
It's just for appearance.  He already has two weapons in the picture provided in the link.
Sounds like something that would be uttered by a suburban rebel with no involvement in the conflict or personal desire to see peace.   FYI, it's been 60 years.
very interesting, i had no idea about this
Funny, I thought they already had one.
He was actually using rags to clean up the caked on car exhaust.  That is why the police left him alone.
Try some hemlock, it's green!
i can't believe that parents get charged for leaving kids in the car accidentally, and yet this guy is not charged.  he is guilty at least of negligence.  when i first read the story, i thought it must be a freak accident that a little rock killed a man; then i realized that the rock was more like a cannonball.
took'em six years... :giggle:
Um, was I being naive? I didn't get this: &gt; "Fair enough," I said. "And did you get a picture with a hooker like you wanted?"
&gt;Why would some group sharing culture satisfy the (geneologic) definition of ethnicity? Just more obtuseness from you. It wouldn't but you don't need to share geneology to share ethnicity according to the wikipedia. &gt;but rather by geneology. So you claim that all jews from all over the world share the same geneology.  Is that right? &gt;I never commented as to my opinion of whether or not anti semite means anti jew or not. Oh OK then. According to you anti-semite does not mean anti jew. Is that right? &gt;he geneologic defintion has a precise meaning which Jews satisfy  So I guess this is an answer to my question above. You are stating that all jews all over the world share a common genealogy.  &gt;Yes. Every person on the planet belongs to at least one ethnic group. Yes and everybody can be from any ethnic group they want as long as they share some culture or identity. For example all linux users are an ethnic group same with all mac users or all redditors.  The wikipedia definition is awesome!.   
The teacher can make a huge difference, when it comes to Math I just got by up to high school when I got a horrible teacher. He just told us to read the math book and he sat in the back playing 60's music, he probably thought he was really laid back and cool. What a dumb ass! The entire class got under 40%, all failed.  My next teacher was very strict and made people go up to the front of class to solve problems on the board.  I went from that 40% and generally an average of probably 60% to over 90% just because of that one teacher.
nice
Without Israel, there would be twice as many Jews in the US. Ever consider that, Jew-haters?  (I'm not implying you are one, LordSlashstab)
in other news: San Francisco police wears assless chaps.
Google really, really needs to get on adsense filtering by keyword.
JESUS CHRIST.  I'm not going to describe the general phenotype for you, just to give you more fodder to try and get offended by.  And, cute, referring to a Jew as a "Hebe".  Pull your head out of your fucking ass, you prick.
When have the neocons argued that 'scrappy entrepreneurs' naturally spawn from the cooling embers of redistribution politics, of disregard for property rights, and of autocratic misrule?
but you know, George W, Clinton, Romney, Gioulianni, they are all excellent choice for president, right? what a fine set of choices we have, bunch of corporate whores, versus 1 guy who actually has a chance to win Kucenich and Gravel are great, but unfortunately, democratic race has already been decided, CFR bilderberg queen Billary. Republican side is open game, because of lack of choices so pick wisely
That is fucking sick and cruel.  Those people don't deserve to live.
&gt;Detroit is a perfect example of the long, slow death when trade barriers will be lifted Real Soon Now. How so? Edit: I'm not arguing that trade barriers are beneficial to consumers. I'm just saying a promise is a promise, and it's a fairly asshole move to just pull the rug out from under someone's business model.
i think you mean 85
What you guys need to do is make this happen every single week. I think Paul is trying to get atop the Republican pile of "most cash on hand."  At the end of Q2, he was in third, if you take "cash on hand minus debts."  http://www.opensecrets.org/pres08/index.asp  A few million more could put him second only to Guiliani.  Wouldn't that get the attention of the press even more?
Answer the question. Who is preventing israel from ending the occupation. If israel wants to leave and hasn't then something must be preventing them. Who or what is that?
I was expecting a picture of a water spout : (
The Bible is not just another book.  Believer or not, only crude people pretend that it's just one more book.  The importance of the work transcends the status of just another book.   As for who goes to hell, no person should appoint themself judge of such matters.   &gt;  [Judge not, that ye be not judged.](http://www.bartleby.com/108/40/7.html)   The Church teaches that baptism is necessary for salvation, but the Church teaches that there is more than just baptism by water in the well known ritual.  There is baptism of desire and baptism by blood.  Recall that the good thief didn't undergo baptism and certainly wasn't versed in theology or scriptures, but his epiphany on the cross and declaration of faith prompted Jesus to declare that he'd be in heaven. As for those who do not have the chance to know Christ and his Church, the subject of invincible ignorance is relevant.   &gt;Invincible ignorance, whether of the law or of the fact, is always a valid excuse and excludes sin. The evident reason is that neither this state nor the act resulting therefrom is voluntary. It is undeniable that a man cannot be invincibly ignorant of the natural law, so far as its first principles are concerned, and the inferences easily drawn therefrom. This, however, according to the teaching of St. Thomas, is not true of those remoter conclusions, which are deducible only by a process of laborious and sometimes intricate reasoning. Of these a person may be invincibly ignorant. Even when the invincible ignorance is concomitant, it prevents the act which it accompanies from being regarded as sinful. The perverse temper of soul, which in this case is supposed, retains, of course, such malice as it had. Vincible ignorance, being in some way voluntary, does not permit a man to escape responsibility for the moral deformity of his deeds; he is held to be guilty and in general the more guilty in proportion as his ignorance is more voluntary. Hence, the essential thing to remember is that the guilt of an act performed or omitted in vincible ignorance is not to be measured by the intrinsic malice of the thing done or omitted so much as by the degree of negligence discernible in the act.  Sometimes though people go to great lengths to pretend that it doesn't matter how one acts or that a loving God wouldn't allow anyone to perish, but this is a distortion of what takes place.  We choose to turn away.  We reject God.  "The God who made you without you will not save you without you."  God so respects the dignity of the individual and their free will that when we chose to reject God it is utterly just that God permit us to shun his company.  Think of a parent with a grown son who becomes contemptuous and cuts himself off from his family.   Our sense of what would be fair or proper for God is just that, our sense of it, not God's.  We don't dictate to God-- recall Einsteing speaking metaphorically in the famed argument with Bohr, "God doesn' play dice."  Bohr responded, so the legend goes, "Don't tell God what to do with his dice."   You're right that monotheism played (may still play) an important part in science.  The Judaeo-Christian tradition gave rise to science not by coincidence.  Freud observed that belief in an abstract, unseen God was an aid to the development of the mind whether or not God was real.   "As a man who has devoted his whole life to the most clear headed science, to the study of matter, I can tell you as a result of my research about atoms this much: There is no matter as such. All matter originates and exists only by virtue of a force which brings the particle of an atom to vibration and holds this most minute solar system of the atom together. We must assume behind this force the existence of a conscious and intelligent mind. This mind is the matrix of all matter."   Max Planck as he accepted the Nobel Prize.  Many decades later, after much personal suffering and witnessing the rise of the Nazis and their destruction, he said, "Under these conditions it is no wonder, that the movement of atheists, which declares religion to be just a deliberate illusion, invented by power-seeking priests, and which has for the pious belief in a higher Power nothing but words of mockery, eagerly makes use of progressive scientific knowledge and in a presumed unity with it, expands in an ever faster pace its disintegrating action on all nations of the earth and on all social levels. I do not need to explain in any more detail that after its victory not only all the most precious treasures of our culture would vanish, but – which is even worse – also any prospects at a better future."    
What do you mean "sub ethnicities". Do they share genetic markers or not? Do they share genealogy or not?
More likely scenario: died from excessive force.  Strangling herself, the cover story.
What part of "violation of airspace is an act of war" do you not understand? 
God Bless the leader of Iran
She wanted to get a picture with a hooker.
&gt;Why are psychedelics illegal? There's a reason why they're called *mind expanding* drugs. Psychedelics have a way of changing a persons whole outlook on life in a way that frightens some people and most governments.
If all Radiohead sounds the same to you, then: YOR DOIN IT WRONG 
I hear waterboarding can take care of the latter :)
Take some personal responsibility for you failings, and then do something about it!
What the hell is this guy on about?
I have no involvement with either the israelis or the palestenians. That makes me objective.
Who wouldn't be? (Terrified in his position, I mean) Hell, I'd have damned the torpedoes and exausted the US nuclear arsenal long ago.
Damn, yeah.  That's what I get for submitting articles after I should've gone to bed.
&gt;I've been voting in presidential elections since 1972, and this is the first time there's a candidate I can vote for The Libertarian Party has had a candidate on the ballot (in most states) since 1972. Ron Paul himself was the candidate in 1988. While I understand the sentiment, the option to vote for someone with positions similar to Ron Paul has been there since 1972. I've taken advantage of it in every election since I was old enough to vote. Ron Paul may be the first non-LP presidential candidate I vote for.
I think paying $15 sets a bad precedent ... I can go into a music store and pay that much. I think a reasonable price for a digital album download is somewhere between $5-$10 depending on the quality.  I put in 4GBP which is about $8. If they see their bell curve right around there it will show it's the right price.  You pay more, it gives the label wrong ideas.
Let me ask you something, if you feel so strongly about the issue, why don't you go over there and try to make a difference instead of judging things from afar?
I don't know. That's a bit of a stretch.
Yes, I reposted it because Wong put it up on Cracked and it's one of those articles that can't be on the front page enough. I thought the extra nines the original poster put in were kinda silly, so I dropped them.
possibly also some solvent
Ways and means.
frukt? More like *sartrekt*!
Same story with hypocritic Singapore: condemning the junta while it is Singapore's weapons that might have been used to kill the monks. See The Age report of 29 Sept, "Web of cash, power and cronies" - link http://www.theage.com.au/news/world/web-of-cash-power-and-cronies/2007/09/28/1190486569946.html?page=fullpage. See also "He (Singapore Prime minister Lee Hsien Loong) writes to junta leader Than Shwe to make plain Asean's stand", Singapore daily Straits Times, 1 Oct 2007 - link  http://www.straitstimes.com/Free/Story/STIStory_162941.html 
&gt; There is no formal statement "You of have been voted out of office because you voted for __". Sounds like a new job for exit pollsters.
To defend right-wing Israeli policy is hateful.
I see Larry Craig's feet under the stall.   j/k.
This wall you have hit, it's not impenetrable.  Keep hitting it, or go around it, or under it, or over it...  For many bright people they aren't used to hitting a difficult problem and having to persevere to see it through.  Don't give up on yourself too easily.  And given the time I've spent on Reddit it may sound like crazy advice, but if you have time to come to this site you have more time to devote towards your engineering degree. It is true that people have limits in natural talent and that some people foolishly try to be that which they were never meant to be, but far more often people reach difficulties and declare those their limits never to actually discover their limits.  Have you ever gone running and thought you could run no faster nor farther?  And maybe sometimes this was true, but more times than not you had not reached your limit but limited yourself.  You start to feel winded or cramp up or get a sideache and you resign from the race.  Sometimes you just have to keep plugging and you will get a second wind.
You have some good points, but I think you are way off topic.  Bread and butter issues are the most important, I agree, but having a well funded educational system is a big part of that even for PAC 10 schools. These issues effect and are important to all classes.  I'll be laid off at the end of the week, but as a New Yorker, and human, I still care that some of America's brightest at one of America's best schools could loose valuable funding for an important institution.
Um, no.  That's pretty much like posing with a bunch of hideous friends to try make yourself look prettier by comparison.  Except, amazingly enough, Ron Paul would be worse than *any of those*.  How many people would die from his "abolish the FDA policy"?  After the US says it won't "intervene", how many will die when North Korea invades South Korea, and when China invades Taiwan?  A Ron Paul presidency would result in millions of corpses.
Maybe these are meant only for their dressed up uniforms that aren't used on a daily basis..? (sorta like mounties dressing up in red)
Not even gonna look. Like I said you are full of shit, and a lamer to boot. Its apparent you can't debate ANYONE in a rational intelligent manner. Get a life loser.
Have you ever spit off a building, bridge, tower, etc?   
Well, that's a shame. REAL Republicans (and by that I mean the traditional northeast fiscally conservative, socially moderate Republicans) had better get busy taking back their party from the religious nuts and political extremists or there won't be a party left to take back, and the nation as a whole will probably be the poorer for it.
&gt;I'm guessing that your failure is a common one -- some kind of basic fallacy of human shortcut thinking, I think your failure is *not having even a basic understanding of history*.  Read up on the recent history of Somalia.  It's not "functioning surprisingly well" and it's not "doing okay".  I don't care what mises.org says, I care about *reality*.
If you believe anything from CBS then you are truly a dumb smuck !
薄毛でかなり悩んでいましたが、植毛という手段を知ってからはもう悩みは解消されました。それを教えてくれたのは植毛クリニック検索サイト『ヘアポート』。
Towards the end of the video it became clear.  As long as the Burma Junta can crush the Monk "center" of the 'uprising', they will be able to mop up the rest of the civilians with ease. I wonder if they can go so far as to outlaw religion?
Actually I disagree...I mean of course people should live above poverty level, but I don't think deserves comes into the equation. Radiohead is living on enough means, and happily enough, to keep making music. Payment for art is about supporting the artists to allow them to do what they love doing...its not some kind of incentive system, where the more you give the better the art. Its kind of like getting a grant or a scholarship...also it has been shown that giving people more money for something they love doing and are creative with, makes them less creative and less interested. In summary, we pay artists to allow them to do what they love, not to reward them through some sort of incentive system. And Yes Radiohead does have enough money at this point.
where was this seen?
Of course there is a specific and precise **geneologic** definition.  You have just chosen to be obtuse.  Cultural ethnicity is not geneologic ethnicity.
I think DHH mispronounced "Merb" when he said that was going to happen in Rails...
Yeah like the one about impeachment?  Yeah any idiot can write up a bill doesn't mean it will ever get voted on.  This probably won him some points in his home district and just amounts to basically grandstanding.
I could have linked directly to the youtube clip, but I found this on this blog and just wanted to give full credit for the link. BTW, the E. stands for Entertainment if you don't feel like watching the video.
